NANOTECHNOLOGY:  WHERE  DOES

THE  U.S.  STAND?

HEARING

BEFORE THE

SUBCOMMITTEE ON RESEARCH
COMMITTEE ON SCIENCE

HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES

ONE  HUNDRED  NINTH  CONGRESS

FIRST  SESSION

JUNE  29,  2005

Serial No. 109–21

Printed  for  the  use  of  the  Committee  on  Science

(

Available  via  the  World  Wide  Web:  http://www.house.gov/science

21–950PS

WASHINGTON  : 

2005

U.S.  GOVERNMENT  PRINTING  OFFICE

For sale by the Superintendent of Documents, U.S. Government Printing Office

Internet: bookstore.gpo.gov Phone: toll free (866) 512–1800; DC area (202) 512–1800

Fax: (202) 512–2250 Mail: Stop SSOP, Washington, DC 20402–0001

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:56 Nov 29, 2005 Jkt 021950 PO 00000 Frm 00001 Fmt 5011 Sfmt 5011 C:\WORKD\RES05\062905\21950.TXT SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

COMMITTEE  ON  SCIENCE

HON.  SHERWOOD  L.  BOEHLERT,  New  York,  Chairman
BART  GORDON,  Tennessee
JERRY  F.  COSTELLO,  Illinois
EDDIE  BERNICE  JOHNSON,  Texas
LYNN  C.  WOOLSEY,  California
DARLENE  HOOLEY,  Oregon
MARK  UDALL,  Colorado
DAVID  WU,  Oregon
MICHAEL  M.  HONDA,  California
BRAD  MILLER,  North  Carolina
LINCOLN  DAVIS,  Tennessee
RUSS  CARNAHAN,  Missouri
DANIEL  LIPINSKI,  Illinois
SHEILA  JACKSON  LEE,  Texas
BRAD  SHERMAN,  California
BRIAN  BAIRD,  Washington
JIM  MATHESON,  Utah
JIM  COSTA,  California
AL  GREEN,  Texas
CHARLIE  MELANCON,  Louisiana
DENNIS  MOORE,  Kansas

RALPH  M.  HALL,  Texas
LAMAR  S.  SMITH,  Texas
CURT  WELDON,  Pennsylvania
DANA  ROHRABACHER,  California
KEN  CALVERT,  California
ROSCOE  G.  BARTLETT,  Maryland
VERNON  J.  EHLERS,  Michigan
GIL  GUTKNECHT,  Minnesota
FRANK  D.  LUCAS,  Oklahoma
JUDY  BIGGERT,  Illinois
WAYNE  T.  GILCHREST,  Maryland
W.  TODD  AKIN,  Missouri
TIMOTHY  V.  JOHNSON,  Illinois
J.  RANDY  FORBES,  Virginia
JO  BONNER,  Alabama
TOM  FEENEY,  Florida
BOB  INGLIS,  South  Carolina
DAVE  G.  REICHERT,  Washington
MICHAEL  E.  SODREL,  Indiana
JOHN  J.H.  ‘‘JOE’’  SCHWARZ,  Michigan
MICHAEL  T.  MCCAUL,  Texas
VACANCY
VACANCY

SUBCOMMITTEE ON RESEARCH

BOB  INGLIS,  South  Carolina,  Chairman

LAMAR  S.  SMITH,  Texas
CURT  WELDON,  Pennsylvania
DANA  ROHRABACHER,  California
GIL  GUTKNECHT,  Minnesota
FRANK  D.  LUCAS,  Oklahoma
W.  TODD  AKIN,  Missouri
TIMOTHY  V.  JOHNSON,  Illinois
DAVE  G.  REICHERT,  Washington
MICHAEL  E.  SODREL,  Indiana
MICHAEL  T.  MCCAUL,  Texas
VACANCY
SHERWOOD  L.  BOEHLERT,  New  York

DARLENE  HOOLEY,  Oregon
RUSS  CARNAHAN,  Missouri
DANIEL  LIPINSKI,  Illinois
BRIAN  BAIRD,  Washington
CHARLIE  MELANCON,  Louisiana
EDDIE  BERNICE  JOHNSON,  Texas
BRAD  MILLER,  North  Carolina
VACANCY
VACANCY
VACANCY

BART  GORDON,  Tennessee

DAN  BYERS  Subcommittee  Staff  Director

JIM  WILSON  Democratic  Professional  Staff  Member

MELE´ WILLIAMS  Professional  Staff  Member/Chairman’s  Designee
ELIZABETH  GROSSMAN,  KARA  HAAS  Professional  Staff  Members

JAMES  HAGUE  Staff  Assistant

(II)

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:56 Nov 29, 2005 Jkt 021950 PO 00000 Frm 00002 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 C:\WORKD\RES05\062905\21950.TXT SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

C O N T E N T S

June  29,  2005

Witness List .............................................................................................................
Hearing Charter ......................................................................................................

Page
2
3

Opening  Statements

Statement  by  Representative  Bob  Inglis,  Chairman,  Subcommittee  on  Re-
search, Committee on Science, U.S. House of Representatives ........................
Written Statement ............................................................................................
Statement  by  Representative  Darlene  Hooley,  Ranking  Minority  Member,
Subcommittee  on  Research,  Committee  on  Science,  U.S.  House  of  Rep-
resentatives ...........................................................................................................
Written Statement ............................................................................................
Prepared  Statement  by  Representative  Russ  Carnahan,  Member,  Sub-
committee  on  Research,  Committee  on  Science,  U.S.  House  of  Representa-
tives .......................................................................................................................
Prepared Statement by Representative Eddie Bernice Johnson, Member, Sub-
committee  on  Research,  Committee  on  Science,  U.S.  House  of  Representa-
tives .......................................................................................................................

Witnesses:

Technology

E.  Floyd  Kvamme,  Co-Chair,  President’s  Council  of  Advisors  on  Science  and

Oral Statement .................................................................................................
Written Statement ............................................................................................
Biography ..........................................................................................................

Matthew M. Nordan, Vice President of Research, Lux Research, Inc.

Oral Statement .................................................................................................
Written Statement ............................................................................................
Biography ..........................................................................................................
Financial Disclosure .........................................................................................

Sean Murdock, Executive Director, Nanobusiness Alliance

Oral Statement .................................................................................................
Written Statement ............................................................................................
Biography ..........................................................................................................
Financial Disclosure .........................................................................................
Jim O’Connor, Vice President, Technology Incubation and Commercialization,

Motorola, Inc.

Oral Statement .................................................................................................
Written Statement ............................................................................................
Biography ..........................................................................................................
Financial Disclosure .........................................................................................
Discussion .................................................................................................................

Appendix  1:  Answers  to  Post-Hearing  Questions

E.  Floyd  Kvamme,  Co-Chair,  President’s  Council  of  Advisors  on  Science  and
Technology ............................................................................................................

(III)

14
15

15
16

17

17

18
20
27

27
29
37
38

38
41
50
51

51
53
56
58
59

84

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:56 Nov 29, 2005 Jkt 021950 PO 00000 Frm 00003 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 C:\WORKD\RES05\062905\21950.TXT SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

Appendix  2:  Additional  Material  for  the  Record

Page

IV

Letter to Robert Inglias from E. Floyd Kvamme, Co-Chair, President’s Council
of Advisors on Science and Technology, dated July 14, 2005 ...........................

90

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:56 Nov 29, 2005 Jkt 021950 PO 00000 Frm 00004 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 C:\WORKD\RES05\062905\21950.TXT SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

NANOTECHNOLOGY:  WHERE  DOES  THE  U.S.

STAND?

WEDNESDAY,  JUNE  29,  2005

HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES,

SUBCOMMITTEE ON RESEARCH,

COMMITTEE ON SCIENCE,

Washington, DC.

The  Subcommittee  met,  pursuant  to  call,  at  10:05  a.m.,  in  Room
2318 of the Rayburn House Office Building, Hon. Bob Inglis [Chair-
man of the Subcommittee] presiding.

(1)

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:56 Nov 29, 2005 Jkt 021950 PO 00000 Frm 00005 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 C:\WORKD\RES05\062905\21950.TXT SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

2

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:56 Nov 29, 2005 Jkt 021950 PO 00000 Frm 00006 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\RES05\062905\21950.TXT SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

3

HEARING CHARTER

SUBCOMMITTEE ON RESEARCH

COMMITTEE ON SCIENCE

U.S. HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES

Nanotechnology: Where Does

the U.S. Stand?

WEDNESDAY, JUNE 29, 2005

10:00 A.M.–12:00 P.M.

2318 RAYBURN HOUSE OFFICE BUILDING

1. Purpose

On  Wednesday,  June  29,  2005,  the  Research  Subcommittee  of  the  Committee  on
Science of the House of Representatives will hold a hearing to examine the findings
and recommendations of the recent assessment of the National Nanotechnology Ini-
tiative  (NNI)  by  the  President’s  Council  of  Advisors  on  Science  and  Technology
(PCAST)  and  will  hear  from  the  nanotechnology  community  on  how  U.S.  research
and business activities in nanotechnology measure up to those of international com-
petitors.
2. Witnesses
Mr.  Floyd  Kvamme  is  the  Co-Chair  of  the  President’s  Council  of  Advisors  on
Science and Technology and a partner at Kleiner Perkins Caufield & Byers, a high-
technology venture capital firm.
Mr. Jim O’Connor is Vice President of Technology Incubation and Commercializa-
tion at Motorola, Inc.
Mr. Sean Murdock is the Executive Director of the NanoBusiness Alliance.
Mr.  Matthew  M.  Nordan  is  the  Vice  President  of  Research  at  Lux  Research  Inc.,
a nanotechnology research and advisory firm.

3. Overarching Questions

• What  is  the  position  of  U.S.  research  and  development  and  U.S.  businesses
in nanotechnology relative to that of other countries? What key factors influ-
ence  U.S.  performance  in  the  field,  and  what  trends  exist  among  those  fac-
tors?
• Which fields of science and engineering present the greatest opportunities for
breakthroughs  in  nanotechnology,  and  which  industries  are  most  likely  to  be
altered  by  those  breakthroughs  in  both  the  near-term  and  the  longer-term?
• What  are  the  primary  barriers  to  commercialization  of  nanotechnology,  and
how can these barriers be overcome or removed? What is the Federal Govern-
ment’s  role  in  facilitating  the  commercialization  of  nanotechnology  innova-
tions,  and  how  can  the  current  federal  nanotechnology  program  be  strength-
ened in this area?

4. Brief Overview

• In  December  2003,  the  President  signed  the  21st  Century  National
Nanotechnology  Research  and  Development  Act  (P.L.  108–153),  which  origi-
nated in the Science Committee. This Act provided a statutory framework for
the  interagency  National  Nanotechnology  Initiative  (NNI),  authorized  appro-
priations  for  nanotechnology  research  and  development  (R&D)  activities
through fiscal year 2008 (FY08), and enhanced the coordination and oversight
of  the  program.  Funding  for  the  NNI  has  grown  from  $464  million  in  fiscal
year  2001  (FY01)  to  $1.1  billion  in  FY05,  and  11  agencies  currently  have
nanotechnology R&D programs.
• In  addition  to  federal  investments,  State  governments  and  the  private  sector
have become increasingly involved in supporting nanotechnology. In 2004, the
private  sector  in  the  U.S.  invested  roughly  $2  billion  in  nanotechnology  re-

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:56 Nov 29, 2005 Jkt 021950 PO 00000 Frm 00007 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\RES05\062905\21950.TXT SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

4

search, while State and local governments invested roughly $400 million. The
State  and  local  investment  is  primarily  spent  on  infrastructure  and  research
at  public  universities,  while  the  private  funding  focuses  on  applied  research
and  development  activities  at  small  and  large  companies,  and  funding  for
start-up nanotechnology ventures.

• Other  countries  are  also  investing  significant  funds  in  nanotechnology  re-
search  and  development.  In  2004,  governments  in  Europe,  Japan,  and  else-
where spent approximately $2.8 billion in this area, and corporations outside
North America spent roughly $2 billion.

• The 21st Century National Nanotechnology Research and Development Act re-
quired that a National Nanotechnology Advisory Panel (NNAP) biennially re-
port  to  Congress  on  trends  and  developments  in  nanotechnology  science  and
engineering  and  on  recommendations  for  improving  the  NNI.  The  first  such
report was released in May 2005 (the executive summary is attached). Its rec-
ommendations  include  strengthening  federal-industry  and  federal-State  co-
operation  on  nanotechnology  research,  infrastructure,  and  technology  trans-
fer, and broadening federal efforts in nanotechnology education and workforce
preparation.

5. Background
Overview of Nanotechnology

The National Academy of Sciences describes nanotechnology as the ‘‘ability to ma-
nipulate  and  characterize  matter  at  the  level  of  single  atoms  and  small  groups  of
atoms.’’  An  Academy  report  describes  how  ‘‘small  numbers  of  atoms  or  mol-
ecules. . .often  have  properties  (such  as  strength,  electrical  resistivity,  electrical
conductivity,  and  optical  absorption)  that  are  significantly  different  from  the  prop-
erties of the same matter at either the single-molecule scale or the bulk scale.’’ Sci-
entists and engineers anticipate that nanotechnology will lead to ‘‘materials and sys-
tems with dramatic new properties relevant to virtually every sector of the economy,
such  as  medicine,  telecommunications,  and  computers,  and  to  areas  of  national  in-
terest such as homeland security.’’ 1

Nanotechnology is an enabling technology and, as such, its commercialization does
not depend specifically on the creation of new products and new markets. Gains can
come from incorporating nanotechnology into existing products, resulting in new and
improved versions of these products. Examples could include faster computers, light-
er materials for aircraft, less invasive ways to treat cancer, and more efficient ways
to  store  and  transport  electricity.  Some  less-revolutionary  nanotechnology-enabled
products are already on the market, including stain-resistant, wrinkle-free pants, ul-
traviolet-light blocking sunscreens, and scratch-free coatings for eyeglasses and win-
dows.

In  October  2004,  Lux  Research,  a  private  research  firm,  released  its  most  recent
evaluation  of  the  potential  impact  of  nanotechnology.  The  analysis  found  that,  in
2004,  $13  billion  worth  of  products  in  the  global  marketplace  incorporated
nanotechnology. The report projected that, by 2014, this figure will rise to $2.6 tril-
lion—15 percent of manufacturing output in that year. The report also predicts that
in  2014,  ten  million  manufacturing  jobs  worldwide—11  percent  of  total  manufac-
turing jobs—will involve manufacturing these nanotechnology-enabled products.2
National Nanotechnology Initiative

The National Nanotechnology Initiative (NNI) is a multi-agency research and de-
velopment  (R&D)  program.  The  goals  of  the  NNI,  which  was  initiated  in  2000,  are
to  maintain  a  world-class  research  and  development  program;  to  facilitate  tech-
nology transfer; to develop educational resources, a skilled workforce, and the infra-
structure  and  tools  to  support  the  advancement  of  nanotechnology;  and  to  support
responsible development of nanotechnology. Currently, 11 federal agencies have on-
going  programs  in  nanotechnology  R&D;  funding  for  those  activities  is  shown  in
Table 1. Additionally, 11 other agencies, such as the Food and Drug Administration,
the U.S. Patent and Trademark Office, and the Department of Transportation, par-
ticipate in the coordination and planning work associated with the NNI.

1 Small  Wonders,  Endless  Frontiers:  A  Review  of  the  National  Nanotechnology  Initiative,  Na-

tional Research Council/National Academy of Sciences, 2002.

2 Lux Research, ‘‘Sizing Nanotechnology’s Value Chain,’’ October 2004.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:56 Nov 29, 2005 Jkt 021950 PO 00000 Frm 00008 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\RES05\062905\21950.TXT SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

5

In 2003, the Science Committee wrote and held hearings on the 21st Century Na-
tional Nanotechnology Research and Development Act, which was signed into law on
December  3,  2003.  The  Act  authorizes  $3.7  billion  over  four  years  (FY05  to  FY08)
for  five  agencies  (the  National  Science  Foundation,  the  Department  of  Energy,  the
National  Institute  of  Standards  and  Technology,  the  National  Aeronautics  and
Space  Administration,  and  the  Environmental  Protection  Agency).  The  Act  also:
adds oversight mechanisms—an interagency committee, annual reports to congress,
an advisory committee, and external reviews—to provide for planning, management,
and coordination of the program; encourages partnerships between academia and in-
dustry;  encourages  expanded  nanotechnology  research  and  education  and  training
programs; and emphasizes the importance of research into societal concerns related
to nanotechnology to understand the impact of new products on health and the envi-
ronment.
National Nanotechnology Advisory Panel Report

The  21st  Century  National  Nanotechnology  Research  and  Development  Act  re-
quired  the  establishment  or  designation  of  a  National  Nanotechnology  Advisory
Panel (NNAP) to assess and provide advice on the NNI. In July 2004, the President
designated  the  existing  President’s  Council  of  Advisors  on  Science  and  Technology
to  serve  as  the  NNAP.  The  NNAP’s  responsibilities  include  providing  input  to  the
administration  on  trends  and  developments  in  nanotechnology  and  on  the  conduct
and management of the NNI.

The NNAP is required to report to Congress on its activities every two years, and
its  first  report  was  formally  released  in  May  2005.  (The  executive  summary  of  this
report is included in Appendix A, its content is described below, and the full report
is  available  online.3 )  The  report  assesses  the  U.S.  position  in  nanotechnology  rel-
ative  to  the  rest  of  the  world,  evaluates  the  quality  of  current  NNI  programs  and
program management, and recommends ways the NNI could be improved.

Benchmarking

The  NNAP  report  finds  that  U.S.  leads  the  rest  of  the  world  in  nanotechnology
as measured by metrics such as level of spending (both public and private), publica-
tions  in  high-impact  journals,  and  patents.  The  report  also  finds,  however,  that
other  countries  are  increasing  their  efforts  and  investments  in  nanotechnology  and
are closing the gap with the U.S.

Nanotechnology  is  a  relatively  new  field,  and  relevant  activities  in  the  U.S.  and
abroad are focused more on research and development than on production and sales.
The  NNAP  observes  that,  because  the  relevant  markets  are  still  emergent,  useful
economic  indicators,  such  as  market  share,  are  not  yet  available  for  the  evaluation
of  the  U.S.  competitive  position.  Therefore,  the  NNAP  report  considers  where  the

3 The  PCAST’s  report,  National  Nanotechnology  Initiative  at  Five  Years:  Assessment  and  Rec-
ommendations  of  the  National  Nanotechnology  Advisory  Panel,  is  available  online  at  http://
www.nano.gov/FINAL¥PCAST¥NANO¥REPORT.pdf.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:56 Nov 29, 2005 Jkt 021950 PO 00000 Frm 00009 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\RES05\062905\21950.TXT SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

6

funding 

There 

is 

U.S. stands by examining benchmarks such as funding for nanotechnology research
and development and numbers of publications and patents.

Reliable  data  on  spending  is  difficult  to  gather,  as  definitions  of  nanotechnology
vary, and investments in the private sector are often not reported. Information gath-
ered  by  the  National  Science  Foundation  demonstrates  that 
for
nanotechnology  around  the  world  has  grown  significantly  over  the  past  decade  or
so;  specifically,  while  total  government  investment  in  nanotechnology  research  and
development  was  roughly  $430  million  in  1997,  by  2005  it  had  climbed  to  roughly
$4.1  billion—a  factor  of  10  increase  in  just  eight  years.  The  U.S.  traditionally  has
accounted  for  just  over  a  quarter  of  that  spending.  Japan  and  the  European  Union
countries collectively each spend roughly the same amount as the U.S.

less  historical  data  available 

for  private  sector  spending  on
nanotechnology research and development, but current data are gathered. The most
recent analysis from Lux Research estimates that corporations worldwide spent $3.8
billion  in  this  area  in  2004,  with  46  percent  ($1.7  billion)  of  that  spent  by  North
American companies, 36 percent ($1.4 billion) by Asian companies, 17 percent ($650
million) by European companies, and less than one percent by companies from other
regions.  In  addition,  venture  capital  firms  invested  approximately  $400  million  in
nanotechnology start-up companies.

Data on spending describe current levels of effort and hence information about fu-
ture  generation  of  knowledge.  Data  on  publications  and  patents  provide  a  sense  of
the  level  of  recent  innovations  and  advances.  Analysis  of  the  U.S.  share  of  publica-
tions  show  that,  while  the  U.S.  produces  the  most  papers  in  nanotechnology,  both
overall  and  in  the  most  highly-regarded  journals,  the  percent  of  such  papers  origi-
nating  in  the  U.S.  is  declining  as  other  countries’  contributions  grow  more  rapidly
than those from the U.S. Similar trends can be seen in studies of patents awarded.
One  of  the  reasons  that  the  U.S.  is  the  acknowledged  leader  in  nanotechnology
is  its  breadth  of  investment;  research  and  development  activities  are  ongoing  in
areas  relevant  to  a  wide  range  of  industries  (such  as  materials,  energy,  electronics,
health care, etc.). Most other countries cannot afford to invest as broadly as the U.S.
Some  of  these  other  countries—particularly  in  Asia—have  chosen  to  concentrate
their investments in particular areas to make strides in a specific sector. For exam-
ple, Korea and Taiwan are investing heavily in nanoelectronics while Singapore and
China are focusing on nanobiotechnology and nanomaterials, respectively.

NNI Management

The  NNAP  report  finds  that  the  NNI  is  a  well  managed  program.  The  report
notes that the balance of funding among different areas of nanotechnology is appro-
priate  and  emphasizes  the  importance  of  investment  in  a  diverse  array  of  fields
rather  than  a  narrow  focus  on  a  just  a  few  ‘‘Grand  Challenges.’’  In  particular,  the
NNAP  lauds  the  NNI  for  advancing  the  foundational  knowledge  about  control  of
matter at the nanoscale; creating an interdisciplinary nanotechnology research com-
munity and an infrastructure of over 35 nanotechnology research centers, networks,
and  user  facilities;  investing  in  research  related  to  the  environment,  health,  safety,
and  other  societal  concerns;  establishing  nanotechnology  education  programs;  and
supporting public outreach.

Recommendations

The  NNAP  recommends  continued  strong  investment  in  basic  research  and  notes
the importance of recent federal investment in research centers, equipment, and fa-
cilities at universities and national laboratories throughout the country (see Appen-
dix  B).  Such  facilities  allow  both  university  researchers  and  small  companies  to
have access to equipment too expensive or unwieldy to be contained in an individual
laboratory.

The NNAP also emphasizes the importance of state and industry contributions to
the U.S. nanotechnology efforts and recommends that the NNI expand federal-State
and federal-industry interactions through workshops and other methods.

The  NNAP  also  recommends  that  the  Federal  Government  actively  use  existing
government  programs  such  as  the  Small  Business  Innovation  Research  (SBIR)  and
the  Small  Business  Technology  Transfer  (STTR)  programs  to  enhance  technology
transfer  in  nanotechnology.  All  grant-giving  agencies  are  required  by  law  to  have
SBIR and STTR programs, and some of them specifically target solicitations toward
nanotechnology.  However,  it  is  hard  to  get  a  clear,  up-to-date  picture  of  how  much
funding  is  actually  provided  for  nanotechnology-related  projects  in  these  programs
and  on  what  the  demand  for  SBIR/STTR  funding  in  this  area  is.  The  NNAP  also
recommends  that  federal  agencies  be  early  adopters  and  purchasers  of  new
nanotechnology-related  products  in  cases  where  these  technologies  can  help  fulfill
an agency’s mission.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:56 Nov 29, 2005 Jkt 021950 PO 00000 Frm 00010 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\RES05\062905\21950.TXT SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

7

The NNAP also finds that the NNI is making good investments in environmental,
health, and safety research, and recommends that the Federal Government continue
efforts  to  coordinate  this  work  with  related  efforts  in  industry  and  at  non-profits
and  with  activities  conducted  in  other  countries.  The  NNAP  emphasizes  the  impor-
tance  of  communication  with  stakeholders  and  the  public  regarding  research  and
findings in this area.

Finally, the NNAP emphasizes the importance of education and workforce prepa-
ration  and  recommends  that  the  NNI  coordinate  with  Departments  of  Education
and Labor to improve access to materials and methods being developed for purposes
of nanotechnology education and training.
Challenges Ahead

The NNAP notes that successful adoption of nanotechnology-enabled products will
require  coordination  between  federal,  State,  academic,  and  industrials  efforts  (in-
cluding for efficient commercialization of products), training of a suitable high-tech-
nology  workforce,  and  development  of  techniques  for  the  responsible  manufacture
and use of these products.

Developing  a  federal  strategy  to  facilitate  technology  transfer  of  nanotechnology
innovations  is  a  particularly  complex  challenge  because  of  the  wide  range  of  indus-
try  sectors  that  stand  to  benefit  from  nanotechnology  and  the  range  of  time  scales
at which each sector will realize these benefits. The NNAP report provides examples
of various possible nanotechnology applications and when they are expected to reach
the  product  stage  (Table  2).  The  applications  cover  sectors  from  information  tech-
nology  and  health  care  to  security  and  energy,  and  some  applications  are  on  the
market now, while others are more than 20 years in the future.

As  the  NNAP  report  notes,  the  states  are  playing  an  increasing  role  in
nanotechnology.  In  2004,  State  funding  for  nanotechnology-related  projects  was
$400  million,  or  approximately  40  percent  of  the  total  federal  investment.  To  date,
State  funding  for  nanotechnology  has  been  focused  on  infrastructure—particularly
the construction of new facilities—with some research support being provided in the
form  of  matching  funds  to  public  universities  that  receive  federal  research  dollars.
In addition to receiving State support, universities and national laboratories also le-
verage federal investments through industry contributions of funds or in-kind dona-
tions  of  equipment  and  expertise.  The  NNAP  report  lists  15  examples  of
nanotechnology infrastructure investments at the State and local levels, and further
details  on  non-federal  initiatives  can  be  found  in  the  recent  report  on  a  2003  NNI
workshop on regional, State, and local nanotechnology activities.4

4 Regional,  State,  and  Local  Initiatives  in  Nanotechnology  is  the  report  on  a  workshop  con-
vened on September 30–October 1, 2003 by the Nanoscale Science, Engineering and Technology
Continued

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:56 Nov 29, 2005 Jkt 021950 PO 00000 Frm 00011 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\RES05\062905\21950.TXT SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

8

In  recent  years,  the  focus  has  been  on  the  construction  of  nanotechnology  facili-
ties,  but  as  these  building  projects  financed  by  federal,  State,  and  private  funding
are  completed,  the  nanotechnology  community  must  consider  how  best  to  capitalize
on these new resources. Specifically, funding will have to be found for operating ex-
penses,  and  policies  that  will  attract  public  and  private  sector  users  to  these  facili-
ties  will  be  needed  on  topics  such  as  collaboration,  intellectual  property,  and  usage
fees.

The  diversity  of  industry  sectors  will  be  a  challenge  for  developing  appropriate
education  and  workforce  training  programs  in  nanotechnology.  The  predicted  scale
and  breadth  of  research  and  manufacturing  jobs  related  to  nanotechnology  will  re-
quire  not  only  specialized  programs  but  also  integration  of  nanotechnology-related
information  into  general  science,  technology,  engineering,  and  mathematics  edu-
cation.

Finally, successful integration of nanotechnology into products will require an un-
derstanding of the standards and regulations needed to govern responsible manufac-
turing and use of nanotechnology-enabled products. Under the FY06 budget request,
$82 million (eight percent) of the proposed NNI R&D funding would be spent on re-
search related to the societal implications of nanotechnology. Of this amount, $38.5
million  (four  percent  of  the  overall  program)  would  be  specifically  directed  at  envi-
ronmental, health, and safety research, while the remainder is for the study of eco-
nomic,  workforce,  educational,  ethical,  and  legal  implications.  In  addition  to  this
funding,  relevant  work  is  also  ongoing  in  other  NNI  focus  areas.  One  example  is
the  development  of  measurement  techniques  at  the  nanoscale  which  are  necessary
to set standards that can be used for quality control of nanotechnology products and
to  manage  compliance  with  safety  regulations.  Another  example  is  the  study  of  the
basic  mechanisms  of  interaction  between  nanoscale  materials  and  biological  sys-
tems,  which  can  provide  critical  information  for  health  care  applications  as  well  as
safe use practices.
6. Witness Questions

The  witnesses  were  asked  to  address  the  following  questions  in  their  testimony:

Questions for Mr. Floyd Kvamme:

• What is the position of U.S. research and development in nanotechnology rel-
ative to that of other countries? What key factors influence U.S. performance
in the field, and what trends exist among those factors?

• What  fields  of  science  and  engineering  present  the  greatest  opportunities  for
breakthroughs  in  nanotechnology,  and  what  industries  are  most  likely  to  be
affected  by  those  breakthroughs  in  both  the  near-term  and  the  longer-term?
• What  is  the  Federal  Government’s  role  in  facilitating  the  commercialization
federal

of  nanotechnology 
can 
nanotechnology program be strengthened in this area?

innovations,  and  how 

• What  is  the  workforce  outlook  for  nanotechnology,  and  how  can  the  Federal
Government help ensure there will be enough people with the relevant skills
to meet the Nation’s needs for nanotechnology research and development and
for the manufacture of nanotechnology-enabled products?

current 

the 

Questions for Mr. Jim O’Connor:

• What is the position of U.S. research and development in nanotechnology rel-
ative to that of other countries? What key factors influence U.S. performance
in this field?

• What  fields  of  science  and  engineering  present  the  greatest  opportunities  for
breakthroughs in nanotechnology relevant to Motorola, and what products are
most  likely  to  be  affected  by  those  breakthroughs  in  both  the  near-term  and
the longer-term?

• What  countries  and  corporations  do  you  perceive  to  be  your  closest  competi-
influence

in  nanotechnology  science  and  business?  What  factors 

tors 
Motorola’s ability to compete with these groups?

• What is the workforce outlook for nanotechnology, and how does the U.S. po-
sition  compare  to  that  of  other  countries?  How  can  the  Federal  Government
help  ensure  there  will  be  enough  people  with  the  relevant  skills  to  meet  the

(NSET)  Subcommittee,  the  interagency  group  that  coordinates  NNI  activities.  The  report  is
available online at http://www.nano.gov/041805Initiatives.pdf.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:56 Nov 29, 2005 Jkt 021950 PO 00000 Frm 00012 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\RES05\062905\21950.TXT SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

9

Nation’s  needs  for  nanotechnology  research  and  development  and  for  the
manufacture of nanotechnology-enabled products?

Questions for Mr. Sean Murdock:

• What  is  the  position  of  U.S.  businesses  in  nanotechnology  relative  to  that  of
other countries? What key factors influence U.S. performance in the field, and
what trends exist among those factors?
• What investments are other countries making in nanotechnology research, de-
velopment,  and  commercialization  activities?  How  do  other  countries’  ap-
proaches differ from that of the U.S.?
• What  industries  are  most  likely  to  be  affected  by  breakthroughs  in
• What  are  typical  pathways  by  which 

ideas  or  prototypes  of  new
nanotechnology-related  products  or  processes  are  successfully  developed  into
commercial  applications?  What  are  the  primary  barriers  to  these  pathways,
and how can these barriers be overcome or removed?
• What  is  the  Federal  Government’s  role  in  facilitating  the  competitiveness  of
federal

nanotechnology in both the near-term and the longer-term?

in  nanotechnology,  and  how  can  the  current 

U.S. 
nanotechnology program be strengthened in this area?

industry 

Questions for Mr. Matthew Nordan:

• What  is  the  position  of  U.S.  businesses  in  nanotechnology  relative  to  that  of
other countries? What key factors influence U.S. performance in the field, and
what trends exist among those factors?
• What investments are other countries making in nanotechnology research, de-
velopment,  and  commercialization  activities?  How  do  other  countries’  ap-
proaches differ from that of the U.S.?
• What  industries  are  most  likely  to  be  affected  by  breakthroughs  in
• What  are  typical  pathways  by  which 

ideas  or  prototypes  of  new
nanotechnology-related  products  or  processes  are  successfully  developed  into
commercial  applications?  What  are  the  primary  barriers  to  these  pathways,
and how can these barriers be overcome or removed?
• What  is  the  Federal  Government’s  role  in  facilitating  the  competitiveness  of
federal

nanotechnology in both the near-term and the longer-term?

in  nanotechnology,  and  how  can  the  current 

U.S. 
nanotechnology program be strengthened in this area?

industry 

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:56 Nov 29, 2005 Jkt 021950 PO 00000 Frm 00013 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\RES05\062905\21950.TXT SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

Appendix A

10

The  National  Nanotechnology  Initiative  at  Five  Years:  As-
the  National

sessment  and  Recommendations  of 
Nanotechnology Advisory Panel

REPORT TO THE PRESIDENT FROM THE PRESIDENT’S COUNCIL OF ADVISORS ON

SCIENCE AND TECHNOLOGY1

EXECUTIVE SUMMARY

The President’s Fiscal Year (FY) 2004 Budget, released in February 2003, tasked
the President’s Council of Advisors on Science and Technology (PCAST) with review-
ing the National Nanotechnology Initiative (NNI) and making recommendations for
strengthening the program. Congress ratified the need for an outside advisory body
with its passage of the 21st Century Nanotechnology Research and Development Act
of 2003 (the Act), which called for the President to establish or designate a National
Nanotechnology  Advisory  Panel  (NNAP).  By  Executive  Order,  the  President  des-
ignated  PCAST  as  the  NNAP  in  July  2004.  To  augment  its  own  expertise  in  man-
aging  large  research  and  development  (R&D)  programs,  PCAST  identified  a  Tech-
nical  Advisory  Group  (TAG)  comprising  about  45  nanotechnology  experts  rep-
resenting diverse disciplines and sectors across academia and industry. The TAG is
a  knowledgeable  resource,  providing  input  and  feedback  with  a  more  technical  per-
spective.

The Act calls upon the NNAP to assess the NNI and to report on its assessments
and  make  recommendations  for  ways  to  improve  the  program  at  least  every  two
years.  This  is  the  first  such  periodic  report  provided  by  PCAST  in  its  role  as  the
NNAP.

The Administration has identified nanotechnology as one of its top R&D priorities.
When FY 2005 concludes later this year, over four billion taxpayer dollars will have
been  spent  since  FY  2001  on  nanotechnology  R&D.  In  addition,  the  President’s  FY
2006  Budget  includes  over  $1  billion  for  nanotechnology  research  across  11  federal
agencies.  Such  a  substantial  and  sustained  investment  has  been  largely  based  on
the  expectation  that  advances  in  understanding  and  harnessing  novel  nanoscale
properties will generate broad-ranging economic benefits for our nation. As such, the
NNAP  members  believe  the  President,  the  Congress,  and  the  American  people  are
seeking  answers  to  four  basic  questions  relative  to  the  federal  investment  in
nanotechnology R&D:

1. Where Do We Stand?
2. Is This Money Well Spent and the Program Well Managed?
3. Are We Addressing Societal Concerns and Potential Risks?
4. How Can We Do Better?

Answers  to  these  questions  provide  the  assessments  and  recommendations  called

for by the Act. Our conclusions can be summarized as follows:
1. Where Do We Stand?

Today, the United States is the acknowledged leader in nanotechnology R&D. The
approximately  $1  billion  annual  Federal  Government  funding  for  nanotechnology
R&D  is  roughly  one-quarter  of  the  current  global  investment  by  all  nations.  Total
annual  U.S.  R&D  spending  (federal,  State,  and  private)  now  stands  at  approxi-
mately $3 billion, one-third of the approximately $9 billion in total worldwide spend-
ing  by  the  public  and  private  sectors.  In  addition,  the  United  States  leads  in  the
number  of  start-up  companies  based  on  nanotechnology,  and  in  research  output  as
measured  by  patents  and  publications.  Our  leadership  position,  however,  is  under
increasing  competitive  pressure  from  other  nations  as  they  ramp  up  their  own  pro-
grams.
2. Is This Money Well Spent and the Program Well Managed?

The NNAP members believe strongly that the money the United States is invest-
ing in nanotechnology is money very well spent, and that continued robust funding
is  important  for  the  Nation’s  long-term  economic  well-being  and  national  security.
Nanotechnology  holds  tremendous  potential  for  stimulating  innovation  and  thereby
enabling  or  maintaining  U.S.  leadership  in  industries  that  span  all  sectors.  The

1 Released  May 

2005, 

FINAL¥PCAST¥NANO¥REPORT.pdf

full 

report 

available 

online 

at 

http://www.nano.gov/

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:56 Nov 29, 2005 Jkt 021950 PO 00000 Frm 00014 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\RES05\062905\21950.TXT SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

11

focus of the NNI on expanding knowledge of nanoscale phenomena and on discovery
of  nanoscale  and  nanostructured  materials,  devices,  and  systems,  along  with  build-
ing  an  infrastructure  to  support  such  studies,  has  been  both  appropriate  and  wise.
The  NNI  has  accomplished  much  already-advancing  foundational  knowledge,  pro-
moting  technology  transfer  for  commercial  and  public  benefit,  developing  an  infra-
structure of user facilities and instrumentation, and taking steps to address societal
concerns—and  the  economic  payoffs  over  the  long-term  are  likely  to  be  substantial.
The  NNI  appears  well  positioned  to  maintain  United  States  leadership  going  for-
ward,  through  both  its  coordinated  interagency  approach  to  planning  and  imple-
menting the Federal R&D program and its efforts to interact with industry and the
public. This approach is outlined clearly in the recently released NNI Strategic Plan,
which  spells  out  the  goals  and  priorities  for  the  initiative  for  the  next  five  to  10
years.  The  NNAP  members  believe  that  this  Plan  provides  an  appropriate  way  to
organize and manage the program.
3. Are We Addressing Societal Concerns and Potential Risks?

The  societal  implications  of  nanotechnology—including  environmental  and  health
effects—must  be  taken  into  account  simultaneously  with  the  scientific  advances
being underwritten by the Federal Government. The NNI generally recognizes this,
and is moving deliberately to identify, prioritize, and address such concerns.
Environmental, Health, and Safety. The NNAP convened a panel of experts from
Government regulatory agencies, academia, and the private sector to discuss the en-
vironmental and health effects of nanotechnology. Based on these panel discussions,
as well as on information received from the NSET Subcommittee and the TAG, the
NNAP  members  believe  that  potential  risks  do  exist  and  that  the  Government  is
directing appropriate attention and adequate resources to the research that will en-
sure the protection of the public and the environment. The NNAP members are par-
ticularly  pleased  that  strong  communication  exists  among  the  agencies  that  fund
nanotechnology research and those responsible for regulatory decision-making.
Education.  The  future  economic  prosperity  of  the  United  States  will  depend  on  a
workforce  that  both  is  large  enough  and  has  the  necessary  skills  to  meet  the  chal-
lenges posed by global competition. This will be especially important in enabling the
United  States  to  maintain  its  leadership  role  in  nanotechnology  and  in  the  indus-
tries  that  will  use  it.  The  NNI  has  launched  a  range  of  education-related  programs
appropriate for classrooms at all levels and across the country, along with other pro-
grams  that  are  aimed  at  the  broader  public.  While  the  NNI  cannot  be  expected  to
solve  the  Nation’s  science  education  problems  singlehandedly,  the  NNAP  members
believe  that  these  NNI  activities  can  help  improve  science  education  and  attract
more bright young minds into careers in science and engineering.
Other Societal Dimensions. Understanding the impact of a new technology on so-
ciety  is  vital  to  ensuring  that  development  takes  place  in  a  responsible  manner.  In
addition to research into societal issues such as the environmental, health, and safe-
ty effects of nanotechnology, the NNI’s diverse and growing R&D program is explor-
ing other issues such as economic, workforce, and ethical impacts. In addition, com-
munication  among  the  various  stakeholders  and  with  the  public  on  these  topics  is
an important element of the program, as indicated by the establishment of an inter-
agency subgroup to address this topic.

4. How Can We Do Better?

The NNAP will monitor progress on the program elements discussed above; in the
meantime,  the  NNAP  offers  the  following  recommendations  aimed  at  further
strengthening the NNI.
Technology Transfer. The level of interest and investment across many industrial
sectors  is  growing  and  will  likely  outpace  Government  investment  in  the  United
States  soon,  if  it  hasn’t  already.  The  NNI  needs  to  take  further  steps  to  commu-
nicate  and  establish  links  to  U.S.  industry  to  further  facilitate  technology  transfer
from the lab to the marketplace. The NNAP calls attention to two areas that would
augment  the  existing  suite  of  activities  and  enhance  commercialization  of  research
results.

• The  NNI’s  outreach  to,  and  coordination  with,  the  States  should  be
increased.  Such  efforts  would  complement  those  NNI  activities  already  un-
derway with various industrial sectors. The States perform a vital role in fos-
tering  economic  development  through  business  assistance  programs,  tax  in-
centives,  and  other  means.  In  addition,  collectively  the  States  are  spending
substantial  amounts  in  support  of  nanotechnology  R&D  and  commercializa-

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:56 Nov 29, 2005 Jkt 021950 PO 00000 Frm 00015 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\RES05\062905\21950.TXT SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

12

tion. The NNAP members believe that practical application of NNI-funded re-
search  results,  workforce  development,  and  other  national  benefits  will  in-
crease with improved federal-State coordination.

• The  NNI  should  examine  how  to  improve  knowledge  management  of
NNI assets. This would include assets such as user facilities and instrumen-
tation available to outside researchers, research results, and derivative intel-
lectual property. Through mechanisms such as publicly available and search-
able  databases,  the  NNI  can—and  should—improve  infrastructure  utilization
and the transfer of technology to the private sector.

The  NNAP  notes  that,  although  ultimate  commercialization  of  nanotechnology  is
desirable and to be supported, the NNI must remain mindful that its primary focus
is  on  developing  an  understanding  of  the  novel  properties  that  occur  at  the
nanoscale and the ability to control matter at the atomic and molecular level. While
we all want the United States to benefit economically from nanotechnology as quick-
ly  as  possible,  it  is  critically  important  that  the  basic  intellectual  property  sur-
rounding  nanotechnology  be  generated  and  reside  within  this  country.  Those  who
hold this knowledge will ‘‘own’’ commercialization in the future.
Environmental and Health Implications. The NNI should continue its efforts to
understand  the  possible  toxicological  effects  of  nanotechnology  and,  where  harmful
human  or  environmental  effects  are  proven,  appropriate  regulatory  mechanisms
should  be  utilized  by  the  pertinent  federal  agencies.  Nanotechnology  products
should  not  be  immune  from  regulation,  but  such  regulation  must  be  rational  and
based  on  science,  not  perceived  fears.  Although  it  appears  that  the  public  and  the
environment  are  adequately  protected  through  existing  regulatory  authorities,  the
NNAP  encourages  the  Government  regulatory  agencies  to  work  together  to  ensure
that  any  regulatory  policies  that  are  developed  are  based  on  the  best  available
science and are consistent among the agencies.

The  NNAP  notes  that  research  on  the  environmental  and  health  implications  of
nanomaterials  and  associated  products  should  be  coordinated  not  only  within  the
Federal Government, but with other nations and groups around the world to ensure
that efforts are not duplicated unnecessarily and information is shared widely.
Education/Workforce  Preparation.  A  key  to  realizing  the  economic  benefits  of
nanotechnology  will  be  the  establishment  of  an  infrastructure  capable  of  educating
and  training  an  adequate  number  of  researchers,  teachers,  and  technical  workers.
To  maximize  the  value  of  its  investment  in  developing  materials  and  programs  for
education and worker training, the NNI should establish relationships with the De-
partments of Education and Labor. While the science agencies such as the National
Science  Foundation  can  conduct  education  research  and  design  excellent  programs
and  materials,  ultimately  the  mission  agencies,  Education  and  Labor,  must  be  en-
gaged  to  disseminate  these  programs  and  materials  as  widely  as  possible  through-
out the Nation’s education and training systems.

The NNI’s education focus should be on promoting science fundamentals at K–16
levels,  while  encouraging  the  development  and  incorporation  of  nanotechnology-re-
lated material into science and engineering education. To promote mid-career train-
ing for professionals, the NNI should partner with and support professional societies
and trade associations that have continuing education as a mission.
Societal  Implications.  The  NNI  must  support  research  aimed  at  understanding
the  societal  (including  ethical,  economic,  and  legal)  implications  and  must  actively
work  to  inform  the  public  about  nanotechnology.  Now  more  than  ever,  those  who
are  developing  new  scientific  knowledge  and  technologies  must  be  aware  of  the  im-
pact their efforts may have on society.

In  summary,  the  NNAP  supports  the  NNI’s  high-level  vision  and  goals,  and  the
investment strategy by which those are to be achieved. Panel members feel that the
program  can  be  strengthened  by  extending  its  interaction  with  industry,  State  and
regional  economic  developers,  the  Departments  of  Education  and  Labor,  and  inter-
nationally, where appropriate. The NNI should also continue to confront the various
societal issues in an open, straightforward, and science-based manner.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:56 Nov 29, 2005 Jkt 021950 PO 00000 Frm 00016 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\RES05\062905\21950.TXT SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

13

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:56 Nov 29, 2005 Jkt 021950 PO 00000 Frm 00017 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\RES05\062905\21950.TXT SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

14

Chairman  INGLIS.  The  Subcommittee  will  come  to  order,  and
thank  you  for  joining  us  this  morning  for  a  second  hearing  on
nanotechnology.  Last  month,  the  Research  Subcommittee  heard
from  experts  about  examples  of  successful  partnerships  between
government  and  the  private  and  public  sectors,  and  discussed  bar-
riers to future advancement. The witnesses also cited the National
Nanotechnology  Initiative  as  a  successful  program  that  is  helping
advance the nanotechnology industry.

Also  last  month,  the  President’s  Council  of  Advisors  on  Science
and  Technology,  PCAST,  released  a  report  on  the  state  of  and  the
outlook for technology in the U.S. On the whole, the report is very
encouraging, and I am glad to see that Mr. Floyd Kvamme, the Co-
Chair of PCAST, is one of our witnesses here today. The good news
is  that  the  United  States  still  leads  the  world  by  most  metrics,  in-
cluding  funding,  patents,  and  scientific  publications.  But  I  find  it
troubling  that  other  countries  are  catching  up,  and  not  just  in
funding.  I  hope  we  can  talk  today  about  ways  the  U.S.  can  main-
tain its status as a world leader in these emerging technologies.

I  have  said  it  before.  I  am  not  a  scientist  by  background.  My
minuscule  knowledge  of  nanotechnology,  that  I  guess  pun  is  in-
tended  there—is  a  result  of  preparing  for  hearings  such  as  this,
and  is  driven  by  the  realization  that  this  technology  will  quickly
become as commonplace as the Internet. Nanotechnology is already
changing  the  products  we  use  and  has  the  potential  to  revitalize
our manufacturing base. It promises to impact virtually every field,
with  applications  in  fields  from  energy  to  defense  to  healthcare  to
transportation.

Just yesterday, we rolled out the House Hydrogen and Fuel Cell
Caucus, with the ultimate goal of leading us to a national hydrogen
economy.  I  am  excited  to  hear  that  efforts  are  already  underway
to  use  nanotechnology  to  improve  hydrogen  production,  storage,
and fuel cells. The development of this technology is truly amazing,
and  holds  great  promise.  As  many  of  you  know,  a  hydrogen  econ-
omy  is  an  issue  near  and  dear  to  my  heart,  as  is  the  education  of
our nation’s children in math and science. It is imperative that we
encourage  and  nurture  a  future  generation  of  scientists  to  help  us
maintain  our  prominence  in  nanotechnology  and  in  other  critically
important scientific fields.

That  is  why  today’s  hearing  is  so  important.  As  the  PCAST  re-
port  shows,  the  U.S.  is  currently  ahead  of  the  nanotechnology
curve, but other nations continue to invest more and more time, en-
ergy,  and  money  in  their  nanotechnology  efforts.  If  we  pause  even
to glance over our shoulders, we will see them on the horizon, sev-
eral  of  whom  are  already  on  our  heels  and  pushing  to  take  the
lead.  This  possibility  is  no  small  matter.  Our  last  stronghold  of
competition  is  innovation,  and  the  United  States  can  not  afford  to
lose the lead on this technology.

I  hope  our  witnesses  will  address  our  current
nanotechnology  position,  relative  to  other  countries,  from  an  R&D
perspective and from a business perspective, and discuss where our
greatest  opportunities  for  breakthroughs  are,  and  what  the  poten-
tial  impacts  may  be  in  the  near-term  and  in  the  long-term.  Fur-
thermore,  we  hope  to  hear  what  barriers  exist  to  commercializing

Today, 

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:56 Nov 29, 2005 Jkt 021950 PO 00000 Frm 00018 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\RES05\062905\21950.TXT SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

15

nanotechnology,  how  we  could  overcome  them,  and  the  Federal
Government’s role in the process.

I look forward to hearing each of your testimonies. At this point,

I would recognize Ms. Hooley for an opening statement.
[The prepared statement of Chairman Inglis follows:]

PREPARED STATEMENT OF CHAIRMAN BOB INGLIS

Good  morning,  and  welcome  to  our  second  hearing  on  nanotechnology.  Last
month, the Research Subcommittee heard from experts about examples of successful
partnerships  between  government  and  the  public  and  private  sectors  and  discussed
barriers to future advancement. They also cited the National Nanotechnology Initia-
tive  (NNI)  as  a  successful  program  that  is  helping  advance  the  nanotechnology  in-
dustry.

Also  last  month,  the  President’s  Council  of  Advisors  on  Science  and  Technology
(PCAST)  released  a  report  on  the  state  of,  and  outlook  for,  nanotechnology  in  the
U.S.  On  the  whole,  the  report  is  very  encouraging,  and  am  I  glad  to  see  Mr.  Floyd
Kvamme,  the  Co-Chair  of  PCAST,  as  one  of  our  witnesses  here  today.  The  good
news is that the United States still leads the world by most metrics, including fund-
ing,  patents,  and  scientific  publications.  But  I  find  it  troubling  that  other  countries
are  catching  up,  and  not  just  in  funding.  I  hope  we  can  talk  today  about  ways  the
U.S. can maintain its status as a world leader in these emerging technologies.

I’ve said it before: I’m not a scientist by background. My minuscule knowledge of
nanotechnology (pun intended) is a result of preparing for hearings such as this, and
it  is  driven  by  the  realization  that  this  technology  will  quickly  become  as  common-
place as the Internet. Nanotechnology is already changing the products we use and
has  the  potential  to  revitalize  our  manufacturing  base.  It  promises  to  impact  vir-
tually  every  field-with  applications  in  fields  from  energy  to  defense  to  health  care
to transportation.

Just yesterday, we rolled-out the House Hydrogen and Fuel Cell Caucus, with the
ultimate goal of leading us to a national hydrogen economy. I’m excited to hear that
efforts are already underway to use nanotechnology to improve hydrogen production,
storage  and  fuel  cells.  The  development  of  this  technology  is  truly  amazing  and
holds  great  promise.  As  many  of  you  know,  a  hydrogen  economy  is  an  issue  near
to  my  heart,  as  is  the  education  of  our  nation’s  children  in  math  and  science.  It  is
imperative  that  we  encourage  and  nurture  a  future  generation  of  scientists  to  help
us maintain our prominence in nanotechnology and in other critically important sci-
entific fields.

This is why today’s hearing is so important. As the PCAST report shows, the U.S.
is currently ahead of the nanotechnology curve, but other nations continue to invest
more and more time, energy and money in their nanotechnology efforts. If we pause
even to glance over our shoulders, we will see them on the horizon, several of whom
are  already  on  our  heels  and  pushing  to  take  the  lead.  This  possibility  is  no  small
matter. Our last stronghold of competition is innovation, and the United States can
not afford to lose the lead on this technology.

Today, I hope our witnesses will address our current nanotechnology position rel-
ative to other countries, from an R&D perspective and from a business perspective;
discuss where our greatest opportunities for breakthroughs are and what the poten-
tial  impacts  may  be  in  the  near-term  and  the  long-term.  Furthermore,  we  hope  to
hear  what  barriers  exist  to  commercializing  nanotechnology,  how  we  can  overcome
them, and the Federal Government’s role in the process.

I look forward to hearing your testimony.
Ms. HOOLEY. Today, the Research Subcommittee concludes its re-
view  of  the  National  Nanotechnology  Initiative,  or  NNI,  which  we
began with a hearing on May 18. Just prior to the May 18 hearing,
I was astonished to learn the Administration had prevented the ap-
pearance  of  the  Co-Chair  of  the  President’s  Council  of  Advisors  on
Science  and  Technology,  to  present  the  Council’s  Congressionally
mandated report on NNI.

Subsequently, the Science Committee ably laid out for the White
House  our  objections  to  that  decision.  The  decision  was  reconsid-
ered,  and  I  am  happy  to  say,  reversed,  and  as  a  result  our  wit-

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:56 Nov 29, 2005 Jkt 021950 PO 00000 Frm 00019 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\RES05\062905\21950.TXT SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

16

nesses  this  morning  include  Mr.  Floyd  Kvamme,  who  I  am  ex-
tremely pleased to welcome to the hearing.

We will now be able to hear from a key author of the report that
provides  the  initial  biennial  assessment  of  NNI.  This  assessment
covers  both  the  content  and  the  management  of  this  important  $1
billion per year R&D initiative.

One  aspect  of  the  NNI  of  great  interest  to  me  is  how  the  initia-
tive  helps  to  facilitate  the  commercialization  of  nanotechnology.  In
today’s  testimony,  we  will  see  that  Lux  Research  projects  that
nanotechnology  will  impact  nearly  every  category  of  manufactured
goods  over  the  next  10  years,  becoming  incorporated  into  15  per-
cent  of  global  manufacturing  output,  totaling  $2.6  trillion  in  2014.
We clearly need to ensure that the United States is a major player
in this market, and fares well against strong international competi-
tion.

During the Subcommittee’s May hearing, we heard about invest-
ments  underway  in  the  states  to  advance  nanotechnology,  and  to
foster  the  transition  of  research  results  into  new  products  and  ap-
plications.  For  example,  one  of  our  witnesses,  Dr.  Cassady,  from
Oregon  State  University,  described  the  Oregon  Nanoscience  and
Microtechnologies  Institute,  better  known  as  ONAMI,  which  is  a
collaboration  between  Oregon’s  three  major  research  universities,
federal research agencies, and the state’s thriving high tech sector.
There  was  a  general  consensus  among  the  witnesses  at  the  May
hearing  that  the  Federal  Nanotechnology  Funding  should  include
support for applied, pre-competitive research. I will be interested in
your  views,  Mr.  Kvamme,  and  our  other  panelists,  on  how  we  can
ensure  that  the  Nation  gains  the  full  benefit  of  the  large  federal
basic  research  investment  being  made  in  nanotechnology.  In  par-
ticular, I would like your suggestions on the kinds of activities that
will ensure effective technology transfer to the private sector.

Mr.  Chair,  I  want  to  thank  you  for  calling  this  hearing,  and  I
thank  all  of  our  witnesses  for  appearing  before  the  Subcommittee
today, and I look forward to our discussion.

[The prepared statement of Ms. Hooley follows:]

PREPARED STATEMENT OF REPRESENTATIVE DARLENE HOOLEY

Mr.  Chairman,  today  the  Research  Subcommittee  concludes  its  review  of  the  Na-
tional  Nanotechnology  Initiative,  or  the  NNI,  which  we  began  with  a  hearing  on
May 18th. Just prior to the May hearing, I was astonished to learn that the Admin-
istration  had  prevented  the  appearance  of  the  Co-Chair  of  the  President’s  Council
of Advisors on Science and Technology to present the Council’s congressionally man-
dated report on the NNI.

Subsequently, the Science Committee ably laid out for the White House our objec-
tions  to  that  decision.  The  decision  was  reconsidered,  and  I  am  happy  to  say,  re-
versed. And as a result, our witnesses this morning include Mr. Floyd Kvamme, who
I am extremely pleased to welcome to the hearing. We will now be able to hear from
a key author of the report that provides the initial biennial assessment of the NNI.
This  assessment  covers  both  the  content  and  the  management  of  this  important  $1
billion per year R&D initiative.

One aspect of the NNI of great interest to me is how the initiative helps to facili-
tate the commercialization of nanotechnology. In today’s testimony we see that Lux
Research  projects  that  nanotechnology  will  impact  nearly  every  category  of  manu-
factured good over the next 10 years, becoming incorporated into 15 percent of glob-
al  manufacturing  output  totaling  $2.6  trillion  in  2014.  We  clearly  need  to  ensure
that  the  United  States  is  a  major  player  in  this  market  and  fares  well  against
strong international competition.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:56 Nov 29, 2005 Jkt 021950 PO 00000 Frm 00020 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\RES05\062905\21950.TXT SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

17

During  the  Subcommittee’s  May  hearing,  we  heard  about  investments  underway
in the States to advance nanotechnology and to foster the transition of research re-
sults  into  new  products  and  applications.  For  example,  one  of  our  witnesses,  Dr.
John  M.  Cassady  from  Oregon  State  University,  described  the  Oregon  Nanoscience
and  Microtechnologies  Institute.  ONAMI  is  a  collaboration  between  Oregon’s  three
major research universities, federal research agencies, and the state’s thriving high-
tech sector.

There  was  a  general  consensus  among  the  witness  at  the  May  hearing  that  fed-
eral  nanotechnology  funding  should  include  support  for  applied,  pre-competitive  re-
search.  I  will  be  interested  in  the  views  of  Mr.  Kvamme  and  our  other  panelists
today on how we can ensure that the Nation gains the full benefit of the large fed-
eral basic research investment being made in nanotechnology. In particular, I would
like your suggestions on the kinds of activities that will ensure effective technology
transfer to the private sector.

Mr.  Chairman,  I  want  to  thank  you  for  calling  this  hearing  and  thank  our  wit-
nesses  for  appearing  before  the  Subcommittee  today.  I  look  forward  to  our  discus-
sion.

Chairman  INGLIS.  Thank  you,  Ms.  Hooley.  Other  Members,  we
would  be  pleased  to  receive  opening  statements  for  the  record,  if
you  would  like  to  submit  them,  so  that  we  can  get  right  to  our
panel, and let me introduce them.

[The prepared statement of Mr. Carnahan follows:]

PREPARED STATEMENT OF REPRESENTATIVE RUSS CARNAHAN

Mr.  Chairman  and  Ms.  Ranking  Member,  thank  you  for  holding  this  important

and very interesting hearing.

I  am  especially  pleased  to  revisit  the  role  our  country  has  in  the  nanotechnology
field  in  light  of  The  National  Nanotechnology  Initiative  five-year  assessment  and
recommendations release.

Nanotechnology  has  the  promise  of  allowing  scientists  to  control  matter  on  every
length  scale,  including  materials  in  the  range  of  one  to  100  nanometers.  Science  is
allowing  us  to  control  material  behavior  by  altering  structures  at  the  level  of  one
billionth of a meter.

The field includes three main categories of promise, materials and manufacturing,
information  technology  and  medicine.  I  am  most  eager  to  see  what  this  technology
can do for our nation’s health and am hopeful that the utilization of nanotechnology
will someday positively affect our economy and job market.

Thank  you  for  your  willingness  to  join  us,  Mr.  Kvamme,  Mr.  O’Connor,  Mr.

Murdock and Mr. Nordan. I am eager to hear your testimony. Thank you.

[The prepared statement of Ms. Johnson follows:]

PREPARED STATEMENT OF REPRESENTATIVE EDDIE BERNICE JOHNSON

I  want  to  thank  Chairman  Inglis  and  Ranking  Member  Hooley  for  bringing  the
issue of nanotechnology before the Subcommittee today. I appreciate their continued
leadership on this issue.

Experts  believe  that  nanotechnology  could  have  an  impact  on  our  economy  and
society as significant as the impact of the steam engine, electricity, the Internet, and
the  computer  chip.  Researchers  and  high-tech  start-ups  have  already  identified
many  potential  benefits  and  applications  of  nanotechnology  in  health,  energy  and
the  environment,  information  and  communications  technology,  advanced  materials,
manufacturing,  and  national  security.  It  is  possible  that  nanotechnology  could  lead
to solar energy that is competitive with fossil fuels.

Medical researchers are already working on using nanotechnology to develop tools
for  the  diagnosis  and  therapy  of  cancer.  I  am  proud  to  say  that  Texas  is  playing
a leading role in the development of nanotechnology.

Texas  is  at  the  center  of  the  impending  nanotechnology  revolution.  Four  of  the
twenty-one Texas universities (Rice University and the Universities of Texas in Aus-
tin, Arlington and Dallas) involved with nanotechnology research programs have al-
ready developed nanotechnology-specific research centers.

University  of  Texas  Southwestern  Medical  School  in  Dallas  is  the  only  medical
school  in  the  world  where  four  Nobel  Laureates  are  actively  involved  in  research.
The  center  of  the  world’s  telecommunications  industry  is  in  Richardson,  a  Dallas
suburb, known as Telecom Corridor. The Dallas and Austin regions are focal points

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:56 Nov 29, 2005 Jkt 021950 PO 00000 Frm 00021 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\RES05\062905\21950.TXT SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

for the semiconductor industry in Texas. More silicon wafers are produced in Texas
than in any other U.S. state except California.

18

I  urge  my  colleagues  to  continue  to  pay  attention  to  nanotechnology  after  this
hearing  and  I  hope  that  the  Administration  and  the  Congress  can  look  for  ways  to
build  on  and  strengthen  the  nanotechnology  research.  With  this  committee  leader-
ship,  we  can  work  is  in  the  direction  of  creating  a  brighter  and  more  prosperous
future  for  all  Americans.  I  look  forward  to  continue  working  with  my  colleagues  on
both  sides  of  the  aisle  to  ensure  the  full  development  of  this  important  initiative.
Chairman  INGLIS.  Each  of  you  will  have  five  minutes  to  speak
and  then  we  will  follow  that  with  a  period  of  questions  from  the
Members here.

Mr.  Floyd  Kvamme  is  the  Co-Chair  of  the  President’s  Council  of
Advisors  on  Science  and  Technology,  the  PCAST  organization  that
I just mentioned. Mr. Matthew Nordan is the Vice President of Re-
search for Lux Research, Inc. Very happy to have you with us. Mr.
Sean  Murdock  is  the  Executive  Director  of  the  NanoBusiness  Alli-
ance. Mr. Jim O’Connor is the Vice President of Technology Incuba-
tion and Commercialization at Motorola, Inc.

Mr.  Kvamme,  if  you  would  start  us,  and  we  will  recognize  you
for  five  minutes,  and  then,  we  will  go  down  the  panel.  Thank  you.

If you would push that button. Thank you.
Mr. KVAMME. Missed that.
Ms. HOOLEY. We don’t have nanotechnology here.
Chairman INGLIS. It is not voice activated.

STATEMENT OF E. FLOYD KVAMME, CO-CHAIR, PRESIDENT’S

COUNCIL OF ADVISORS ON SCIENCE AND TECHNOLOGY

Mr.  KVAMME.  My  name  is  Floyd  Kvamme,  and  I  am  here  in  my
capacity  as  Co-Chair  of  the  President’s  Council  of  Advisors  on
Science and Technology, or PCAST, which the President designated
as  the  National  Nanotechnology  Advisory  Panel,  or  NNAP,  called
for  by  the  legislation  that  the  Science  Committee  passed  and  the
President signed in late 2003.

In the first periodic—in that report, the approach that the panel
took,  based  on  the  requirements  of  the  Act,  was  to  ask  four  basic
questions  that  we  felt  the  President,  the  Congress,  and  the  Amer-
ican public wanted to hear.

First,  where  do  we  stand,  or  how  does  our  competitive  position
in  nanotechnology  R&D  stack  up  relative  to  other  countries?  Sec-
ond, is the NNI money well spent, and the program well managed?
Third, are we addressing societal concerns and potential risks? And
four,  how  can  we  do  better,  or  how  can  we  strengthen  the  U.S.
nanotechnology effort?

During  the  review  process,  PCAST  convened  panels,  met  with
members  of  the  Nanoscale  Science  Engineering  and  Technology
Subcommittee  of  the  National  Science  and  Technology  Council,  at-
tended  NNI  workshops,  and  consulted  individually  with  research-
ers across the United States and around the world.

In  addition,  a  particularly  valuable  resource  was  our  technical
advisory group, or TAG—some 45 nanotechnology experts who pro-
vided  input  and  feedback  from  a  technical  perspective  on  the  var-
ious  aspects  of  nanotechnology  and  the  NNI.  Because  the  focus  of
this  hearing  is  on  the  U.S.  competitiveness  in  nanotechnology,  I
will concentrate my remarks on the first of these questions, ‘‘where

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:56 Nov 29, 2005 Jkt 021950 PO 00000 Frm 00022 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\RES05\062905\21950.TXT SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

19

do  we  stand?’’  and  on  our  recommendations  for  improving  the  pro-
gram.

Regarding  the  other  two  questions,  the  NNAP  members  gen-
erally feel that the federal funding for nanotechnology research and
development  is  money  very  well  spent,  and  that  the  program  is
well managed. Likewise, the NNAP concludes that the NNI is tak-
ing  appropriate  steps  to  understand  and  address  societal  concerns
and potential risks. For more details about the NNAP’s assessment
in these areas, please see my written testimony, or the report itself,
or I would be happy to answer questions.

So, where do we stand? The metrics that we used to compare the
U.S.  position  in  nanotechnology  with  that  of  other  countries  were
R&D  spending,  a  measure  of  input,  and  percentage  of  patents  and
publications, a measure of output. We found, from the data we sur-
veyed,  that  today,  the  U.S.  is  the  leader  in  nanotechnology  R&D.
The  approximately  $1  billion  in  annual  federal  funding  is  roughly
one-quarter  of  the  current  global  investment  by  all  nations.  More-
over, many comparisons of international investments do not report
total R&D spending; that is, not only federal but also state and pri-
vate  funding.  When  all  public  and  private  funding  is  considered,
the  U.S.  is  funding  approximately  $3  billion,  or  one-third  of  the
nearly  $9  billion  in  total  worldwide  spending  for  what  is  classified
as nanotechnology R&D.

In the United States, states have been particularly active in pro-
moting  nanotechnology  R&D,  investing  an  estimated  $400  million
in  2004  alone.  The  U.S.  also 
the  number  of
nanotechnology-based  startup  companies,  and  in  research  output,
as  measured  by  U.S.  patents  and  publications.  However,  other
countries  are  aggressively  chasing  the  U.S.  leadership  position  by
increasing  support  for  coordinated  national  programs,  and  in  some
cases,  by  focusing  investments  in  areas  of  existing  national  eco-
nomic  strength.  For  example,  many  Asian  countries  are  investing
heavily in nanoelectronics.

So, how can we do better? The NNAP report makes a number of
recommendations.  I  will  mention  four  here.  First,  the  NNI  should
increase  its  outreach  to  facilitate  tech  transfer  and  commercializa-
tion.  State  and  regional  entities  are  directing  considerable  funding
toward  nanotechnologies.  Examples  of  state  nanotechnology  initia-
tives 
the  Oregon
Nanoscience  and  Microtechnologies  Institute  that  has  just  been
mentioned,  South  Carolina’s  Nanocenter,  and  others  from  Cali-
fornia,  Texas,  Pennsylvania,  Illinois  and  many  other  states,  all  of
which are very active in supporting nanotechnology-based economic
development.

include  New  York’s  Albany  Nanocenter, 

While  the  NNI  has  begun  to  reach  out  to  the  states,  and  has
begun an organized program of outreach to other, to various indus-
tries, more outreach will leverage the federal investment, and com-
plement those NNI activities already underway with various indus-
trial  sectors,  many  of  which  appear  anxious  to  pull  technology  de-
velopments from the federal research activity.

Second,  as  mentioned  above,  we  recommend  that  the  NNI  con-
tinue  its  efforts  to  understand  the  possible  toxicological  effects  of
nanotechnology.  While  it  appears  that  the  public  and  environment
are  adequately  protected  through  existing  regulatory  authorities,

leads 

in 

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:56 Nov 29, 2005 Jkt 021950 PO 00000 Frm 00023 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\RES05\062905\21950.TXT SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

20

the NNAP encourages continued research into possible toxicological
effects  in  the  workplace,  and  urges  regulatory  agency  cooperation
to ensure that any policies based on best science, are based on best
science, not perceived fears, and are consistent among the agencies.
The  NNAP  also  recommends  coordinating  and  sharing  environ-
mental  health  and  safety  research  results  internationally,  and
working  with  international  entities  to  ensure  that  efforts  are  not
duplicated and information is shared widely.

Third,  in  accordance  with  the  Act,  the  agency  group  that  coordi-
nate  the  NNI  has  identified  seven  program  component  areas,
PCAs, that generally follow the broad categories of foundational re-
search  being  conducted  today.  The  PCAs  represent  areas  in  which
ongoing  and  coordinated  investment,  across  multiple  agencies,  will
be required to support the development of the many anticipated ap-
plications  of  nanotechnology.  The  NNAP  recommends  that  these
PCAs  be  regularly  reexamined  and  adjusted  as  necessary  to  track
the  developments  in  nanotechnology  R&D.  We  cannot  know  where
the state of nanotechnology will be 10 years from now, but we can
be  fairly  certain  it  will  be  considerably  different  than  what  exists
today. Flexibilities in these definitions are essential.

Lastly, any look at nanotechnology or technology development in
general  highlights  the  need  for  a  more  technically  trained  work-
force. A separate, recent PCAST study focused on this subject. En-
couraging our young people to pursue technical degrees so that we
have a rich mix of technically trained people throughout our society
will be a requirement for success in a world increasingly driven by
technical advances.

In  conclusion,  I  am  personally  excited  about  the  continual  flow
of  new  discoveries  and  revolutionary  opportunities  made  possible
by nanotechnology R&D, but while all of us would like to see rapid
commercialization  of  nanotechnology  research,  our  panel  feels
strongly that the NNI must have, as its primary focus, the develop-
ment  of  and  understanding  through  research  and  development  of
the novel properties that occur at the nanoscale, and the ability to
control matter at the atomic and molecular level.

While  we  all  want  the  U.S.  to  benefit  economically  from
nanotechnology as quickly as possible, it is critically important that
the basic intellectual property surrounding nanotechnology be gen-
erated  and  protected  within  this  country.  Those  who  hold  this
knowledge  and  have  the  workforce  to  exploit  it  will  own  commer-
cialization in the future.

Mr.  Chairman,  I  appreciate  the  work  and  support  of  this  com-
mittee for nanotechnology R&D, and look forward to continued dia-
logue with you on this important subject.

[The prepared statement of Mr. Kvamme follows:]
PREPARED STATEMENT OF E. FLOYD KVAMME

Introduction

Mr.  Chairman  and  Members  of  the  Committee,  it  is  a  pleasure  and  an  honor  for
me  to  testify  to  you  today  regarding  the  National  Nanotechnology  Initiative  (NNI)
and  general  competitive  position  of  United  States  in  nanotechnology.  My  name  is
Floyd  Kvamme  and  I  am  a  Partner  at  Kleiner  Perkins  Caufield  &  Byers,  a  high
technology venture capital firm located in Silicon Valley. That is my full time occu-
pation.  I  was  also  honored  to  be  asked,  and  accepted  an  invitation,  by  President
George  W.  Bush  in  2001  to  co-chair  his  science  and  technology  advisory  group,  the
President’s  Council  of  Advisors  on  Science  and  Technology  (PCAST).  The  PCAST  is

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:56 Nov 29, 2005 Jkt 021950 PO 00000 Frm 00024 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\RES05\062905\21950.TXT SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

21

a  group  of  non-government  advisors  comprising  some  two  dozen  senior  representa-
tives, appointed by the President, and drawn from industry, education, and research
institutions, and other non-governmental organizations. The President’s Science Ad-
visor,  the  Director  of  the  Office  of  Science  and  Technology  Policy  (OSTP)  Jack
Marburger, co-chairs the PCAST along with me.
Potential of Nanotechnology

‘‘Nanotechnology’’  touches  upon  a  broad  array  of  disciplines,  including  chemistry,
biology, physics, computational science, and engineering. And like information tech-
nology,  nanotechnology  has  the  potential  to  impact  virtually  every  industry,  from
aerospace  and  energy  to  health  care  and  agriculture.  Based  on  the  ability  to  see,
measure,  and  manipulate  matter  at  the  scale  of  atoms  and  molecules,
nanotechnology was born, in many ways, with the advent of atomic force microscopy
in  the  mid-1980s.  Today  many  industries  such  as  those  based  on  semi-conductors
and  chemicals  already  are  creating  products  with  enhanced  performance  based  on
components and materials with nanosized features.

Nanotechnology  today  reminds  me  very  much  of  the  early  days  of  the  semicon-
ductor industry. The new interdisciplinary relationships being forged and the sense
of excitement over future possibilities are very reminiscent of that earlier period.

As  with  semiconductors,  future  application  of  nanotechnology  based  on  evolving
research  could  have  significant  impact  throughout  the  world.  Examples  where
nanotechnology  has  the  potential  to  vastly  improve  standards  of  living  in  industri-
alized  and  developing  nations  include:  medical  applications,  clean  water,  and  en-
ergy. In our report, we highlight some key research in these areas. In medical appli-
cations,  for  example,  nanotechnology  has  made  possible  the  creation  of  a  synthetic
bone  replacement  material  that  is  highly  biocompatible  and  allows  bones  to  heal
faster  and  more  completely  than  the  materials  that  are  used  today.  In  the  area  of
energy  efficiency,  researchers  at  Sandia  Laboratories  have  demonstrated  a  light
source  that  mixes  different  sized  ‘‘quantum  dots’’  to  create  high-efficiency  white
‘‘light emitting diodes’’ that use about one-tenth as much energy as an incandescent
bulb  and  that  could  reduce  by  more  than  half  the  amount  of  electricity  used  for
lighting  nationwide.  Finally,  researchers  at  Lawrence  Livermore  National  Labora-
tory  are  nanoengineering  membrane  systems  that  can  target  and  remove  contami-
nants in water, while reducing treatment costs by at least half compared to conven-
tional  technologies.  Low-cost  clean  water  technologies  have  obvious  application  in
remediation  of  contaminated  groundwater  and  treating  industrial  waste,  as  well  as
significant potential to help improve public health in developing nations.

The  early  recognition  of  the  broad  range  of  useful  and  powerful  nanotechnology
applications led to the formal establishment of a National Nanotechnology Initiative
(NNI) in Fiscal Year (FY) 2001. Due to its potential to promote innovation and eco-
nomic benefits, to address the needs of the Federal agencies, as well as to strength-
en  the  position  of  the  United  States  as  a  leader  in  science  and  technology,  the  Ad-
ministration  has  identified  nanotechnology  as  a  top  research  and  development
(R&D) priority for the past several years.
History of PCAST’s Involvement with Nanotechnology

The history of PCAST’s involvement with the NNI extends back to 1999 when the
analogous  body  under  the  previous  Administration  supported  a  proposal  for  estab-
lishing  an  interagency  nanotechnology  initiative.  In  their  letter  to  the  President,
they included a recommendation that ‘‘the progress toward NNI goals be monitored
annually by an appropriate external body of experts, such as the National Research
Council.’’  In  part  based  on  this  recommendation,  the  National  Research  Council
(NRC) was commissioned to do a study of the NNI, which was released in 2002. The
first  of  that  study’s  ten  recommendations  was  that  OSTP  establish  an  independent
standing  nanoscience  and  nanotechnology  advisory  board  to  provide  advice  to  the
Nanoscale  Science,  Engineering,  and  Technology  (NSET)  Subcommittee  (the  inter-
agency  body  that  coordinates  the  NNI)  on  policy,  strategy,  goals,  and  management.
The  President’s  FY  2004  Budget,  released  in  February  2003,  acknowledged  the
NRC’s  recommendation  for  external  review,  and  directed  PCAST  to  conduct  an  as-
sessment  and  provide  advice  regarding  the  strategic  direction  of  the  NNI  program.
PCAST began this task shortly thereafter.
The 21st Century Nanotechnology Research and Development (R&D) Act

As PCAST was undertaking its review of the NNI, this subcommittee and its Sen-
ate counterpart were also in the midst of creating new legislation that would make
statutory the activities and organization of the NNI, along with periodic reviews and
other aspects of this vital R&D effort. The requirement for an ongoing outside advi-
sory  panel  was  ratified  by  Congress  in  the  21st  Century  Nanotechnology  Research
and  Development  Act  of  2003  (Public  Law  108–153;  hereafter  referred  to  as  ‘‘the

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:56 Nov 29, 2005 Jkt 021950 PO 00000 Frm 00025 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\RES05\062905\21950.TXT SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

22

Act’’),  which  called  for  the  President  to  establish  or  designate  a  National
Nanotechnology Advisory Panel (NNAP). PCAST’s role was reaffirmed when, in July
2004 by Executive Order, the President formally designated PCAST to fulfill the du-
ties  of  the  NNAP.  The  order  amended  the  original  Executive  Order  commissioning
PCAST,  thus  establishing  that  nanotechnology  should  be  included  in  the  formal
PCAST charter.

As  detailed  by  Congress  in  Section  4,  the  Act  calls  upon  the  NNAP  to  assess  the

national nanotechnology program in the following areas:

• Trends and developments in nanotechnology
• Progress in implementing the program
• The need to revise the program
• Balance among the component areas of the program, including funding levels
• Whether  program  component  areas,  priorities,  and  technical  goals  developed
• Management, coordination, implementation, and activities of the program
• Whether social, ethical, legal, environmental, and workforce concerns are ade-

by the NSET Subcommittee are helping to maintain U.S. leadership

quately addressed by the program.

The  Act  requires  the  NNAP  to  report  on  its  assessments  and  to  make  rec-
ommendations  for  ways  to  improve  the  program  at  least  every  two  years.  The  first
such  report  provided  by  PCAST  in  its  role  as  the  NNAP  is  now  complete  and  was
delivered  to  this  subcommittee  at  the  hearing  that  was  held  on  May  18th.  The  re-
mainder  of  my  testimony  will  focus  on  this  report  and  the  observations  and  rec-
ommendations contained therein. Also, because PCAST was designated as the statu-
torily  mandated  NNAP,  from  this  point  forward  in  my  testimony  I  will  refer  to
PCAST as the NNAP.
Technical Advisory Group

Before getting into the specifics of the report, I’d like to highlight a resource that
our panel relied on during the course of the review in order to augment the NNAP’s
expertise in managing large R&D programs with more specific nanotechnology tech-
nical  expertise.  Early  in  our  review,  the  NNAP  identified  a  Technical  Advisory
Group  (TAG)  comprising  approximately  45  nanotechnology  experts  who  represent
diverse  disciplines  and  sectors  across  academia  and  industry.  The  TAG  is  a  knowl-
edgeable  resource,  providing  input  and  feedback  with  a  more  technical  perspective.
The NNAP called upon its TAG on several occasions for broader expert opinions on
various  topics.  Two  particular  areas  where  the  TAG  was  very  helpful  were  in  re-
viewing  and  providing  feedback  on  the  NNI  Strategic  Plan  and  in  helping  to  illu-
minate  and  rationalize 
in
nanotechnology  research  over  the  short-,  medium-  and  long-term.  Input  from  the
TAG  has  been  considered  and  is  represented  in  the  report  you  have  before  you
today.
NNAP Report

for  the  NNAP  some  of  the  key  opportunities 

The  approach  we  took  during  our  first  assessment  of  the  NNI  was  to  ask  some
basic  questions  that  encompass  the  requirements  of  the  Act  and  that  we  perceived
to  be  the  most  pressing  questions  the  President,  the  Congress  and  the  American
public wanted answers to. These were:

• Where  do  we  stand?  In  other  words,  how  does  our  competitive  position  in

nanotechnology R&D stack up relative to other countries?

• Is this money well spent and the program well managed?  This  encom-

passes the general request for an external assessment of the NNI.

• Are  we  addressing  societal  concerns  and  potential  risks?  Responding
to specific Congressional and public concerns, are we paying close enough at-
tention  to  environmental,  health  and  safety  risks  and  other  societal  issues?
• How can we do better? What does the NNAP recommend that will help the

U.S. strengthen its nanotechnology effort?

I  will  summarize  our  assessment  and  recommendations,  and  recommend  to  the

committee our full report for a more thorough review of these issues.
Where do we stand?

In  attempting  to  compare  the  strength  of  the  U.S.  nanotechnology  effort  inter-
nationally, the NNAP reviewed a number of metrics that our members felt were ap-
propriate  for  assessing  the  competitive  position  of  the  U.S.  in  this  new  technology
area where research and technology discoveries in many cases have yet to reach the

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:56 Nov 29, 2005 Jkt 021950 PO 00000 Frm 00026 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\RES05\062905\21950.TXT SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

23

marketplace. We looked at available data for levels of international R&D investment
by  governments  (including  Federal,  regional,  State,  and  local),  as  well  as  private
corporations and venture capital firms. We also surveyed data on patent and publi-
cation trends to assess commercial interest and strength of research findings among
various countries that are active in nanotechnology.

The  data  surveyed  indicate  that,  today,  the  United  States  is  the  leader  in
nanotechnology  R&D.  The  approximately  $1  billion  annual  Federal  Government
funding for nanotechnology R&D is roughly one-quarter of the current global invest-
ment by all nations. Total annual U.S. R&D spending—including federal, State, and
private  funding—now  stands  at  approximately  $3  billion,  one-third  of  the  approxi-
mately  $9  billion  in  total  worldwide  spending  by  the  public  and  private  sectors.  It
is noteworthy that State, local and regional governments have been particularly ac-
tive  in  promoting  nanotechnology  development,  investing  $400  million  in  2004  ac-
cording  to  one  estimate.1 In  addition,  the  United  States  leads  in  the  number  of
start-up  companies  based  on  nanotechnology,  and  in  research  output  as  measured
by patents and publications.

However,  the  data  also  show  that  other  countries  are  aggressively  chasing  this
leadership  position,  both  in  terms  of  ramping  up  coordinated  national  programs—
many of which are modeled directly on the NNI—as well as in focusing investments
to  areas  of  existing  national  economic  strength.  For  example,  many  of  the  Asian
countries are investing heavily in nanoelectronics. Further, the U.S. lead in publica-
tions  and  patents  appears  to  be  slipping.  Increased  international  activity  is  result-
ing  in  increased  competitive  pressure  from  other  nations  and,  in  the  opinion  of  the
NNAP,  an  increased  urgency  that  the  U.S.  continues  its  focus  on  nanotechnology
R&D excellence.
Is this money well spent and the program well managed?

Chapter  2  of  the  report  provides  an  assessment  of  the  NNI  program  and  its  ac-
complishments.  The  NNAP  also  evaluated  the  Administration’s  recently  released
Strategic  Plan  and  the  mechanisms  in  place  to  manage  the  program.  The  NNAP
concludes that the money the United States is investing in nanotechnology is money
very  well  spent,  and  that  continued  robust  funding  is  important  for  the  Nation’s
long-term economic well-being and national security.

Nanotechnology holds tremendous potential for stimulating innovation and there-
by  enabling  or  maintaining  U.S.  leadership  in  industries  that  span  all  sectors.  The
NNAP  concludes  that  the  strategic  focus  of  the  NNI  on  expanding  knowledge  of
nanoscale  phenomena  and  on  discovery  of  nanoscale  and  nanostructured  materials,
devices, and systems, along with building an infrastructure to support such studies,
has been both appropriate and wise. The NNI has accomplished much already—ad-
vancing  foundational  knowledge,  promoting  technology  transfer  for  commercial  and
public  benefit,  developing  an  infrastructure  of  user  facilities  and  instrumentation,
and taking steps to address societal concerns—and we believe the economic pay-offs
over the long-term should be substantial.

The  NNAP  commends  the  NNI  in  particular  for  making  the  long-term  commit-
ment to nanotechnology R&D through the establishment of a geographically distrib-
uted suite of centers of excellence and broadly available user facilities. Largely uni-
versity-based,  the  centers  provide  education  of  skilled  scientists  and  engineers  as
well  as  serving  as  focal  points  of  multi-disciplinary  R&D  and,  hopefully,  new  eco-
nomic  opportunities  that  are  geographically  dispersed.  User  facilities,  such  as  the
five  Department  of  Energy  Nanoscale  Science  Research  Centers,  provide  access  for
all  researchers 
for  advanced
nanotechnology R&D. Staff at the Center for Nanophase Materials Sciences at Oak
Ridge  National  Laboratory  in  Tennessee—the  first  of  the  DOE  centers  to  become
fully operational—are currently installing equipment and hiring additional research-
ers.

to  state-of-the-art  equipment  and  expertise 

At  this  time,  the  NNI  appears  well  positioned  to  maintain  United  States  leader-
ship  going  forward,  through  both  its  coordinated  interagency  approach  to  planning
and  implementing  the  Federal  R&D  program  and  its  efforts  to  interact  with  indus-
try  and  the  public.  This  approach  is  clearly  outlined  in  the  recently  released  NNI
Strategic  Plan,  which  spells  out  the  goals  and  priorities  for  the  initiative  for  the
next  five  to  10  years.  The  NNAP  surveyed  the  TAG  to  augment  our  review  of  this
Plan,  and  we  believe  it  provides  an  appropriate  way  to  organize  and  manage  the
program,  and  that  the  goals  and  priorities  outlined  in  the  Plan  are  likewise  appro-
priate.

1 Lux Research, Inc. 2005. Statement of Findings: Benchmarking U.S. States in Nanotech. New

York: Lux Research, Inc.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:56 Nov 29, 2005 Jkt 021950 PO 00000 Frm 00027 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\RES05\062905\21950.TXT SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

24

There  are  a  number  of  cautionary  notes  and  minor  recommendations  contained
in  our  report,  which  I  will  detail  in  a  few  minutes  when  I  discuss  how  we  can  do
better, and I would be happy to answer any other questions on items I may not have
covered  in  my  testimony.  However,  overall  I  think  I  can  safely  say  that  the  NNAP
endorses current funding and management of the NNI and believes the strategic di-
rection of the program is sound at this point.
Are we addressing societal concerns and potential risks?

The  NNAP  believes  that  the  societal  implications  of  nanotechnology—including
environmental  and  health  effects—must  be  taken  into  account  simultaneously  with
the  scientific  advances  being  underwritten  by  the  Federal  Government.  In  its  re-
view,  the  Panel  found  that  the  NNI  does  recognize  this,  and  is  moving  deliberately
to  identify,  prioritize,  and  address  these  concerns.  The  NNI  and  NNCO  are  more
organized on this front than when the PCAST first began its review of the NNI two
years  ago.  Because,  as  many  members  of  the  Congress  and  this  committee  have
rightly  pointed  out,  addressing  risks  and  societal  concerns  is  so  important,  the
NNAP placed special emphasis on this topic, and will continue to do so.

In  order  to  gain  insight  into  environmental,  health,  and  safety  issues  around
nanotechnology, the NNAP convened a panel of experts from Government regulatory
agencies,  academia,  and  the  private  sector.  Based  on  this  panel  discussion,  as  well
as  on  information  received  from  the  NSET  Subcommittee  and  its  TAG,  the  NNAP
believes  that  potential  risks  do  exist  and  that  the  Government  is  directing  appro-
priate attention and adequate resources to the research that will ensure the protec-
tion  of  the  public  and  the  environment.  The  NNAP  is  particularly  pleased  that
strong communication exists among the agencies that fund nanotechnology research
and  those  responsible  for  regulatory  decision-making.  The  pertinent  government
agencies  are  devoting  more  attention  and  resources  toward  these  issues  than  most
people may realize.

In  addition  to  research  into  issues  related  to  environmental,  health,  and  safety
effects of nanotechnology, the NNI’s diverse and growing R&D program is exploring
other  societal  issues  such  as  economic,  workforce,  and  ethical  impacts.  The  NNAP
believes  that  understanding  the  impact  of  a  new  technology  on  society  is  vital  to
ensuring  that  development  takes  place  in  a  responsible  manner.  The  NNAP  is
pleased  with  the  level  of  discourse  on  societal  issues  and  believes  these  efforts
should continue.

In  addition,  communication  with  the  various  stakeholders,  including  the  public,
on these topics is an important element of the program. Therefore, we were pleased
that  the  interagency  group  managing  the  NNI  established  a  new  subgroup  to  ad-
dress the topic of public engagement.

One  societal  issue  that  I  would  say  has  engendered  the  most  lingering  concern
for  the  NNAP  during  this  review  is  one  which  also  affects  the  broader  science  and
technology enterprise and about which PCAST has previously studied and reported.
That  is,  the  health  of  science  education  in  the  U.S.  and  the  projected  shortage  of
a  qualified  science  and  technology  workforce.  The  future  economic  prosperity  of  the
United States will depend on a workforce that both is large enough and has the nec-
essary  skills  to  meet  the  challenges  being  posed  by  global  competition.  This  will  be
especially  important  in  allowing  the  United  States  to  maintain  its  leadership  role
in  nanotechnology  and  the  industries  that  will  use  nanotechnology.  The  NNI  has
launched  a  range  of  education-related  programs  appropriate  for  classrooms  at  all
levels  and  across  the  country,  along  with  other  programs  that  are  aimed  at  the
broader public. While the NNI cannot be expected to solve the Nation’s science edu-
cation  problems  single-handedly,  the  NNAP  believes  that  NNI  activities  can  help
improve  science  education  and  attract  more  bright  young  minds  into  careers  in
science  and  engineering.  The  issue  of  science  education  in  the  U.S.  is  one  about
which the PCAST feels strongly, and I would direct you to our previous report, ‘‘Sus-
taining the Nation’s Innovation Ecosystem: Maintaining the Strength of Our Science
and  Engineering  Capabilities’’  for  more  information  and  for  our  views  on  this  issue
generally.
How can we do better?

This  chapter  of  our  report  presents  NNAP  recommendations  for  how  we  feel  the
NNI  program  can  be  strengthened  and  improved.  I  will  describe  briefly  the  areas
in  which  our  recommendations  are  principally  focused,  and  would  be  happy  to  an-
swer questions about these and any of the other recommendations in our report.

Technology Transfer: The issue of facilitating the transfer of technology from gov-
ernment labs or universities into the marketplace is a subject that I know this com-
mittee  has  been  interested  in  and  which  generates  a  significant  amount  of  discus-
sion.  In  the  case  of  nanotechnology,  the  level  of  interest  and  investment  across

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:56 Nov 29, 2005 Jkt 021950 PO 00000 Frm 00028 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\RES05\062905\21950.TXT SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

25

many  industrial  sectors  is  growing  and  will  likely  outpace  Government  investment
in  the  United  States  soon,  if  it  hasn’t  already.  In  our  report,  the  NNAP  recognizes
and  applauds  current  efforts  to  promote  technology  transfer,  such  as  ongoing  dia-
logues between the NNI and various industries and recent efforts by research agen-
cies to direct Small Business Innovative Research (SBIR) and Small Business Tech-
nology  Transfer  (STTR)  contracts  toward  nanotechnology  projects.  However,  the
NNAP also believes there are additional steps the NNI should take to further com-
municate  with  and  establish  links  to  U.S.  industry  in  order  to  facilitate  technology
transfer from the lab to the marketplace.

The  NNAP  calls  out  two  particular  areas  that  could  augment  the  existing  suite
of  activities  and  enhance  commercialization  of  research  results.  The  first  of  these
is increasing NNI’s outreach to the States, which, as previously noted, are directing
considerable  funding  toward  nanotechnology  projects.  The  NNAP  believes  that
greater  federal-State  interaction  can  leverage  the  investments  and  competencies  of
both.  States,  in  particular,  have  a  strong  interest  in  and  capacity  for  stimulating
economic development and commercial activity.

A  notable  example  of  State  activity  is  Albany  NanoTech,  home  to  five  R&D  cen-
ters and the College of Nanoscale Sciences and Engineering at the State University
of  New  York  (SUNY)  Albany.  As  you  heard  in  testimony  by  Mr.  Michael  Fancher
at  the  May  18th  hearing  that  you  convened,  Albany  NanoTech  has  attracted  over
$1  billion  in  private  investment  and  has  over  100  partnerships  with  other  univer-
sities, federal labs, and industry. Programs in nanoelectronics have led to close rela-
tionships  with  major  electronics  firms  such  as  IBM,  ASML,  Tokyo  Electron  and
International Sematech.

Oregon  is  another  state  that  has  developed  a  nanotechnology  initiative  and  com-
mitted  state  funds  to  support  infrastructure  development  for  Oregon’s  Nanoscience
and  Microtechnologies  Institute.  The  University  of  South  Carolina  has  invested  in
the  creation  of  the  USC  NanoCenter  to  serve  as  a  focal  point  for  the  University’s
nanotechnology research, to foster multi-disciplinary research and education efforts,
and  to  promote  economic  development.  South  Carolina’s  NanoCenter  has  developed
a special emphasis on creating dialogue concerning the societal and ethical implica-
tions of nanotechnology. These are a few examples of specific state and regional ac-
tivities. Obviously, there are others, including states like California, Texas and Illi-
nois, all of which are very active in supporting technology clusters to spur economic
development.

The  NNI  has  begun  to  reach  out  and  understand  what  the  states  are  doing,  as
evidenced  in  workshop  on  Regional,  State,  and  Local  Nanotechnology  Initiatives
held in late 2003. The NNAP encourages more outreach to the States to help lever-
age the federal investment. Such efforts would complement those NNI activities al-
ready underway with various industrial sectors. The NNAP believes the States per-
form a vital role in fostering economic development through business assistance pro-
grams,  tax  incentives,  and  other  means.  The  NNAP  believes  that  practical  applica-
tion of NNI-funded research results, workforce development, and other national ben-
efits will increase with improved federal-State coordination.

A  second,  related  effort  is  the  development  of  improved  knowledge  management
of NNI assets. Funding for the NNI to date has resulted in a vast network of assets
that  should,  through  proper  management,  be  available  to  outside  researchers  and
other  private  interests.  The  NNAP  recommends  the  NNI  focus  on  improving  access
to  its  knowledge  assets—including  user  facilities  and  instrumentation  available  to
outside  researchers,  research  results,  and  derivative  intellectual  property.  Through
mechanisms such as publicly available and searchable databases, the NNI can—and
should—improve infrastructure utilization and the transfer of technology to the pri-
vate sector.

While the NNAP agrees that ultimate commercialization of nanotechnology is de-
sirable  and  to  be  supported,  I  do  want  to  emphasize  that  the  Panel  feels  strongly
that the NNI must remain mindful of its primary focus toward developing an under-
standing,  through  research  and  development,  of  the  novel  properties  that  occur  at
the  nanoscale  and  the  ability  to  control  matter  at  the  atomic  and  molecular  level.
While  we  all  want  the  United  States  to  benefit  economically  from  nanotechnology
as  quickly  as  possible,  it  is  critically  important  that  the  basic  intellectual  property
surrounding nanotechnology be generated and reside within this country. Those who
hold this knowledge and who have a workforce prepared to exploit it will ‘‘own’’ com-
mercialization in the future.

Environmental and Health Implications: Picking up on the issues raised in Chap-
ter  3,  the  NNAP  recommends  the  NNI  continue  its  efforts  to  understand  the  pos-
sible  toxicological  effects  of  nanotechnology  and,  where  harmful  human  or  environ-
mental effects are proven, that the pertinent federal agencies should promptly regu-
late  accordingly.  Nanotechnology  products  should  not  be  immune  from  regulation,

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:56 Nov 29, 2005 Jkt 021950 PO 00000 Frm 00029 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\RES05\062905\21950.TXT SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

26

but  such  regulation  must  be  based  on  science  and  rationality,  not  perceived  fears
and irrationality. Judging on where we are today with existing research and regula-
tion,  it  appears  that  the  public  and  the  environment  are  adequately  protected
through  existing  regulatory  authorities.  However,  the  NNAP  encourages  continued
research into possible toxicological effects—particularly in the workplace—and urges
Government regulatory agencies to work together to ensure that any regulatory poli-
cies  that  are  developed  are  based  on  the  best  available  science  and  are  consistent
among  the  agencies.  The  NNAP  recommends  coordinating  and  sharing  environ-
mental, health and safety research results internationally to ensure that that efforts
are  not  duplicated  unnecessarily  and  information  is  shared  widely.  The  NNAP  will
continue to monitor the development of these issues very closely.

Program Component Area Flexibility: In accordance with the Act, the interagency
group  that  coordinates  the  NNI  has  identified  seven  Program  Component  Areas
(PCAs) that generally follow the broad categories of foundational research being con-
ducted  today.  The  PCAs  represent  areas  in  which  ongoing  and  coordinated  invest-
ment across multiple agencies will be required to support development of the many
anticipated applications of nanotechnology. The NNAP recommends that these PCAs
be  regularly  re-examined  and  adjusted  as  necessary  to  track  the  developments  in
the  nanotechnology  R&D  field.  Today’s  PCAs  should  not  be  viewed  as  set  in  stone,
and  today’s  organizational  choices  cannot  be  allowed  to  continue  indefinitely  and
thereby  to  drive  the  future  progression  of  the  program.  We  cannot  know  where  the
state  of  nanotechnology  will  be  10  years  from  now,  but  we  can  be  fairly  certain  it
will be considerably different than exists today.

Education/Workforce  Preparation:  A  key  to  realizing  the  economic  benefits  of
nanotechnology  will  be  the  establishment  of  an  infrastructure  capable  of  educating
and  training  an  adequate  number  of  researchers,  teachers,  and  technical  workers.
To  maximize  the  value  of  its  investment  in  developing  materials  and  programs  for
education  and  worker  training,  the  NNAP  felt  that  better  relationships  should  be
established  between  the  NNI  and  the  Departments  of  Education  and  Labor.  While
the  science  agencies  such  as  the  National  Science  Foundation  (NSF)  can  conduct
education  research  and  design  excellent  programs  and  materials,  ultimately  the
mission  agencies,  Education  and  Labor,  must  be  engaged  to  disseminate  these  pro-
grams  and  materials  as  widely  as  possible  throughout  the  Nation’s  education  and
training  systems.  The  NNAP  also  felt  that  the  NNI’s  education  focus  should  be  on
promoting science fundamentals at K–16 levels, while encouraging the development
and  incorporation  of  nanotechnology-related  material  into  science  and  engineering
education. To promote mid-career training for professionals, the NNAP recommends
that the NNI partner with and support professional societies and trade associations
that have continuing education as a mission.

Other  Societal  Implications:  The  NNAP  strongly  supports  continued  NNI  funding
for research aimed at understanding the societal implications of nanotechnology, in-
cluding  ethical,  economic,  and  legal  aspects.  The  NNAP  members  believe  the  NNI
also  must  work  to  inform  the  public  about  nanotechnology  and  seek  to  understand
and  address  public  concerns  about  this  emerging  area  of  technology  development.
Now  more  than  ever,  those  who  are  developing  new  scientific  knowledge  and  tech-
nologies  must  be  aware  of  the  impact  their  efforts  may  have  on  society.
Nanotechnology,  like  biotechnology,  has  the  potential  to  require  individuals,  cor-
porations, and governments to make decisions that have ethical, legal, and other so-
cietal  implications.  The  NNI  must  actively  engage  scholars  who  represent  dis-
ciplines  that  might  not  have  been  previously  engaged  in  nanotechnology-related  re-
search  to  address  these  issues.  Moreover,  these  efforts  should  be  integrated  with
conventional  scientific  and  engineering  research  programs  so  that  the  people  who
develop  nanotechnology  are  more  fully  aware  of  the  societal  implications  of  their
work.  While  the  NNAP  generally  felt  that  the  NNI  through  its  National
Nanotechnology  Coordination  Office  (NNCO)  has  done  a  good  job  initiating  public
outreach  and  is  working  to  facilitate  stakeholder  discourse  on  these  subjects,  we
would encourage continued attention to societal issues into the future.

Other  Recommendations/NNAP  Report  Schedule:  Beyond  the  issues  I  have  high-
lighted,  the  NNAP  report  generally  endorses  the  NNI  and  recommends  continued
robust  funding  to  help  maintain  U.S.  leadership.  We  also  suggest  increased  coordi-
nation with other interagency groups and more involvement by agencies not partici-
pating  in  NNI  at  a  level  appropriate  to  their  mission,  most  notably  DHS.  Finally,
there are a few administrative items, such as a recommendation that the NNAP re-
port  schedule  be  adjusted  to  more  adequately  complement  NNI  strategic  plan  re-
porting  activities.  These  recommendations  and  others  are  more  fully  described  in
the  report,  and  I  would  be  happy  to  respond  to  any  follow-up  questions  you  have.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:56 Nov 29, 2005 Jkt 021950 PO 00000 Frm 00030 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\RES05\062905\21950.TXT SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

27

Conclusion

In  conclusion,  speaking  as  a  member  of  the  NNAP  who  has  been  very  closely  in-
volved  in  studying  and  monitoring  developments  in  nanotechnology  over  the  past
several years, and as a an early participant in the semiconductor research industry,
I am personally excited about the continual flow of new discoveries and truly revolu-
tionary opportunities made possible by nanotechnology R&D. I believe the NNAP re-
port  echoes  this  enthusiasm  and  conveys  our  general  support  for  continuing  down
the  path  of  robust  funding  and  support  for  the  NNI  in  order  to  maintain  the  U.S.
competitive  edge  in  this  emerging  area.  I  particularly  appreciate  the  work  of  this
committee  and  the  support  in  Congress  generally  for  nanotechnology  R&D,  and  I
look  forward  to  continued  dialogue  with  you  on  this  important  research  endeavor.

BIOGRAPHY FOR E. FLOYD KVAMME

Since March 1984, Floyd Kvamme has been a Partner at Kleiner Perkins Caufield
&  Byers,  a  high  technology  venture  capital  firm.  He  is  responsible  for  the  develop-
ment of high technology companies from early start-up to publicly traded phase.

Floyd  Kvamme  currently  serves  on  the  boards  of  Brio  Technology,  Gemfire,  Har-
monic,  National  Semiconductor,  Photon  Dynamics,  Power  Integrations,  and  Silicon
Genesis.

Mr.  Kvamme  is  Chairman  of  Empower  America,  a  Washington  based  issue  advo-
cacy organization. He serves on the boards of the Markkula Center for Applied Eth-
ics Advisory Board at Santa Clara University and the National Venture Capital As-
sociation  (NVCA)  and  on  the  Executive  Committee  of  The  Technology  Network.  In
1998,  Kvamme  served  as  Chairman  of  the  Electronic  Commerce  Advisory  Council
for the State of California.

On the political front, Mr. Kvamme served on the High Tech Advisory Committee
and  on  the  National  Finance  Committee  of  the  Bush  for  President  Campaign.  Pre-
viously, he served on the Finance Committee of the Fong for Senate Campaign.

Floyd Kvamme was one of five members of the team that began at National Semi-
conductor in 1967, serving as its General Manager of Semiconductor Operations and
building it into a billion-dollar company. He served as President of the National Ad-
vanced Systems subsidiary, which designed, manufactured and marketed large com-
puter systems.

In  1982  he  became  Executive  Vice  President  of  Sales  and  Marketing  for  Apple
Computer. While at Apple, his responsibilities included worldwide sales, marketing,
distribution and support.

He  holds  two  degrees  in  Engineering;  a  BS  in  Electrical  Engineering  from  the
University  of  California  at  Berkeley  (1959)  and  an  MSE  specializing  in  Semicon-
ductor Electronics from Syracuse University (1962).

Chairman INGLIS. Thank you, Mr. Kvamme. Mr. Nordan.

STATEMENT OF MATTHEW M. NORDAN, VICE PRESIDENT OF

RESEARCH, LUX RESEARCH, INC.

Mr.  NORDAN.  And  there  we  go.  Good  morning,  Chairman  Inglis,
Ranking  Member  Hooley,  and  Members  of  the  Committee.  Thank
you  for  inviting  me  to  testify  today.  My  company,  Lux  Research,
advises  corporations,  investors,  startups,  and  public  sector  institu-
tions  on  exploiting  nanotechnology  for  competitive  advantage.  I
lead the research team.

Now,  let  us  start  with  the  good  news.  The  U.S.  leads  the  world
in  nanotechnology  today.  Last  year,  $4.6  billion  of  government
spending  went  into  nanotech  R&D  worldwide.  $1.6  billion  was  in
the U.S., far exceeding second place Japan at $1 billion flat. Sixty-
nine  percent  of  nanotech  patents  issued  by  the  USPTO  are  as-
signed  to  U.S.  based  entities,  versus  only  56  percent  for  patents
overall, so we have a lead there. Last year, $3.8 billion in corporate
R&D  went  into  nanotechnology.  Of  that,  $1.7  billion  came  from
U.S. based companies like GE and GM, again far exceeding second
place Japan at $1.1 billion. Finally, 24 percent of scientific articles
on  nanoscience  and  nanotechnology  have  emerged  from  the  U.S.,

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:56 Nov 29, 2005 Jkt 021950 PO 00000 Frm 00031 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\RES05\062905\21950.TXT SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

28

with  China  and  Japan  next,  at  13  percent  and  11  percent  respec-
tively.

However,  our  lead  is  tenuous.  The  rest  of  the  world  is  catching
up. We are falling behind in government investment. At purchasing
power  parity,  Taiwan,  Japan,  and  South  Korea  all  exceed  us  on  a
per  capita  basis.  Taiwan’s  $9.40  per  head  at  PPP  last  year  was
nearly  twice  our  $5.42.  We  are  threatened  by  industrial  policies
abroad that do what the U.S. will not, namely put universities and
corporations  together  to  dominate  specific,  near-term  applications.
To  return  to  Taiwan,  60  percent  of  the  funds  in  its  $640  million
nanotechnology  initiative  are  devoted  to  working  directly  with  cor-
porations to achieve leadership in specific product categories.

Even  when  measured  by  patents  at  our  own  USPTO,  we  lag
other countries in some of the most promising and near-term fields.
Of  70  patents  for  carbon  nanotube  field  emission  displays,  22  are
assigned to South Korean entities, and 20 to Japanese ones, versus
only  12  for  the  U.S.  We  have  overestimated  our  lead.  Scientists  in
countries with a less rich history of science and technology are not
lagging  when  it  comes  to  nanotech.  On  the  contrary,  they  are
studying  our  publications,  being  educated  in  our  universities,  and
outfitting  their  labs  with  equipment  from  U.S.  firms.  China  spent
$130 million U.S. on nanotech last year. At purchasing power par-
ity,  that  was  $611  million,  38  percent  of  what  we  spend.  The  Ira-
nian  nanotechnology  initiative  was  ordered  by  none  other  than
President Mohammad Khatami.

like  Nanotechnologies, 

U.S. patents are at risk in countries that do not strongly enforce
intellectual  property  laws.  There  is  a  class  of  nanomaterials  called
metal  oxide  nanoparticles.  They  are  used  in  everything  from  high
SPF  sunscreens  to  rocket  fuels.  Now,  I  recently  met  with  several
manufacturers in this field at a conference. First, I spoke with U.S.
based 
Inc.,  NanoGram,  and
NanoPhase,  all  of  whom  have  invested  great  amounts  of  money  to
develop 
these
nanoparticles.  Then,  I  spoke  with  a  marketing  manager  from  a
Chinese competitor, and he was full of detailed, quantitative infor-
mation  about  his  company’s  products,  until  I  asked  what  his  pro-
duction process was, aiming to see if his company might be infring-
ing on the patents of one of the U.S. based firms. He professed that
the question had never come up.

exclusive  patented  processes 

for  making 

firms, 

What  can  the  U.S.  do  to  maintain  and,  moreover,  extend  leader-
ship in nanotechnology? I see five key actions. First, the U.S. must
grow  federal  funding  for  nanotechnology  research.  Nanotech  is  a
horizontal  enabler  most  similar  to  assembly  line  manufacturing  or
to electricity that will impact virtually every manufactured good. It
is  as  critical  for  us  to  lead  in  this  field  now  as  it  was  to  lead  in
packet switched networks decades ago, far before the Internet stim-
ulated economic development.

Second,  we  must  eliminate  regulatory  uncertainty  surrounding
environmental,  health,  and  safety  issues  in  nanotechnology.  There
are  no  firm  guidelines  from  the  EPA  or  OSHA  today  about  how
those  agencies  plan  to  regulate  nanomaterials,  and  as  a  result,
large  corporations  are  beginning  to  hold  back  investment,  for  fear
that the ground will shift underneath them.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:56 Nov 29, 2005 Jkt 021950 PO 00000 Frm 00032 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\RES05\062905\21950.TXT SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

29

Third, we must attract U.S. students to the physical sciences, but
as well, we must retain the foreign students that we import. Nobel
laureate  Richard  Smalley  has  observed  that  on  current  trends,  by
2010,  90  percent  of  physical  scientists  worldwide  will  be  Asian  na-
tionals,  60  percent  will  be  practicing  in  Asia.  The  U.S.  should
strengthen  science  education  in  K-12,  reconsider  the  effect  of  visa
tightening on the inflow of foreign science and technology students,
and  develop  economic  incentives  to  retain  those  researchers  when
they  study  here.  Quite  frankly,  we  risk  becoming  a  drive-through
educational institution for other countries’ students.

Fourth,  we  must  create  financial  incentives  aligned  with  desir-
able applications. Such programs can be coordinated through exist-
ing  agencies.  They  require  no  incremental  bureaucracy.  Consider
NASA’s  $11  million  project  with  Rice  University  to  develop  ex-
tremely low loss power cables based on carbon nanotubes.

And  finally,  we  must  be  sensible  about  export  controls  in
nanotechnology,  which  could  choke  commercialization.  Export  con-
trols  in  this  field,  per  se,  are  a  dead  end.  The  field  is  too  broad  to
implement  them.  Such  action  would  be  like  trying  to  impose  con-
trols  on  assembly  line  manufacturing  techniques  and  equipment.
Instead, we believe the U.S. should identify specific nanotech appli-
cations  with  military  significance,  like  nanoparticulate  explosives,
and  impose  sensible  controls  on  them  within  existing  frameworks.
think
nanotechnology  is  critical  to  our  nation’s  future,  and  I  am  pleased
to answer any questions.

I  appreciate  your 

inviting  me  here 

to  speak.  I 

[Statement of Mr. Nordan follows:]

PREPARED STATEMENT OF MATTHEW M. NORDAN

The U.S. leads the world in nanotechnology today, but its position is tenuous. To
maintain  global  leadership,  U.S.  policy-makers  must  grow  federal  funding  for
nanotech  research;  eliminate  regulatory  uncertainty  surrounding  environmental,
health,  and  safety  issues;  and  do  a  better  job  of  retaining  foreign  Ph.D.  students.
In addition, the U.S. must create financial incentives aligned with desirable applica-
tions and approach export controls sensibly.
The U.S. Leads the World in Nanotechnology Today

Nanotechnology is the purposeful engineering of matter at scales of less than 100
nanometers (nm) to achieve size-dependent properties and functions. Nanotech inno-
vations occupy a value chain starting with nanomaterials like carbon nanotubes and
dendrimers, followed by intermediate products like memory chips and drug delivery
carriers built with nanomaterials, and ending with enhanced final goods like mobile
phones and cancer therapies (see Figure 1). Lux Research projects that new, emerg-
ing  nanotechnology  applications  will  affect  nearly  every  type  of  manufactured  good
over  the  next  ten  years,  becoming  incorporated  into  15  percent  of  global  manufac-
turing output totaling $2.6 trillion in 2014 (see Figures 2 and 3).1
Multiple Metrics Testify to the Position of the U.S.

Massive  investment  is  going  into  nanotech—$8.6  billion  combined  in  government
spending,  corporate  R&D,  and  venture  capital  worldwide  in  2004,  up  10  percent
from  2003  (see  Figure  4–1).2 By  most  measures,  the  U.S.  leads  in  nanotechnology
today, including:

• Absolute  public  sector  spending.  Of  the  $4.6  billion  spent  by  governments  on
nanotechnology  R&D  last  year,  the  U.S.  led  in  absolute  terms  with  nearly
$1.6 billion; runner-up Japan spent less than two-thirds as much at $1.0 bil-
lion (see Figure 4–2).3

1 Source: October 2004 Lux Research report, ‘‘Sizing Nanotechnology’s Value Chain.’’
2 Source: 2004 Lux Research reference study, ‘‘The Nanotech Report 2004.’’
3 Source: 2004 Lux Research reference study, ‘‘The Nanotech Report 2004.’’

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:56 Nov 29, 2005 Jkt 021950 PO 00000 Frm 00033 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\RES05\062905\21950.TXT SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

30

• Patents issued. U.S. leadership in patent activity in general is amplified when
it  comes  to  nanotechnology.  While  56  percent  of  total  issued  patents  at  the
U.S. Patent and Trademark Office are assigned to U.S.-based entities, 69 per-
cent of nanotech patents are.4

• Corporate  R&D  spending.  We  conservatively  estimate  that  corporations
worldwide spent $3.8 billion on nanotechnology R&D in 2004; of this, $1.7 bil-
lion was spent by corporations based in the U.S., far more than in any other
country (see Figure 4–3).5

• Scientific  publications.  Of  a  representative  sample  of  109,728  articles  pub-
lished  in  peer-reviewed  journals  about  nanoscience  and  nanotechnology
through  June  2005,  24  percent  were  authored  by  U.S.-based  scientists—ex-
ceeding  second-place  China  (at  13  percent)  and  third-place  Japan  (at  11  per-
cent) by a wide margin (see Figure 4–4).6

Deeply Embedded Sociocultural Values Drive U.S. Leadership

The  U.S.  owes  its  leadership  position  in  nanotechnology  to  wise  decisions,  made
by both governments and private sector entities like venture capital investors, about
how  science  and  technology  innovations  should  be  commercialized.  These  decisions,
in turn, stem from deeply embedded sociocultural values—for example, that success-
ful risk-taking innovators should capture large rewards, and that short-term failure
is a step toward long-term success. The U.S. benefits from:

• World-class universities that create grist for the commercialization mill. Uni-
versities  provide  an  effective  vehicle  for  transferring  cutting-edge  technology
from  the  lab  to  the  manufacturing  floor.7 The  U.S.  serves  as  a  model  for  the
world in this regard, for both high technology in general and nanotech in par-
ticular. U.S. investment in knowledge as a percentage of GDP totaled 6.8 per-
cent  in  2000,  topping  the  league  tables  of  the  first-world  OECD  countries.8
The  Bayh-Dole  Act  of  1980  gave  universities  powerful  financial  incentives  to
transfer  innovation  into  commercial  entities,  and  corporations  working  in
nanotech  eagerly  tap  these  resources:  85  percent  of  corporations  active  in
nanotech  R&D  interviewed  by  Lux  Research  in  Q4  2004  have  university  col-
laborations.9

4 Source:  USPTO  searches  as  of  June  22,  2005.  For  more  information  on  nanotechnology  and
patents,  see  the  March  2005  Lux  Research  report,  ‘‘The  Nanotech  Intellectual  Property  Land-
scape.’’

5 Source: 2004 Lux Research reference study, ‘‘The Nanotech Report 2004.’’
6 To identify these articles, we used the Science Citation Index with a search string of ‘‘(quan-
tum  dot  OR  nanopartic*  OR  nanotub*  OR  fullerene*  OR  nanomaterials*  OR  nanofib*  OR
nanotech* OR nanocryst* OR nanocomposit* OR nanohorn*).’’

7 It should be noted that national labs such as Oak Ridge and Sandia also serve as wellsprings

for innovation that can be commercialized down the road.

8 Source: OECD Factbook 2005.
9 Source: December 2004 Lux Research report, ‘‘The CEO’s Nanotechnology Playbook.’’

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:56 Nov 29, 2005 Jkt 021950 PO 00000 Frm 00034 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\RES05\062905\21950.TXT SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

31

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:56 Nov 29, 2005 Jkt 021950 PO 00000 Frm 00035 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\RES05\062905\21950.TXT SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

32

• A culture of entrepreneurship that thrives on constructive failure. In the U.S.,
leaving  a  comfortable  corporate  job  to  launch  a  start-up  company  is  widely
considered a positive career move. In other first-world countries, it may either
be  viewed  as  foolish  or  be  nearly  impossible  to  accomplish.  Hotbeds  like
Massachusetts’s  Route  128,  California’s  Silicon  Valley,  and  Texas’s  greater
Austin  area  teem  with  the  combination  of  innovative  thinkers,  technical  tal-
ent,  and  experienced  management  needed  to  forge  a  successful  start-up.  It’s
no  surprise  that,  of  approximately  1,200  nanotech  start-ups  active  in  2004,
half were located in the U.S.10

• World-leading  availability  of  risk  capital.  Although  corporations  do  an  effec-
tive  job  of  incubating  incremental  nanotechnology  applications  that  com-
plement  their  existing  products,  disruptive  nanotechnology  applications  over-
whelmingly  arise 
from  start-up  companies  such  as  Aspen  Aerogels,
Nanospectra  Biosciences,  and  Nantero.  Venture  capital  is  the  lifeblood  of
these  small  firms,  and  the  U.S.  claims  56%  of  venture  capital  deployed  in
start-ups globally.11

The Dominant U.S. Position in Nanotechnology Lies at Risk
Despite  the  U.S.’s  strong  position  in  nanotechnology,  other  countries—from  the
usual suspects like Japan and South Korea to surprises like Australia and Israel—
challenge its dominance. Witness:

• U.S.  loss  of  spending  leadership  on  a  relative  basis.  Although  the  U.S.
puts  more  government  funding  to  work  on  nanotech  research  than  any  other
country  on  an  absolute  basis,  it  has  already  fallen  behind  Asian  competitors
on  a  relative  basis.  This  trend  becomes  even  more  apparent  when  spending
levels  are  corrected  for  purchasing-power  parity,  reflecting  the  difference  in
what  a  dollar  buys  from  one  country  to  the  next.  On  this  basis,  the  U.S.  in-
vested $5.42 per capita in government spending on nanotechnology last year,
exceeded  by  South  Korea  at  $5.62,  Japan  at  $6.30,  and  Taiwan  at  $9.40—
nearly twice the level of the U.S. (see Figure 5–1).12

10 Source: 2004 Lux Research reference study, ‘‘The Nanotech Report 2004.’’
11 Source: Lux Research analysis based on Thomson Venture Economics and IMD World Com-

petitiveness Yearbook 2004.

12 Source: Published spending allocations and Lux Research analysis.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:56 Nov 29, 2005 Jkt 021950 PO 00000 Frm 00036 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\RES05\062905\21950.TXT SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

33

• Industrial  policy  abroad  aimed  at  dominating  specific  product  seg-
ments.  U.S.  industrial  policy  eschews  direct  government/industry  collabora-
tion for leadership in specific applications. In Europe and Asia, many govern-
ments  pursue  the  strategies  that  the  U.S.  avoids,  giving  foreign  competitors
a  leg  up  on  their  U.S.  rivals.  For  example,  of  the  $640  million  allocated  to
Taiwan’s  Nanoscience  and  Nanotechnology  Initiative  over  five  years,  60  per-
cent  is  earmarked  for  ‘‘strategic  industry  applications’’  developed  collabo-
ratively  between  government  institutions  and  industrial  champions.13 Two  of
Taiwan’s  top  nanotechnology  applications  are  magnetoresistive  RAM,  which
U.S.  companies  Freescale  Semiconductor,  IBM,  and  NVE  have  been  devel-
oping  for  more  than  a  decade,  and  carbon  nanotube  field  emission  displays,
which U.S.-based electronics giant Motorola, small-cap company Nano-Propri-
etary, and start-up cDream are working on.14

13 Source: ‘‘The Strategy and Experiences to Industrializing Nanotechnology in Taiwan,’’ pres-
entation  delivered  at  SEMI  NanoForum  2004,  November  15,  2004,  by  Tsung-Tsan  Su,  Ph.D.,
General  Director,  Nanotechnology  Research  Center,  Industrial  Technology  Research  Institute,
Taiwan.

14 Such initiatives do not exist only in Asia. In Europe, the NanoCMOS project aims to reach
the  45-nm  semiconductor  process  node  in  2005,  well  ahead  of  the  International  Technology
Roadmap  for  Semiconductors  targets.  It  received  24  million  in  initial  funding  from  the  Euro-
pean  Commission  and  is  being  executed  by  a  consortium  anchored  by  semiconductor
heavyweights  Infineon  (Germany),  Philips  (the  Netherlands),  and  STMicroelectronics  (France).

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:56 Nov 29, 2005 Jkt 021950 PO 00000 Frm 00037 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\RES05\062905\21950.TXT SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

34

• Leadership of high-volume, near-term applications on foreign shores.
In  many  specific,  promising  application  domains,  researchers  in  other  coun-
tries have begun to outpace the U.S. in developing intellectual property—even
when  measured  by  patents  issued  within  the  U.S.  patent  system.  Consider
carbon  nanotubes  in  displays,  where  the  wonder  materials  have  been  pro-
posed  for  a  new  type  of  large,  flat-panel  monitor  that  could  outperform  LCD
and  plasma  at  lower  cost  and  energy  consumption.  Of  70  patents  for  carbon
nanotube  display  applications  issued  by  the  U.S.  Patent  and  Trademark  Of-
fice  through  February  2005,  only  17  percent  were  issued  to  entities  based  in
the  U.S.  compared  with  29  percent  in  Japan  and  31  percent  in  South  Korea
(see Figure 5–2).

• Innovative  efforts  in  unexpected  places.  Scientists  in  countries  with  a
less  rich  history  of  science  and  technology  innovation  are  not  lagging  when
it comes to nanotech. On the contrary, they are studying U.S. scientific publi-
cations, being educated in U.S. universities, and orienting their initial capital
investments toward the instrumentation needed for nanotechnology research,
without  having  to  maintain  technology  infrastructures  and  skill  sets  that
were cutting-edge 20 years ago. The result: impressive efforts in countries not
known  for  scientific  leadership.  The  $130  million  in  estimated  government
spending on nanotech last year in China equaled $611 million at purchasing-
power  parity,  or  38  percent  of  U.S.  expenditure;  in  addition,  China  recently
launched a world-leading effort to set standards for nanomaterials.15 Further,
some  countries  that  the  U.S.  considers  to  represent  strategic  threats  have
thriving  nanotech  programs;  the  Iranian  NanoTechnology  Initiative  was  or-
dered by none other than President Mohammed Khatami.16

15 Source: Lux Research analysis.
16 Source:  ‘‘Revolutionary  Nanotechnology,’’  Hamshahri  (Iranian  daily  newspaper),  No.  3651,

page 10, March 3, 2005. Accessed via http://www.netiran.com/?fn=artd(3434).

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:56 Nov 29, 2005 Jkt 021950 PO 00000 Frm 00038 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\RES05\062905\21950.TXT SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

35

• Lack  of  concern  with  violating  intellectual  property  (IP)  protection.
Companies  exploiting  nanotechnology  depend  on  international  property  pro-
tection to defend their freedom to operate. Yet in many foreign countries, lax
enforcement  of  intellectual  property  means  that  rivals  appear  to  ignore  pat-
ents in practice. In the crowded field of metal oxide nanoparticles, with appli-
cations  in  everything  from  sunscreens  to  rocket  fuels,  74  companies  compete
globally,  eight  of  which  are  in  China.  The  U.S.-  and  European-based  compa-
nies—like  NanoGram,  Nanophase,  and  Nanotechnologies  Inc.,—depend  on
proprietary, patented production processes. for their differentiation and finan-
cial  valuations.  But  the  Chinese  manufacturers  stress  their  ability  to  deliver
identical  products  at  prices  15  percent  to  20  percent  cheaper—and  generally
refuse  to  name  their  production  processes,  raising  suspicion  that  they  are
using  Westerners’  patent  filings  like  recipe  books.  With  lax  Chinese  IP  en-
forcement  and  no  way  to 
from  the
nanoparticles that result, U.S. nanoparticle firms have limited means to com-
pete.

infer  a  manufacturing  process 

Entrepreneurs Face Steep Hurdles on the Path from University Lab to Suc-

cessful Start-Up

For the U.S. to remain highly competitive, it must help start-ups overcome:

• Funding  gaps.  The  widespread  perception  that  nanotechnology  start-ups
have more venture capital than they can reasonably deploy is dead wrong. In
fact, venture funding for nanotechnology start-ups declined from $385 million
in  2002  to  $200  million  in  2004,  and  accounted  for  only  two  percent  of
nanotechnology R&D funding that year; cautious VCs burned by the Internet
bubble hesitate to commit more cash until they see substantial exits (see Fig-
ure  6).17 To  encourage  entrepreneurs  to  bring  nanotech  innovations  out  of
university  laboratories  and  into  the  commercial  arena,  government  funding
through  vehicles  like  Small  Business  Innovation  Research  (SBIR)  grants  and
the National Institute of Science and Technology’s Advanced Technology Pro-
gram (ATP) is an absolute necessity.

• Human resource gaps. The  U.S.  is  not  generating  enough  Science  and  En-
gineering  Master’s  degree  and  Ph.D.  holders  to  maintain  leadership  in
nanotechnology. Tighter controls on student visas since the September 11 at-
tacks have reduced the inflow of Ph.D. students to the United States in favor
of  Western  Europe,  and  as  economies  in  China,  India,  and  South  Korea  de-
velop, foreign scientists are less likely to remain in the U.S. for their careers
than they were a decade ago. Nobel Laureate Richard Smalley from Rice Uni-
versity  has  noted  that  at  current  rates,  by  2010,  90  percent  of  all  physical
scientists will be Asian and 50 percent of them will be practicing in Asia.

• Manufacturability  gaps.  Nanotechnology  start-ups  must  cross  a  much
ballyhooed  ‘‘valley  of  death’’  to  obtain  the  risk  capital  funding  required  to
move  the  business  forward.  Yet  they  also  must  cross  another,  related,  valley
between  small-scale  benchtop  production  volumes  and  the  pilot-scale  produc-
tion  required  to  win  commercial  contracts.  Our  contacts  with  nanotechnology

17 Source: 2004 Lux Research reference study, ‘‘The Nanotech Report 2004.’’

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:56 Nov 29, 2005 Jkt 021950 PO 00000 Frm 00039 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\RES05\062905\21950.TXT SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

36

researchers  indicate  that  the  Nanoscale  Science  Research  Centers  scattered
throughout  the  U.S.  assist  with  basic  research  only  (not  scale-up),  are  ill-
used,  and  do  not  help  bridge  this  gap.  As  a  result,  many  start-ups  spend  re-
dundant millions to build the same manufacturing pilot plants that they end
up using perhaps 10 percent of the time; dedicated, shared manufacturing fa-
cilities devoted to technology incubation would help bridge this gap more cost-
effectively.

The U.S. Government Must Take Concerted Action to Maintain Leadership

We recommend that the U.S. Government:

• Grow federal funding for nanotechnology research. To maintain leader-
ship,  the  U.S.  National  Nanotechnology  Initiative  (NNI)  must  be  funded  at
or  beyond  current  budget  request  levels.  It  should  not  be  assumed  that  U.S.
states  will  pick  up  any  slack  should  federal  spending  ebb:  Although  U.S.
states  spent  $432  million  last  year,  complementing  approximately  $1.15  bil-
lion at the federal level, most of this money went to initial purchases of equip-
ment  and  construction  of  facilities,  not  to  funding  ongoing  research  activity
by Ph.D. and postdoctoral students. This state spending essentially represents
one-time capital expenditure unlikely to be sustained.

• Eliminate uncertainty surrounding environmental, health, and safety
(EHS)  issues.  Nanoparticles  present  new  EHS  issues;  not  enough  funda-
mental  toxicity  research  has  been  done  on  nanoparticles  to  decisively  deter-
mine  what  hazards  they  may  pose  to  workers,  the  public,  and  the  environ-
ment—or  how  such  hazards  may  be  mitigated.  We  believe  fundamental  re-
search  on  nanoparticle  toxicity  can  realistically  be  performed  only  under  a
government  aegis;  to  perform  it,  the  U.S.  Government  must  at  least  double
the  small  sums  currently  allocated  at  the  federal  level  for  nanotech  EHS  re-
search,  which  totaled  only  3.7  percent  of  the  2006  NNI  request  (see  Figure
7).18
Beyond  fundamental  research,  agencies  like  the  Environmental  Protection
Agency  have  not  yet  established  firm  guidelines  for  how  new  nanoparticles
will  be  treated  under  existing,  or  potentially  new,  regulatory  schemes.  While
this  unwillingness  to  rush  to  judgment  before  all  the  facts  are  in  is  well  in-
tentioned, it has perverse effects: Based on our contact with individuals driv-
ing nanotech initiatives at America’s largest corporations, it’s clear to us that
ambiguity  surrounding  EHS  regulation  of  nanoparticles  is  hampering  com-
mercialization—firms  do  not  want  to  play  a  game  whose  rules  may  change
at  any  time.  To  move  forward,  the  EPA,  the  FDA,  and  NIOSH  must  issue
clear guidance to industry on how they plan to approach nanoparticles.

• Attract  U.S.  students  to  science  and  engineering  and  retain  foreign
ones.  As  with  many  science  and  technology  fields,  funding  and  development
incentives  for  nanotechnology  research  will  amount  to  nothing  without  a
steady  stream  of  advanced  science  and  engineering  degree  holders  entering
the  workforce.  The  U.S.  should  strengthen  programs  designed  to  inspire  stu-
dents with wonder for the physical sciences in K–12 education, reconsider the
effect of visa tightening on the inflow of foreign science and technology grad-
uate  students,  and  develop  economic  incentives  for  foreign  science  and  tech-
nology  graduates  to  remain  in  the  United  States  rather  than  repatriate,  tak-
ing with them the skills they acquired in the U.S.

18 Source:  May  2005  Lux  Research  report,  ‘‘A  Prudent  Approach  to  Nanotech  Environmental,

Health, and Safety Risks.’’

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:56 Nov 29, 2005 Jkt 021950 PO 00000 Frm 00040 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\RES05\062905\21950.TXT SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

37

• Create financial incentives aligned with desirable applications. We be-
lieve  U.S.  economic  development  policy  is  right  not  to  fund  specific  solutions
to broad technology problems. However, the U.S. would be well served by gov-
ernment  programs  that  provide  funds  to  nanotechnology  researchers,  giving
them incentives to develop applications with well-defined ends, without speci-
fying particular technology means. Such programs can be coordinated through
existing agencies and require no incremental bureaucracy.
Consider  NASA’s  $11  million  project  with  Rice  University  to  develop  ex-
tremely  low-loss  power  cables  based  on  carbon  nanotubes:  Such  cables  could
enable  a  national  power  grid,  shuttling  electricity  from  locations  of  sustain-
able resources to areas of high demand without losing it on the way. The Na-
tional  Renewable  Energy  Laboratory  estimates  that  solar  cells  covering  a
100-by  100-mile  area  in  Nevada  could  meet  the  U.S.’s  entire  energy  needs,
but  without  low-loss  power  cables  the  electricity  could  never  reach  demand
hubs like Chicago and New York.19

• Employ  export  controls  sensibly,  without  choking  nanotech  commer-
cialization.  Export  controls  for  products  incorporating  nanotechnology  have
become a hot topic inside the Beltway; individuals representing multiple orga-
nizations  across  branches  of  government  have  independently  sought  Lux
Research’s  advice  on  this  issue.  We  believe  that  export  controls  for
‘‘nanotechnology’’  per  se  are  a  dead  end.  The  field  is  too  broad;  such  action
would  be  like  trying  to  impose  export  controls  on  assembly-line  manufac-
turing techniques and the equipment used to implement them—impossible to
carry  out  rationally.  Instead,  we  believe  the  U.S.  should  identify  relevant
nanotechnology  applications  (e.g.,  radiation-hardened  solar  cells,  high-fre-
quency  beam-steerable  antennas,  nanoparticulate  propellants  and  explosives)
and impose sensible export controls on them within existing frameworks rath-
er than introducing new ones.

BIOGRAPHY FOR MATTHEW M. NORDAN

Matthew Nordan heads Lux’s research organization. Under Matthew’s leadership,
the  Lux  Research  analyst  team  has  become  a  globally  recognized  authority  on  the
business  and  economic  impact  of  nanotechnology.  Lux  Research  serves  as  an  indis-
pensable  advisor  to  corporations,  start-ups,  financial  institutions,  and  governments
seeking to exploit nanotechnology for competitive advantage.

Matthew  has  counseled  decision-makers  on  emerging  technologies  for  a  decade.
Prior  to  Lux  Research,  Matthew  held  a  variety  of  senior  management  positions  at
emerging technology advisor Forrester Research, where he most recently headed the
firm’s  North  American  consulting  line  of  business.  Earlier,  Matthew  lived  for  four
years  in  the  Netherlands  growing  Forrester’s  operations  in  Europe,  where  he
launched  and  led  research  practices  in  retail,  mobile  commerce,  and  telecommuni-
cations.

Matthew has been invited by news outlets including CNN and CNBC to comment
on  emerging  technology  markets  and  has  been  widely  cited  in  publications  such  as

19 Source:  John  A.  Turner,  ‘‘A  Realizable  Renewable  Energy  Future,’’  Science,  Vol.  285,  Issue

5428, pp. 687–689, July 30, 1999.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:56 Nov 29, 2005 Jkt 021950 PO 00000 Frm 00041 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\RES05\062905\21950.TXT SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

38

The Wall Street Journal and The Economist. He has delivered advice to clients and
been  an  invited  speaker  at  conferences  in  North  America,  Europe,  Southeast  Asia,
Japan, Australia, and South Africa. Beyond the corporate sphere, Matthew has par-
ticipated  in  developing  public-sector  technology  strategy  for  organizations  including
the World Economic Forum, the European IT Observatory, and the Dutch transpor-
tation ministry.

Matthew is a summa cum laude graduate of Yale University, where he conducted
cognitive  neuroscience  research  on  the  neural  pathways  mediating  emotion  and
memory.

Chairman INGLIS. Thank you, Mr. Nordan. Mr. Murdock.
STATEMENT OF SEAN MURDOCK, EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR,

NANOBUSINESS ALLIANCE

Mr.  MURDOCK.  We  are  all  going  to  make  that  mistake.  Good
morning. I would like to thank you, Mr. Chairman, Ranking Mem-
ber Hooley, and the Members of the Research Subcommittee of the
Committee  on  Science  for  the  opportunity  to  testify  on  this  criti-
cally strategic question.

My  name  is  Sean  Murdock,  and  I  am  the  Executive  Director  of
the  NanoBusiness  Alliance.  The  NanoBusiness  Alliance  is  the  pre-
mier  nanotechnology  policy  and  commercialization  advocacy  group
in  the  United  States.  Our  members  span  multiple  stakeholder
groups,  from  startups  surviving  on  angel  funding  and  SBIR  fund-

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:56 Nov 29, 2005 Jkt 021950 PO 00000 Frm 00042 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\RES05\062905\21950.TXT SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

39

it 

is  clear 

ing,  to  Fortune  500  companies  with  multimillion  dollar  commit-
ments  to  nanotechnology  R&D,  to  academic  research  institutions
and  public-private  partnerships  working  to  derive  economic  devel-
opment,  benefit,  and  growth  through  nanotechnology.  This  wide
group  of  stakeholders  has  come  together  because  we  believe  that
nanotechnology  will  be  one  of  the  key  drivers  of  business  success,
economic growth, and quality-of-life improvements in the 21st Cen-
tury. The Alliance provides a collective voice and vehicle for efforts
to  advance  the  benefits  of  nanotechnology  across  our  economy  and
our society.

With that perspective in mind, I would like to share with you my
thoughts on the United States’ competitive position in the commer-
cialization  of  nanotechnology.  To  briefly  synthesize,  the  U.S.  is
leading  the  world  today,  but  our  lead  is  far  from  secure.  We  face
stiff and accelerating competition and we need to take action to en-
sure leadership.

Nanotechnology  will  have  tremendous  impact  on  virtually  every
sector  of  our  economy.  Near-term  applications  include  scratch  re-
sistant  coatings,  stain  resistant  textiles,  high  performance  tennis
rackets  and  golf  clubs,  computer  memory  and  storage,  flat  panel
displays,  drug  delivery  systems,  chemical  and  biological  sensors,
and  dramatically  more  sensitive  and  selective  diagnostics  to  name
a 
that
nanotechnology  will  be  the  engine  of  innovation  for  the  next  50
years, and we must be at the forefront of this revolution.

few  applications.  Given 

this  breadth, 

Furthermore,  nanotechnology’s  implication  for  homeland  secu-
rity,  defense,  cleaning  the  environment  and  developing  renewable,
sustainable  sources  of  energy  make  its  development  strategic  as
well  as  economic  for  the  United  States.  For  these  reasons,  we  as
a nation and as the last superpower cannot afford to hold anything
less  than  a  commanding  position  of  leadership  in  the  commer-
cialization of nanotechnology.

While the knowledge development that we refer to in nanoscience
R&D create value for the U.S. and society as a whole, it is through
the  commercialization  of  nanotechnology  into  new  processes  and
products  that  businesses  will  create  jobs,  and  that  this  nation  will
see  a  return  on  its  investment.  On  this  dimension,  the  United
States  is  performing  quite  well.  According  to  our  database,  of  all
companies  involved  with  nanotechnology,  a  little  over  50  percent
are in the United States.

That  is  the  good.  The  bad  news  is  while  we  lead  in  the  number
of  nanotech  startups,  the  so-called  valley  of  death,  the  period  be-
tween  a  company’s  formation  and  its  achieving  significant  cash
flow,  is  particularly  acute  for  nanotechnology,  and  is  constraining
the  growth  of  the  sector.  Most  nanotechnology  innovations  require
significant  investment  and  platform  development  before  any  reve-
nues  can  be  generated  because  they  are  based  upon  fundamental
scientific breakthroughs and basic research at universities and fed-
eral labs.

Burned  by  the  dot-com  bubble,  and  needing  to  raise  internal
rates  of  return  in  order  to  raise  the  next  fund,  venture  capitalists
have been shying away from investments in these kind of platform
technologies  that  have  longer-term  commercialization  processes
and  unclear  market  economics.  According  to  data  from  Small

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:56 Nov 29, 2005 Jkt 021950 PO 00000 Frm 00043 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\RES05\062905\21950.TXT SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

40

Times  Media,  we  continue  to  generate  about  30  to  40  venture
backed  startups  a  year,  and  I  am  sure  that  there  are  many,  many
others that are being formed that fall beneath the radar screen be-
cause  they  lack  the  capital  to  get  noticed.  However,  the  growth  of
this  group  has  been  stagnant  over  the  past  several  years,  as  ven-
ture  capital  funding  for  nanotech  has  remained  relatively  flat  at
about  an  average  of  a  little  more  than  $200  million.  To  put  that
in  perspective,  the  investment  over  the  past  seven  years  by  VCs
has  been  about  the  equivalent  of  the  investment  of  the  Federal
Government in 2004.

Leading Fortune 500 companies also have nanotechnology initia-
tives  and  funding  for  R&D,  but  many  have  scaled  back  their  early
stage  research  and  development  in  response  to  stock  market  pres-
sures for near-term profitability and the reduction of cost. The com-
mitment to early stage R&D at GE, IBM and the likes of Motorola
is the exception and not the rule. Many companies plan to innovate
through acquisition. Relying upon startups to develop and commer-
cialize innovations further expands the valley of death since compa-
nies  are  looking  for  startups  to  have  developed  their  technologies
far  enough  to  ease  integration.  It  also  means  that  more  than  ever,
startups  represent  the  product  pipeline  for  large  corporations  and
their  successful  formation  is  key  not  only  to  creating  new  pros-
perity, but continuing our existing prosperity.

Until  the  VC  cycle  changes  again,  and  stock  markets  allow  com-
panies to adopt longer horizons, we have a substantial and growing
valley  of  death.  Since  the  market  is  not  prepared  to  take  on  this
risk, the government needs to help bridge this gulf. Specifically, the
government must fully and effectively use the SBIR and other pro-
grams at its disposal to enhance commercialization activity.

Many  member  companies  speak  of  the  myth  of  SBIR  Phase  III
grants.  The  Phase  I  innovations  proved  out  in  Phase  II  are  sup-
posed to be brought into use in the sponsoring agency. While SBIR
grants in and of themselves are quite valuable for those attempting
to  commercialize  nanotech  innovations,  purchases  to  meet  agency
needs  would  generate  a  sustainable  source  of  revenues,  provide
customer validation, and accelerate the learning curve through pro-
duction. Furthermore, this would ensure that our agencies, particu-
larly  defense  and  homeland  security,  would  remain  ahead  of  the
world in terms of nanotech integration capability.

We  need  to  create  new  nanotech  innovation  ecosystems  to  form
particularly between U.S. startups and incumbents. If we are to re-
tain  our  jobs  in  existing  companies  and  industries,  then  we  will
need  to  integrate  the  innovations  of  nanotech  startups  into  these
sectors  rapidly.  Without  incentives  to  form  domestic  partnerships,
the  value  from  our  nation’s  investment  may  be  disproportionately
captured  by  foreign  companies  with  patient  capital  who  partner
with cash-strapped U.S. startups.

However  much  the  government  can  do  directly,  in  the  end  the
greatest leverage will be achieved by creating greater incentives for
the private sector to invest and aggressively participate in the com-
mercialization  process.  To  that  end,  we  should  investigate  estab-
lishing  a  permanent  R&D  tax  credit,  and  potentially  creating  new
vehicles,  like  the  R&D  limited  partnerships,  that  were  instru-
mental  in  the  formation  of  commercialization  capital  for  biotech.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:56 Nov 29, 2005 Jkt 021950 PO 00000 Frm 00044 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\RES05\062905\21950.TXT SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

41

These  will  unlock  not  only  more  of  the  potential  of  nanotech,  but
all technology-driven industries.

Thank you, Mr. Chairman. I would be happy to answer any ques-

tions you may have.

[The prepared statement of Mr. Murdock follows:]

PREPARED STATEMENT OF SEAN MURDOCK

I would like to thank you, Mr. Chairman, Ranking Member Hooley, and Members
of  the  House  Research  Subcommittee  of  the  Committee  on  Science  for  the  oppor-
tunity to testify on this critically strategic question.

My name is Sean Murdock, and I am the Executive Director of the NanoBusiness
Alliance. The NanoBusiness Alliance is the premier nanotechnology policy and com-
mercialization  advocacy  group  in  the  United  States.  NanoBusiness  Alliance  mem-
bers  span  multiple  stakeholder  groups  and  traditional  industrial  sectors,  including
newly  formed  start-ups  surviving  on  angel  funding  or  SBIR  grants,  Fortune  500
companies with multi-million dollar commitments to nanotechnology R&D, academic
research  institutions,  and  public-private  partnerships  working  to  derive  economic
development  and  growth  through  nanotechnology.  This  wide  group  of  stakeholders
has  come  together  because  we  believe  that  nanotechnology  will  be  one  of  the  key
drivers of business success, economic growth and quality-of-life improvements in the
21st century. The Alliance provides a collective voice and a vehicle for efforts to ad-
vance the benefits of nanotechnology across our economy and society.

With  that  perspective  in  mind,  I  would  like  to  share  with  you  my  thoughts  on
the  United  States’  competitive  position  in  both  the  research  and  commercialization
of nanotechnology. The U.S. is leading the world in nanoscience today, but our lead
is  narrow  and  we  face  stiff  and  accelerating  competition.  Action,  both  in  terms  of
spending and policy, is required at the federal, State, and local levels to assure that
we maintain this lead.

Since this subcommittee has relatively strong familiarity with nanotechnology and
the  21st  Century  Nanotechnology  Research  &  Development  Act,  I  only  need  to  give
some  highlights  of  the  potential  of  nanotechnology  and  why  it  is  so  important.  It
is my belief and the belief of every member of the Alliance that nanotechnology will
have  a  tremendous  impact  on  virtually  every  sector  of  the  global  economy,  a  belief
that  is  reflected  in  the  diversity  of  our  membership.  In  some  industries,  such  as
data storage, companies without a nanotechnology strategy already cannot compete.
This  will  become  pervasive  in  all  industry  sectors  that  produce  goods  rather  than
services.  Furthermore,  I  believe  that  nanotechnology  is  not  just  a  tremendous  eco-
nomic  driver,  but  that  its  implications  for  homeland  security,  defense,  cleaning  the
environment, and developing renewable, sustainable energy sources should make its
development a key strategic as well as economic goal for the U.S. For these reasons,
we as a nation and as the last superpower cannot afford to hold anything less than
a commanding leadership position in the commercialization of nanotechnology.

Investing  in  nanotechnology  could  also  bring  other  benefits,  beyond  the  creation
of  jobs,  bolstering  of  the  economy,  and  strategic  leadership.  Investing  in  commer-
cialization  allows  us  to  reinvest  in  nanoscience  education,  research,  and  develop-
ment, forging a virtuous circle that will ensure our children enjoy the same improve-
ment in quality of life that we have. Nanotechnology’s potential to provide solutions
to  the  grand  challenges  of  today  could  provide  a  rallying  point  and  inspire  interest
comparable  to  the  race  to  overtake  Sputnik  in  the  50’s  and  60’s,  still  one  of  the
greatest periods of innovation in American history.

The  stakes  are  incredibly  high.  The  NSF  has  estimated  that  the  global  impact  of
nanotechnology enabled products and services will be $1 trillion by 2015. Many con-
sidered  this  estimate  to  be  quite  lofty  when  it  was  made  in  2000  with  the  launch
of  the  National  Nanotechnology  Initiative.  However,  more  recent  estimates  for  the
global  impact  of  nanotechnology  enabled  goods  are  even  larger  than  the  NSF’s.  In
Realis, a consulting group, has predicted that nanotech will impact up to $2 trillion
of  global  economic  output,  while  Evolution  Capital,  an  investment  bank,  estimates
that the market will reach $1 trillion five years earlier in 2010. Finally, in perhaps
the most rigorous study to date, Lux Research, a nanotechnology analyst group, has
estimated that nanotech will impact $2.6 trillion in global economic output by 2015
(see Figure 1).

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:56 Nov 29, 2005 Jkt 021950 PO 00000 Frm 00045 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\RES05\062905\21950.TXT SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

42

While these estimates are mind-numbingly large, a brief mention of some prospec-
tive  applications  and  estimated  time  to  market  helps  to  make  them  more  tangible
and  more  credible.  Simple  and  passive  applications  of  nanotechnology  including
nanoparticles,  coatings,  catalysts,  and  nanocomposites  are  already  on  the  market,
while  more  revolutionary  applications, 
first  generation  of
nanotechnology-enabled  pharmaceuticals,  bulk  nanomaterials,  sensors,  and  many
more are beyond the research stage and well into the product pipeline. In additional
to developing revolutionary products, nanotechnology will radically change the cost-
structures of many industries, making non-nano alternatives simply non-competitive
(see Figure 2).

including 

the 

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:56 Nov 29, 2005 Jkt 021950 PO 00000 Frm 00046 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\RES05\062905\21950.TXT SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

43

On the strategic side, nanotechnology will enable dramatic enhancements in mili-
tary  and  homeland  security  capabilities.  Start-ups  are  working  on  new  protective
armor,  chem/bio  suits,  and  chem/bio  sensors,  as  well  as  a  variety  of  technologies
such as quantum computing and encryption which have enormous dual-use applica-
tions.

Given  the  potential  of  nanotechnology  and  the  evidence  of  traction  toward  real-
izing  that  potential,  it  is  increasingly  clear  that  nanotechnology  will  be  a  game
changing  technology.  Economists  estimate  that  technology  innovation  in  the  U.S.
(transistors,  integrated  circuits,  recombinant  DNA,  etc.)  generated  half  of  the  eco-
nomic  growth  over  the  past  fifty  years.  Nanotechnology  is  likely  to  be  the  engine
of innovation for the next fifty years, and we must be at the forefront of this innova-
tion.

That  is  the  importance  of  nanotechnology  as  a  national  goal,  but  it  does  not  an-
swer  the  question  of  where  the  country  currently  stands  with  respect  to  other
nanotechnology leaders such as China, Japan, and the E.U., the other global leaders
in nanotech. Fortunately, at the current time, the U.S. is clearly in a leadership po-
sition,  evidenced  by  its  strength  in  investment,  scientific  publications,  and  patents.
This  should  not  be  taken  for  granted—key  innovations  have  been  developed  in  the
E.U.  (such  as  the  electron  microscope,  the  instrument  that  helped  enable  all
nanotech  research)  and  Japan  (such  as  the  discovery  of  the  nanotube,  the  most
versatile and powerful nanomaterial yet developed).

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:56 Nov 29, 2005 Jkt 021950 PO 00000 Frm 00047 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\RES05\062905\21950.TXT SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

44

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:56 Nov 29, 2005 Jkt 021950 PO 00000 Frm 00048 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\RES05\062905\21950.TXT SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

45

Ironically,  the  challenges  to  U.S.  domination  of  nanotechnology  are  in  part  a  re-
sult  of  our  early  support  of  nanotechnology.  The  formal  launch  of  the  NNI  in  2000
brought  the  potential  of  nanotechnology  into  the  world  consciousness  and  initiated
a  race  for  global  leadership.  As  a  result,  the  U.S.  share  of  global  government  ex-
penditures  has  dropped  since  2001,  despite  the  absolute  commitment  more  than
doubling in the same time period from $465MM to $960MM (see Figure 6).

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:56 Nov 29, 2005 Jkt 021950 PO 00000 Frm 00049 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\RES05\062905\21950.TXT SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

46

Not  surprisingly,  the  growth  in  foreign  investment  in  nanotechnology  R&D  has
helped  other  nations  to  gain  ground  in  the  development  of  new  knowledge,  innova-
tions and the production of human capital (see Figure 7).

Of  particular  competitive  concern  is  China.  The  Scientist,  an  American  academic
journal, said that from January to August 2004 China had presented 3,621 research
papers  on  nanotechnology,  more  than  any  other  country,  as  tabulated  by  the  Sci-
entific Citation Index. According to the article, China published 14 percent more pa-
pers  than  the  United  States  in  that  time  period.  Furthermore,  China  currently  has
more than 3,000 researchers who are engaged in related programs and has had se-
ries of innovative achievements according to the Director of China’s National Center
for  Nanoscience  and  Technology  and  the  Vice  President  of  the  Chinese  Academy  of
Sciences.

While  knowledge  development  and  nanoscience  R&D  create  value,  it  is  through
the commercialization of nanotechnology into new processes and products that busi-
nesses will create jobs and nations will see a return on their investments.

According  to  the  NanoBusiness  Alliance’s  proprietary  database  on  all  companies
involved  with  nanotechnology  worldwide,  a  little  over  50  percent  of  the  companies
are in the United States (613 of 1,175). However, if one is to believe the announce-
ments  made  at  the  ChinaNano2005  trade  expo  that  China  has  almost  800  compa-
nies involved with nanotechnology and a recent EU report claiming that Europe has
500,  the  share  would  appear  to  be  significantly  lower.  Unfortunately,  it  is  notori-
ously difficult to track commercial developments in nanotechnology, so we cannot be
precisely sure.

However,  the  rate  of  formation  of  new  nanotech  start-ups  over  the  past  several

years has been relatively stagnant (see Figure 8).

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:56 Nov 29, 2005 Jkt 021950 PO 00000 Frm 00050 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\RES05\062905\21950.TXT SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

47

This  is,  perhaps,  one  of  the  most  disconcerting  indicators  for  nanotechnology  in
the U.S. The entrepreneurial culture and deployment of risk capital, especially ven-
ture capital, toward early stage technology companies has been a key source of com-
petitive  advantage  for  the  United  States.  This  historic  advantage  appears  to  be  at
risk.

Although  we  lead  in  the  number  of  nanotechnology  startups,  these  startups  need
risk capital to bring these nanotechnology innovations to market. The so called ‘‘val-
ley  of  death,’’  the  period  between  a  company’s  formation  and  its  achieving  signifi-
cant  cash  flow,  is  particularly  acute  for  nanotechnology.  Most  nanotech  innovations
require significant investment and ‘‘platform’’ development before any revenues can
be  generated  because  they  are  based  upon  fundamental  breakthroughs  in  basic  re-
search  at  universities  and  federal  labs.  Burned  by  the  dot  com  bubble  and  needing
to  raise  IRR’s  in  order  to  raise  the  next  fund,  VC’s  have  been  shying  away  from
‘‘platform’’  technologies  without  near-term  commercialization  processes  and  end
market  economics.  In  fact,  the  total  VC  financing  over  the  past  seven  years  is  ap-
proximately  the  same  as  the  U.S.  Government  investment  in  2004  (see  Figure  9).

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:56 Nov 29, 2005 Jkt 021950 PO 00000 Frm 00051 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\RES05\062905\21950.TXT SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

48

Furthermore,  the  investment  to  date  has  been  highly  concentrated  in  a  few,  ma-

ture nanotech companies.

Highlighting  this  trend,  almost  all  of  the  venture  capital  that  went  to  nanotech
companies  in  the  first  quarter  of  2005  was  placed  into  four  companies,  NanoTex
($33MM), Nanomix ($17MM), Nantero ($17MM), and NanoOpto ($12MM).

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:56 Nov 29, 2005 Jkt 021950 PO 00000 Frm 00052 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\RES05\062905\21950.TXT SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

49

While  leading  Fortune  500  companies  have  nanotechnology  initiatives  and  some
funding for R&D, most have scaled back their early stage research and development
in response to stock market pressure for near-term profitability and reducing costs.
Many  companies  plan  to  ‘‘innovate  through  acquisition,’’  relying  upon  start-ups  to
develop  and  commercialize  innovations.  This  further  expands  the  ‘‘valley  of  death’’
since  companies  are  looking  for  startups  to  have  developed  their  technologies  far
enough  for  ease  of  integration.  It  also  means  that  more  than  ever  start-ups  rep-
resent  the  product  pipeline  for  large  corporations,  and  that  their  successful  forma-
tion  is  key  not  only  to  creating  new  prosperity,  but  continuing  our  existing  pros-
perity.

Until the VC cycle changes again and the stock markets allow companies to adopt
longer time horizons, we have a substantial and growing ‘‘valley of death.’’ Since the
market  is  not  prepared  to  take  on  this  risk,  the  government  needs  to  develop  pro-
grams to bridge this gulf.

Given the current landscape, there are a few key initiatives that the Federal Gov-
ernment  can  take  to  revitalize  nanotechnology  commercialization  here  and  bolster
our global lead.

The federal investment in infrastructure and user facilities is part of the solution.
These  facilities,  in  theory,  provide  access  to  critical  and  expensive  equipment,  and
reduce  the  capital  intensity  of  nanotech  commercialization  activity.  However,  many
nanotech start-ups lack the process knowledge and internal capabilities to make ef-
fective  use  of  these  investments.  The  government  must  also  ensure  sufficient  oper-
ating funds to provide services and train the start-ups, or the assets will be under-
utilized and the investment will not generate the return we expect.

The U.S. Government must be the ‘‘gold standard’’ as the most hospitable climate
for commercializing nanotech innovations. We must lead in the development of new
nanotech  knowledge  and  research  infrastructure.  As  such,  our  share  of  worldwide
government investment should be at least on par with our share of global GDP.

We  should  establish  goal-oriented  research  programs  to  address  our  grand  chal-
lenges.  While  much  fundamental  research  remains  to  be  done,  we  should  endeavor
to do it to the extent possible within the context of its potential uses. The National
Cancer  Institute’s  Centers  for  Cancer  Nanotechnology  Excellence  (CCNEs)  provide
a  model  for  this.  To  quote  the  recent  solicitation,  ‘‘The  CCNEs  will  be  a  national
resource that will integrate nanotechnology development into basic and applied can-
cer  research  to  facilitate  the  rapid  application  of  this  science  in  the  clinic.  This  ini-
tiative will catalyze targeted discovery and development efforts that offer the great-
est opportunity for advances in the near- and medium-terms and will lower the bar-
riers for those advances to be translated to the private sector for commercial devel-
opment.’’  The  NCI  has  established  clear  objectives  without  constraining  how  to  get
achieve  them,  and  thus  the  creativity  of  the  scientists  pursuing  the  research.  This
model should be emulated and extended in other agencies and strategic investment
areas.

Next,  the  government  must  fully  and  effectively  utilize  the  SBIR  and  ATP  pro-
grams to enhance commercialization activity. Many member companies speak of the
‘‘myth’’  of  the  SBIR  Phase  III—the  phase  where  innovations  proved  out  in  Phase
II  are  supposed  to  be  brought  into  use  in  the  sponsoring  agency.  While  the  SBIR
grants in and of themselves are quite valuable to those attempting to commercialize
nanotech innovations, purchases to meet agency needs would generate a sustainable
source of revenues and provide customer validation. Furthermore, this would ensure
that our agencies, particularly Defense and Homeland Security, remain ahead of the
world in terms of nanotech integration capabilities.

The ATP program, although controversial, provides one of the only sources of cap-
ital  (and  thus  incentives)  for  new  nanotech  innovation  ecosystems  to  form,  particu-
larly between U.S. startups and incumbents. If we are to retain jobs in our existing
companies  and  industries,  then  we  will  need  to  integrate  the  innovations  of
nanotech  start-ups  into  these  sectors  rapidly.  Without  incentives  to  form  domestic
partnerships, the value from our nation’s investment may be disproportionately cap-
tured by foreign companies and governments with patient capital who partner with
cash strapped U.S. startups.

However  much  the  government  can  do  directly,  in  the  end,  the  greatest  leverage
will  be  achieved  by  creating  stronger  incentives  for  the  private  sector  to  invest  and
aggressively participate in the commercialization process. To that end, we should in-
vestigate establishing a permanent R&D tax credit and possibly create new vehicles
like the R&D Limited Partnerships that were instrumental in biotech capital forma-
tion.  These  will  unlock  not  only  more  of  the  potential  of  nanotech,  but  of  all  tech-
nology-driven industries.

In closing, all technological progress depends first and foremost upon human cap-
ital.  We  must  adopt  an  integrated  human  capital  strategy  spanning  multiple  time

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:56 Nov 29, 2005 Jkt 021950 PO 00000 Frm 00053 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\RES05\062905\21950.TXT SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

50

horizons.  In  the  near-term,  we  must  encourage  the  best  and  brightest  to  come  to
the  U.S.,  help  build  out  our  knowledge  base,  and  transform  nanotech  inventions  to
innovations that touch our daily lives. This will mean streamlining immigration re-
quirements  for  ‘‘knowledge’’  and  highly  skilled  workers  so  that  we  not  only  attract
but retain these workers as citizens. In the medium-term, we must greatly strength-
en  our  job  training  programs.  In  the  longer-term,  we  must  dramatically  strengthen
the  science  and  technology  education  system,  the  ultimate  investment  in  our  com-
mercial future.

BIOGRAPHY FOR SEAN MURDOCK

Prior  to  becoming  the  Executive  Director  of  the  NanoBusiness  Alliance,  he  was
the  Executive  Director  and  a  founding  board  member  of  AtomWorks,  an  initiative
formed  to  foster  nanotechnology  in  Illinois  and  more  broadly  throughout  the  Mid-
west.

Sean has established himself as a leading thinker in the areas of nanotechnology
commercialization and economic development. He has delivered keynote speeches on
the commercialization of nanotechnology at several nanotechnology conferences, and
served  as  Co-Chair  for  the  Commercialization  Focused  NanoCommerce  2003  Con-
ference  and  Trade  Show.  Sean  has  been  quoted  extensively  on  the  subject  in  many
leading  publications  including  Fortune,  The  Economist,  the  Chicago  Tribune,  the
Chicago Sun-Times, and Small Times.

Sean  has  been  very  active  in  nanotechnology  trade  and  economic  development
issues.  He  helped  to  organize  and  execute  the  first  Nanotechnology  Trade  Mission
to Europe in conjunction with the NanoBusiness Alliance and the U.S. Department
of Commerce. He has also been engaged with senior officials of the U.S. Department
of  Commerce’s  Technology  Administration  on  the  potential  impact  of  export  control
issues on nanotechnology development and commercialization.

Prior  to  founding  AtomWorks  and  serving  as  the  Executive  Director  of  the
NanoBusiness Alliance, Sean had more than seven years experience in management
consulting,  most  recently  as  Engagement  Manager  at  McKinsey  &  Company.  Sean
served  a  variety  of  Fortune  500  companies,  focusing  primarily  upon  the  industrial
and  chemicals  sectors.  While  there,  he  developed  some  of  the  firm’s  early  perspec-
tive  on  the  business  opportunities  created  by  the  nanotech  revolution,  publishing
the first two internal documents on the subject.

Sean received his Master’s in Business Administration and Master’s in Engineer-
ing  Management  from  Northwestern  University.  He  holds  a  BA  in  Economics  from
the University of Notre Dame.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:56 Nov 29, 2005 Jkt 021950 PO 00000 Frm 00054 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\RES05\062905\21950.TXT SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

51

Chairman INGLIS. Thank you, Mr. Murdock. Mr. O’Connor.

STATEMENT  OF  JIM  O’CONNOR,  VICE  PRESIDENT,  TECH-
NOLOGY  INCUBATION  AND  COMMERCIALIZATION,  MOTOR-
OLA, INC.
Mr.  O’CONNOR.  Chairman  Inglis,  Ranking  Member  Hooley,  and
Members  of  the  Subcommittee,  fellow  panelists,  good  morning.  I
want to thank you for inviting me to share Motorola’s thoughts on
where  the  United  States  stands  competitively  and  innovatively
when  it  comes  to  the  subject  of  nanoscience  and  nanotechnologies.
As  the  Vice  President  for  Technology  Commercialization  at  one
of  America’s  largest  preeminent  technology  companies,  I  am  hon-
ored  to  represent  Motorola’s  24,000  research  scientists  and  engi-
neers  before  this  distinguished  panel  that  time  and  again  stands
up  and  fights  for  the  complex,  fast  moving  technology  world  and
the ever-growing high tech industry.

Today, as we consider the recent report by the President’s Coun-
cil  of  Advisors  on  Science  and  Technology  on  the  National
Nanotechnology  Initiative  at  Five  Years,  I  will  use  it  to  give  you
a snapshot of where we stand in relation to our global competitors.
I  also  want  to  provide  you  some  insights  on  how  Motorola  is  trail-
blazing  the  nanotechnology  frontier  with  breakthrough  sciences
and commercial applications.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:56 Nov 29, 2005 Jkt 021950 PO 00000 Frm 00055 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\RES05\062905\21950.TXT SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

52

While  the  National  Nanotechnology  Initiative  is  a  relatively
young  concept,  those  of  us  in  the  research  and  development  com-
munity  know  the  basic  science  for  its  foundation,  and  have  been
around for many years. As the PCAST Report states, scientists and
engineers anticipate that nanotechnology will lead to materials and
systems  with  dramatic  new  properties  relevant  to  virtually  every
sector  of  the  economy,  such  as  medicine,  telecommunications,  and
computers,  and  lastly,  to  areas  of  national  interest  such  as  home-
land security.

And  because  of  the  strong  commitment  from  the  Congress  and
those in the Administration who understand these societal benefits,
the U.S. has surged to the forefront of nanotechnology research and
development,  ahead  of  Europe,  ahead  of  Asia,  ahead  of  all  other
competing nations around the globe.

Generally  speaking,  this  rise  to  prominence  has  been  through
good  old  American  collaboration.  Thanks  to  public-private  partner-
ships  between  Federal  and  State  governments,  business  and  aca-
demia,  our  nanotechnology  position  has  become  quite  strong.  For
instance,  Motorola  today  can  leverage  researched  performed  in  a
number  of  our  nation’s  esteemed  universities,  such  as  U.C.  Berke-
ley  on  better  nanotubes  and  nanowires,  Harvard  on  fabricating
nonvolatile  electronic  memory  using  nanotubes,  and  lastly,  Stan-
ford on two particular projects, one to use synthesis technology for
biological and chemical sensors and field emission devices, and the
other, to build up a portfolio of nanodots, nanotubes, and nanowires
for more enhanced electronics.

And  while  Motorola  is  still  a  few  weeks  away  from  officially  an-
nouncing it, I am proud to inform this distinguished panel that this
summer, Motorola is launching the Center for Interdisciplinary Re-
search  on  Nanotechnology  with  Arizona  State  University.  This
strong  partnership  between  university  and  industry  will  promote
nanotechnology,  education,  research,  and  commercialization.  ASU
will advance the state of the art in nanotechnology for communica-
tions, while Motorola will use basic and applied technologies to de-
velop  useful  and  innovative  products  and  services  for  American
consumers,  better  mobile  devices,  equipment,  and  high  frequency
applications.

But  the  private  sector  partnering  with  academia  could  not  do  it
alone.  We  are  grateful  for  federal  support  through  grants  as  well
as  research  and  development  tax  credits.  To  further  illustrate  the
high  tech  industry’s  importance  to  our  economy  in  terms  of  re-
search, sales, and exports, America is at the vanguard in the num-
ber  of  startup  companies  based  on  nanotechnology,  as  some  of  the
panelists  have  spoken.  We  also  lead  the  world  in  research  output.
To  fully  understand  the  zeal  to  get  a  competitive  edge  in  the
global  market,  let  us  look  at  Asia.  While  some  of  these  Far  East
nations  may  not  be  spending  as  much  money  as  the  U.S.  is  today,
they  are  being  very  strategic  by  choosing  to  concentrate  their  in-
vestments  in  particular  areas  in  order  to  make  significant  strides
sooner in a specific sector. For example, Korea and Taiwan are in-
vesting  heavily  in  nanoelectronics,  while  Singapore  and  China  are
focusing nanobiotechnology and nanomaterials respectively.

Mr. Chairman, you may be wondering why is a continued federal
commitment to nanotech so important? Let me answer it this way.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:56 Nov 29, 2005 Jkt 021950 PO 00000 Frm 00056 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\RES05\062905\21950.TXT SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

53

Nanotechnology  research  holds  tremendous  potential  for  stimu-
lating innovation, and its revolutionary applications will enable the
U.S.  to  maintain  our  global  leadership  in  industries  that  span
many  sectors.  That  is  as  long  as  our  public  policies  don’t  ease  off
the  pedal  of  momentum  or  slam  on  the  brakes  of  critical  funding
or R&D tax initiatives altogether. And don’t worry. The private sec-
tor  will  not  abandon  this  effort  either.  We  are  in  it  for  the  long
haul in a partnership atmosphere.

For  instance,  in  addition  to  Motorola’s  efforts,  IBM,  Intel,  Du-
Pont, and NEC have kicked off major nanotechnology efforts. These
breakthroughs  make  life  simpler,  safer,  and  more  enjoyable.  And
remember, we are simply on the cusp of much, much more to come,
new advances, and more challenges.

However, there are bumps in the road ahead. You have probably
seen  reports  on  the  shortage  of  Americans  skilled  in  science  and
technology.  The  U.S.  is  slipping  behind  our  competitors,  Asia  in
particular,  in  undergraduate  and  graduate  training.  At  Motorola,
we have found that every day we go into the marketplace searching
for  highly  skilled  workers,  demand  far  outpaces  supply,  and  this
challenge seems to get worse as each month passes. It further illus-
trates  another  important  component  to  the  global  competition  in
the high tech industry. We are no longer competing against Europe
and  Asia  in  developing  better  products,  but  also  in  trying  to  lure
and secure basic workforce needs.

Simply put, we must have a well educated talent pool to survive.
Therefore,  Motorola  strongly  supports  the  PCAST  Report  rec-
ommendation  that  the  NNI  establish  relationships  with  the  De-
partment of Education and Labor to develop education and training
systems, to improve the Nation’s technical proficiency in the STEM
fields of science, technology, engineering, and math.

Life-changing  dreams  are  becoming  a  reality  in  our  nation’s
nanotechnology  labs.  We  must  press  forward  in  a  coordinated,  col-
laborative  fashion  between  Federal  and  State  governments,  busi-
nesses  in  the  private  sector  and  our  academic  institutions.  We
must  go  full  speed  ahead  on  the  nanotechnology  express  lane,  to
boost our economy and our citizens’ quality of life.

Thank  you  for  listening.  I  will  be  happy  to  take  any  questions.
[The prepared statement of Mr. O’Connor follows:]

PREPARED STATEMENT OF JIM O’CONNOR

Chairman  Inglis,  Ranking  Member  Hooley,  our  homestate  Illinois  Congressmen
Johnson  and  Lipinski,  and  Members  of  the  Subcommittee,  good  morning.  I  want  to
thank you for inviting me to share Motorola’s thoughts on where the United States
stands  competitively  and  innovatively  when  it  comes  to  the  subject  of  nanoscience
and nanotechnologies.

As the Vice President for IP Incubation & Commercialization at America’s largest
cell  phone  manufacturer,  I  am  honored  to  represent  Motorola’s  24,000  research  sci-
entists and engineers before this distinguished panel that time and again stands up
and fights for the complex, fast-moving technology world and the ever-growing high-
tech industry.

Today, as we consider the recent report by the President’s Council of Advisors on
Science and Technology (PCAST) on The National Nanotechnology Initiative at Five
Years, I will use it to give you a snapshot of where we stand in relation to our global
competitors.  I  also  want  to  provide  you  some  insights  on  how  Motorola  is  trail-
blazing the nanotechnology frontier with breakthrough sciences and commercial ap-
plications.

While the National Nanotechnology Initiative (NNI) is a relatively young concept,
those  of  us  in  the  research  and  development  community  know  the  basic  science  for

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:56 Nov 29, 2005 Jkt 021950 PO 00000 Frm 00057 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\RES05\062905\21950.TXT SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

54

its  foundation  has  been  around  for  years.  As  the  PCAST  Report  states:  Scientists
and  engineers  anticipate  that  nanotechnology  will  lead  to  ‘‘materials  and  systems
with  dramatic  new  properties  relevant  to  virtually  every  sector  of  the  economy,  such
as  medicine,  telecommunications,  and  computers,  and  to  areas  of  national  interest
such as Homeland Security.’’

And because of a strong commitment from the Congress and those in the Adminis-
tration who understand these societal benefits, the U.S. has surged to the forefront
of  nanotechnology  research  and  development—ahead  of  Europe,  ahead  of  Asia,
ahead of all other competing nations around the globe.

Generally  speaking,  this  rise  to  prominence  has  been  through  good  old  American
collaboration. Thanks to public-private partnerships between Federal and State gov-
ernments,  business  and  academia,  our  nanotechnology  position  has  become  strong.
For instance, Motorola can leverage research performed in a number of our nation’s
esteemed universities, such as:

• U.C. Berkeley on better Nano-Tubes and Nano-Wires;
• Harvard on fabricating nonvolatile electronic memory using Nano-Tubes; and,
• Stanford  on  two  projects:  one  to  use  synthesis  technology  for  biological  and
chemical  sensors  and  field  emission  devices;  the  other  to  build  up  a  portfolio
of Nano-Dots, Nano-Tubes and Nano-Wires for more enhanced electronics.

And  while  Motorola  is  still  a  few  weeks  away  from  officially  announcing  it,  I  am
proud  to  inform  this  distinguished  panel  that  this  summer  Motorola  is  launching
the  Center  for  Interdisciplinary  Research  on  Nanotechnology  with  Arizona  State
University.  This  strong  partnership  between  university  and  industry  will  promote
nanotechnology  education,  research  and  commercialization.  ASU  will  advance  the
‘‘state  of  the  art’’  in  nanotechnology  for  communications,  while  Motorola  will  use
basic  and  applied  technologies  to  develop  useful  and  innovative  products  and  serv-
ices for American consumers—better mobile devices, equipment and high frequency
applications.

But,  the  private-sector  partnering  with  academia  could  not  do  it  alone.  We  are
grateful for federal support through grants as well as research and development tax
credits.

The PCAST Report states: the U.S. Government this year will spend just over $1
billion  on  Nano  R&D.  To  put  this  in  perspective,  $1  billion  is  roughly  one-quarter
of  the  current  global  investment  by  all  nations.  And  when  you  combine  federal,
State  and  private  U.S.  dollars,  our  overall  investment  jumps  to  $3  billion,  or  one-
third  of  the  estimated  $9  billion  in  total  worldwide  spending  by  the  public  and  pri-
vate sectors combined on Nano R&D.

To further illustrate the high-tech industry’s importance to our economy in terms
of  jobs,  research,  sales,  and  exports,  America  is  at  the  vanguard  in  the  number  of
start-up  companies  based  on  nanotechnology.  We  also  lead  the  world  in  research
output as measured by patents and publications—as you can imagine, this number-
one  position  is  very  important  to  Motorola  today  and  will  continue  to  be  important
for our competitive growth in the future.

For  example,  Motorola  is  near  commercialization  on  the  first  of  its  kind  5-inch
color  video  flatscreen  using  Carbon  Nanotube  technology.  This  Nano  Emissive  Dis-
play  technology,  which  provides  much  brighter  and  thinner  flat  panel  displays,  is
now available for licensing. Motorola expects this breakthrough technique could cre-
ate larger flat panel displays with superior quality, longer lifetimes and lower costs
to consumers than current products in the competitive video display market.

While that’s the good news, the PCAST Report highlights there are some pressing
challenges that threaten our leadership position in the global economy. Specifically,
the  relative  lead  the  U.S.  currently  holds  is  in  jeopardy  because  the  rest  of  the
world  is  catching  up  in  a  variety  of  measurements.  In  government  funding,  for  ex-
ample,  the  rate  of  increase  in  the  European  Union  and  Asia  is  higher  than  that  of
the U.S. This should be a wake-up call for American researchers and policy-makers
alike.

For  instance,  the  EU  announced  this  month  the  adoption  of  a  Nanosciences/
Nanotechnology  Action  Plan  for  Europe  for  2005-2009.  Their  plan  proposes  meas-
ures to be taken at the national and European level to strengthen research and de-
velop useful products and services so that Europe can maintain its competitive edge
in the global economy.

In the EU, much work is being leveraged through consortia efforts which promote
partnering  between  companies  and  universities.  And,  Japan  has  had  over  20  years
of  commitment  to  nanotechnology  through  funding  of  broad  and  focused  national
programs.  Furthermore,  China  now  has  over  twice  as  many  engineers  working  in

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:56 Nov 29, 2005 Jkt 021950 PO 00000 Frm 00058 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\RES05\062905\21950.TXT SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

55

nanotechnology  than  the  U.S.  does  because  it’s  been  identified  there,  as  a  ‘‘govern-
ment initiative.’’

To  fully  understand  the  zeal  to  get  a  competitive  edge  in  the  global  market,  let’s
look at Asia in general. While some of these Far East nations may not be spending
as  much  money  as  the  U.S.  is  today,  they  are  being  very  strategic  by  choosing  to
concentrate  their  investments  in  particular  areas  in  order  to  make  significant
strides  sooner  in  a  specific  sector.  For  example,  Korea  and  Taiwan  are  investing
heavily  in  Nano-Electronics  while  Singapore  and  China  are  focusing  on  Nano-Bio-
technology and Nano-Materials respectively.

Mr. Chairman, you may be wondering:

• Why is a continued federal commitment to nanotech so important?
• Why  should  the  American  taxpayer  invest  so  much  in  the  global  race  over

• And maybe most importantly, what are the actual benefits of nanotechnology

nano R&D?

to American consumers?

Let me answer this way: nanotechnology research holds tremendous potential for
stimulating  innovation.  Its  revolutionary  applications  will  enable  the  U.S.  to  main-
tain  our  global  leadership  in  industries  that  span  all  sectors.  That’s  as  long  as  our
public  policies  don’t  ease  off  the  pedal  of  momentum  or  slam  on  the  brakes  on  crit-
ical  funding  or  R&D  tax  initiatives  altogether.  And  don’t  worry,  the  private  sector
will not abandon this effort either—we’re in it for the long haul.

For  instance,  a  few  large  multinational  companies  such  as  IBM,  Intel,  DuPont
and NEC have kicked off major nanotechnology efforts. My company, Motorola, con-
tinues to rebuild, retool, and consolidate our nanotechnology programs. In addition,
as I mentioned earlier, the number of nano start-ups in the U.S. has increased sig-
nificantly due to heavy private sector venture capital investing.

However,  I  want  to  be  candid.  One  of  the  biggest  challenges  before  research  sci-
entists and engineers—those not necessarily known for their communication skills—
is  being  able  to  relate  to  the  American  people  what’s  actually  going  on  in  nanotech
labs.

This morning, I’d like to give it a shot by using a very popular Motorola product—

the mobile phone.

cumbersome it used to be?

When  Motorola  launched  the  1st  cell  phone,  do  you  remember  how  bulky  and

Well,  thanks  to  cutting-edge  research  utilizing  nanotechnology  principles  at  Mo-
torola  labs,  tomorrow  your  mobile  phone  can  have  better  optics,  better  acoustics,
and  better  displays,  more  efficient  batteries,  and  overall  enriched  electronics  in  a
very small form factor.

Specifically, Nano-Composites can make today’s cell phones structurally stronger,
but  physically  smaller  and  lighter.  Nano-Displays  are  larger,  brighter  and  cost  less
due  to  embedded  carbon  nanotubes,  and  Nano-Power  can  give  this  light-weight
phone higher capacity power sources for storage and conversion.

Let me be as clear as possible: if the Internet improved our quality of life via the
Information  Superhighway,  then  nanotechnology  should  be  considered  the  Express
Lane for future technological breakthroughs to make our lives simpler, safer, smart-
er  and  more  enjoyable.  And  please  remember,  we  are  simply  on  the  cusp  of  much,
much more to come—new advances and more challenges.

For  instance,  understanding  the  societal  implications  of  nanotechnology—includ-
ing  ethical,  economic,  and  legal  issues—will  still  need  to  be  confronted  and  ad-
dressed in the future, and the NNI must work harder and more consistently to bet-
ter educate our fellow citizens about the wonders of nanotechnology.

And  talking  about  education,  there  have  been  many  recent  reports  on  the  short-
age  of  American  workers  skilled  in  science  and  technology.  The  U.S.  is  slipping  be-
hind  our  competitors—Asia  in  particular—in  undergraduate  and  graduate  training.
At  Motorola,  we  have  found  that  everyday  we  go  into  the  marketplace  searching
for  highly  skilled  workers,  demand  far  outpaces  supply,  and  this  challenge  seems
to  get  worse  as  each  month  passes.  It  further  illustrates  another  important  compo-
nent to the global competition we’re witnessing in the high-tech industry. No longer
is  this  just  about  a  company’s  business  demand  to  develop  better  products  against
Europe  and  Asia,  but  about  American  companies  increasingly  under  pressure  to
compete against our rivals when trying to secure our basic workforce needs. Simply
put, we must have a well-educated talent pool to survive.

Therefore,  Motorola  supports  the  PCAST  Report’s  recommendation  that  the  NNI
establish  relationships  with  the  Departments  of  Education  and  Labor  to  develop
education  and  training  systems  to  improve  the  Nation’s  technical  proficiency  in

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:56 Nov 29, 2005 Jkt 021950 PO 00000 Frm 00059 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\RES05\062905\21950.TXT SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

56

areas  related  to  science,  technology,  engineering  and  math—better  known  as  the
STEM fields.

In addition, immigration policies have to be set to allow, at least in the near-term,
U.S.  trained  graduates  from  foreign  countries  to  stay  and  work  here  and  in  the
longer-term,  a  steady  influx  of  new  foreign  students  to  come  to  the  U.S.  for  their
education.

On  top  of  much-needed  talent  to  work  inside  our  labs,  Motorola  also  believes
there’s  a  need  for  external  funds  to  boost  the  physical  infrastructure  to  foster  and
maintain long-term research. I’d suggest this be a combination of direct funding and
R&D tax credits to the nanotechnology labs.

As far as innovation and patenting are concerned, Motorola believes corporate in-
vestment in nanotech is very product focused. The scope of research must be longer-
term.  In  fact,  long-term  funding  could  actually  enhance  the  speed  and  number  of
patents that are awarded and help ensure that America retains its global leadership
position.

And  our  competitive  edge  isn’t  just  about  what  the  Federal  or  State  government
should  be  doing.  We,  as  an  industry,  must  look  inside  our  own  operations  and  see
how we can do better. For instance, Motorola needs to take further steps to commu-
nicate with and establish links to further facilitate technology transfer from the lab
to the marketplace.

As  I  close,  the  commercialization  of  nanotechnology  does  not  necessarily  depend
upon  the  creation  of  new  products—such  as  stain-resistant,  wrinkle-free  pants,  or
even  new,  emerging  markets—like  those  more  superior  flat-panel  displays  using
Carbon Nanotubes being developed by Motorola researchers as we speak.

Gains  can  come  from  incorporating  nanotechnology  into  existing  products,  result-
ing in new and improved versions of these products. Just imagine: faster computers,
lighter  materials  for  aircraft,  less  invasive  ways  to  treat  cancer,  and  more  efficient
ways to store and transport electricity.

Life-changing  dreams  are  becoming  reality  in  our  nation’s  nanotechnology  labs.
We must press forward in a coordinated, collaborative fashion between Federal and
State  governments,  businesses  in  the  private  sector,  and  our  academic  institutions.
Simply  put,  we  must  go  full  speed  ahead  on  the  Nanotechnology  Express  Lane  to
boost our economy and our citizens’ quality of life.

Thank you for listening. I will be happy to take any questions.

BIOGRAPHY FOR JIM O’CONNOR

Jim  O’Connor  is  Vice  President  of  Technology  Incubation  and  Commercialization
at  Motorola.  In  this  role,  Jim’s  operational  responsibilities  include  working  closely
with a global team of 4,600 technologists, prioritizing technology programs, creating
value  from  intellectual  property,  guiding  creative  research  from  innovation  through
early-stage commercialization, and influencing standards and roadmaps. Previous to
this role, Jim was Managing Director and co-founder of Motorola Ventures, the cor-
porate venture capital investment arm of Motorola, Inc. This role included active re-
view  of  investments  and  management  of  the  global  minority  equity  opportunities
strategic to Motorola’s core and emerging businesses. During this time, Jim oversaw
the  creation  of  investment  operations  in  Silicon  Valley,  Europe,  Israel  and  China.
He  led  Motorola’s  investment  into  4th  Pass,  Mesh  Networks,  Foundstone,  Xtreme
Spectrum and Bitfone.

He  co-founded  Motorola  Ventures  in  September  1999  following  a  year  of  service
in  the  U.S.  Government  as  a  White  House  Fellow  appointed  by  President  William
Jefferson  Clinton.  He  was  chosen  by  and  served  his  assignment  through  Treasury
Secretaries Robert Rubin and Larry Summers. During his time at the Treasury De-
partment,  he  was  responsible  for  coordinating  strategies  on  domestic  financial  pol-
icy,  electronic  commerce  and  community  development  policy.  Prior  to  his  public
service,  Jim  worked  as  a  Management  Consultant  with  the  global  management
consultancy  A.T.  Kearney  out  of  Chicago  where  he  focused  on  strategic  and  oper-
ational  issues  with  Fortune  100  companies.  Jim  received  his  BA  and  JD  from
Georgetown  University  where  he  lettered  in  crew  and  football  and  was  named  an
East  Coast  Athletic  Conference  (ECAC)  All-Star  and  GTE  Academic  All-American.
He received his MBA from the J.L. Kellogg Graduate School of Management where
he received the Dean’s Award for Outstanding Achievement.

Jim was named a Henry Crown Leadership Fellow by the Aspen Institute in 2004,
a United States–Japan Leadership fellow in 2000 and a Leadership Greater Chicago
Fellow  in  2000.  Jim  remains  active  in  the  local  Chicago  community  as  Co-Chair  of
the  Chicagoland  Entrepreneurial  Center,  which  is  a  national  model  for  public-pri-
vate partnerships that are established to assist entrepreneurs. He is a Board Mem-
ber  of  the  Chicagoland  Chamber  of  Commerce.  Jim  is  also  the  founder  of  Kellogg

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:56 Nov 29, 2005 Jkt 021950 PO 00000 Frm 00060 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\RES05\062905\21950.TXT SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

57

Corps, a non-profit entrepreneurial program at the Northwestern J.L. Kellogg Grad-
uate School of Management whose mission is to bring management expertise to non-
profit  organizations  in  developing  countries.  In  addition,  Jim  is  an  Advisory  Board
Member of the J.L. Kellogg Graduate School of Management. He serves as an Advi-
sory  Board  Member  of  the  NanoBusiness  Alliance,  the  preeminent  nanotechnology
public policy organization in the United States. He founded the Field Associates, the
Field  Museum’s  young  professional  Board,  as  well  as  the  Lyric  Opera  Auxiliary
Board,  the  Lyric  Opera’s  young  professional  Board.  Jim  also  serves  on  the  Board
for  the  Children’s  Home  &  Aid  Society,  the  Chicago  Cities  in  Schools  Program
(CCIS)  as  well  as  the  Big  Shoulders  Board  for  the  Archdiocese  of  Chicago’s  inner-
city  school  fund.  He  was  awarded  the  Motorola  CEO  Award  for  Volunteerism  in
2002.  He  was  awarded  the  Motorola  CEO  Award  for  Outstanding  Achievement  in
2004.  He  is  a  member  of  the  American  Bar  Association,  the  Economic  Club  of  Chi-
cago and Executive Club of Chicago.

Jim lives in Wilmette, Illinois with his wife, Julie, and their twin sons.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:56 Nov 29, 2005 Jkt 021950 PO 00000 Frm 00061 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\RES05\062905\21950.TXT SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

58

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:56 Nov 29, 2005 Jkt 021950 PO 00000 Frm 00062 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\RES05\062905\21950.TXT SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

59

DISCUSSION

Chairman INGLIS. Thank you, Mr. O’Connor. I will recognize my-

self for a first round of questions here.

Over the last several weeks, I have noticed several articles about
environmental  issues  associated  with  nanotechnology.  Maybe  they
were there before, and maybe it is just because of the last hearing
that  I  started  noticing  them.  But  Mr.  Nordan,  you  mentioned  the
regulatory  uncertainty  about  environmental  regulation  in  the  area
of  nanotechnology.  What  do  you  think  is  driving  those  stories?  I
mean,  are  there  real  concerns  out  there  about  the  environmental
impacts  of  these,  or  is  that  mostly  a  health  and  safety  issue,  as  in
workers exposed to materials. Comment on that, if you would.

Mr.  NORDAN.  Well,  it  is  a  complex  topic.  It  doesn’t  easily  reduce
to  a  sentence  or  two,  I  am  afraid.  My  firm  just  published  a  report
on  this  particular  topic,  that  we  will  be  glad  to  make  available  to
the Committee.

The  first  cut  that  you  have  to  make  is  between  real  risks  and
perceptual  risks,  which  are  equally  important.  So,  on  one  hand,
there  are  real  risks  of  manufactured  nanoparticles,  nanotubes,
metal  oxide  nanoparticles,  fullerenes,  dendrimers.  All  of  the  build-
ing  blocks  of  nanotechnology  may  have  adverse  effects,  adverse  ef-
fects  in  high  volumes  to  manufacturers  in  an  assembly  line,  who
might  have  the  opportunity  to  encounter  large  quantities  of  them
in  an  aerosol  in  the  air,  for  example,  adverse  effects  to  consumers
at use, or adverse effects on the environment that may take a long
time to rear their heads. There is a strong belief, and you can dem-
onstrate  that  the  multiwall  nanotube  composites  that  are  already
used  in  cars,  for  example,  today,  are  in  a  situation  such  that  the
nanotubes  can’t  get  out  of  their  composite  matrix,  but  does  that
sustain  in  a  landfill  for  20,  30,  50  years?  The  answer  is  we  don’t
know right now.

So,  on  one  hand,  there  are  real  risks  that  companies  working  in
this  field  are  treating  assiduously—DuPont  is  a  good  example—
where  David  Warheit,  among  others,  has  been  a  leader  in  con-
ducting  EHS  research  on  the  real  risks  of  nanoparticles.  On  the
other  hand,  there  are  perceptual  threats,  which  are  often  written
off by participants in the field of nanotechnology as not terribly im-
portant,  but  if  you  look  at  the  genetically  modified  food  experience
in Western Europe, you can see that the belief that there might be
a threat, even when none actually exists, can choke commercializa-
tion just as real risks do. In fact, in many cases, those threats can
appear earlier, and have a broader magnitude of impact, than real
risks,  as  we  have  encountered  with  materials  like  asbestos,  have.
To this end, there are a couple of actions that I feel are relevant
at a government level. One of them is to conduct more and broader
research into the real risks of nanoparticles. It is probably a fallacy
to assume that the private sector will pick up all of the slack here.
When  it  comes  to  specific  applications,  like  carbon  nanotubes  in
displays, or in composite matrices, it is absolutely reasonable to ex-
pect that the DuPonts and GEs and Dows of the world have a vest-
ed  interest  in  their  commitment  to  shareholders  to  minimize  risk,
such  that  that  application  level  research  will  be  done.  When  it
comes  to  fundamental  research  on  the  particles  themselves,  irre-

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:56 Nov 29, 2005 Jkt 021950 PO 00000 Frm 00063 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\RES05\062905\21950.TXT SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

60

spective  of  any  specific  application,  it  is  probably  off  the  mark  to
believe  that  that  research  will  be  conducted  by  the  private  sector.
Funding  here  is  insufficient  today.  If  you  look  at  the  budget  re-
quest for the NNI for Fiscal Year 2006, only 3.7 percent of funding
is  earmarked  for  EHS  concerns.  We  believe  that  number  needs  to
be two to four times higher than it is today.

Secondly,  there  is  an  issue  about  reducing  regulatory  uncer-
tainty,  and  you  have  to  think  about  this  from  a  risk  reduction
standpoint.  Let  us  say  that  you  or  I  are  a  business  manager  at,  I
don’t know, what would a good example be, DuPont? You are look-
ing  at  introducing  a  new  insulating  material  that  involves
nanoparticles, right? And you sit down with your government rela-
tions  head,  and  start  talking  about  what  the  risks  are  here,  and
you  ask  well,  what  are  the  applicable  regimes  under  the  EPA?  Is
this a new substance that has to be registered under the Toxic Sub-
stances  Control  Act?  Is  it  going  to  be  considered  an  existent  sub-
stance  that  is  not  going  to  have  a  lengthy  approval  process?  And
the regulator looks at you and says I don’t know. They haven’t real-
ly  decided  yet.  Now,  the  lack  of  action  here  is  not  ill-intentioned
by  any  means.  The  folks  at  these  agencies  are  looking  at
nanotechnology,  and  they  don’t  want  to  introduce  firm  regulations
before all the facts are in from research.

That  said,  we  believe  that  action  is  required  at  this  point,  be-
cause  corporations  are  now  looking  at  these  opportunities,  and  are
putting  them  off  for  a  year  or  two  or  three  or  five,  until  at  least
an  indication  of  how  a  regulatory  framework  will  be  developed  is
in.  Action  is  required  here  in  order  not  to  stall  commercialization.
Chairman  INGLIS.  Mr.  Kvamme,  any  thoughts  on  that  subject
from  you,  as  well  as  this  other  thing,  the  environmental  issue,  I
have  seen  rising  up.  The  other  thing  I  have  seen  in  some  media
accounts  since  our  last  hearing—I  don’t  think  it  is  associated  with
last  hearing,  but  it  sort  of,  I  have  noticed  it  since,  is  a  little  bit  of
push back about now, we get a lot of hype on this subject, and that
is not going to change the world.

Mr.  KVAMME.  Well,  as  has  already  been  mentioned,  we  actually
spent quite a bit of time on the environmental aspects of this, and
I  had  the  pleasure  of  being  in  some  of  the  NSET  meetings  on  this
as  well,  and  I  am  very  pleased  with  the  role,  for  example,  EPA
among  others,  NIOSH,  et  cetera,  are  taking  in  those  roundtables
that are essentially monthly meetings.

The concern that we came up with was really workplace related,
as  I  mentioned  in  my  testimony.  That  is  because  of  the  raw  par-
ticles are really available there, and frankly, it is not a lot different
in  my  view,  than  what  we  had  in  the  early  days  of  the  semicon-
ductor  business,  when  we  were  working  with  the  same,  you  know,
arsene gases, and et cetera, that are not good for folks. And so, we
had  to  do  controls  in  our  workplace.  Once  that  material  was  in-
stalled in the silicon, once those nanotubes are installed in a tennis
ball  or  something  like  that,  we  are  far  less  concerned,  because  of
the technology involved there.

So,  I  would  totally  agree  that  continued  study  of  this  is  nec-
essary, because materials, the way I like to think about it is, think
about  a  Tinkertoy  set,  where  you  are  putting  molecules  together,
and  think  about  the  fact  that  it  is  a  different  material  if  the  peg

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:56 Nov 29, 2005 Jkt 021950 PO 00000 Frm 00064 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\RES05\062905\21950.TXT SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

61

goes into one different slot in that round circle. Tinkertoys probably
age  me,  or  show  my  age,  anyway.  Those  of  you  that  remember
Tinkertoys, okay. It is a different material, and you could say that
that  means  that  carbon  can  be  thousands  of  materials,  really,  and
we  have  to  be  sensitive  of  that,  particularly  in  that  construction
phase. So, on the environmental thing, like I say, I think it is most-
ly  workforce-related,  at  least  as  far  as  we  have  a  concern.  We  will
continue to look at that.

Chairman  INGLIS.  All  right.  Speaking  of  being  sensitive,  I  need
to be sensitive to the clock up here, and recognize Ms. Hooley, but
perhaps,  others  might  want  to  take  a  crack  at  that,  as  later  ques-
tions,  as  you  see  the  opportunity,  about  whether  this,  whether
nanotechnology can change the world, as I think everybody up here
is assuming it can, and you are assuming it can, and how we would
answer  people  who  say  the  other,  that  it  is  much  ado  about  noth-
ing.  I  am  not  sure  they  say  that,  but  they  have  been  sort  of  pooh
poohing  some  of  the  advances  that  could  happen.  So,  perhaps,  as
we go along, you might want to address that.

Ms. Hooley.
Ms. HOOLEY. Thank you. Thank all of you for testifying.
Do  any  of  you  have  any  experience  with  the  Advanced  Tech-
nology Program, and do you believe it is valuable and deserving of
our  continued  support?  Anyone  to  comment  on  that?  Advanced
Technology Program? Anyone?

Okay. I am going to go the next—oh, good. Mr. Murdock.
Mr. MURDOCK. I will say that while I don’t personally have expe-
rience  with  the  Advanced  Technology  Program,  there  are  many
nanotech  companies  who  ultimately  have  utilized  the  Advanced
Technology Program, from Luna Innovations in Texas, and Spectra
Biosciences, also in Texas, to name a few, and I think all would say
that  it  has  been  incredibly  helpful  for  them  in  maturing  the  tech-
nology,  and  in  specific  cases,  in  forming  partnerships  with  large
companies, who will ultimately be the channel, if you will, to mar-
ket, to commercialize these innovations.

Ms.  HOOLEY.  Okay.  Mr.  Kvamme,  and  excuse  me  for  butchering
your name many times today, your report discusses the federal role
in  commercialization  of  nanotechnology,  and  specifically  mentions
the Small Business Innovation Research and Small Business Tech-
nology  Transfer  Programs  as  sources  of  funding  for  critical  early
stages  of  technology  development.  Why  is  the  report  silent  on  the
Advanced Technology Program? Any reason for that?

Mr.  KVAMME.  Our  emphasis  on  the  commercialization  aspect,  as
you  saw  in  the  report,  was  utilizing  the  state  economic  develop-
ment agencies that exist in every single state. We had the pleasure
of  meeting  with  a  number  of  state  representatives,  and  feel  that
that is an area where there is a considerable amount of interest in
economic development. Your state of Oregon, for example——

Ms. HOOLEY. Right.
Mr.  KVAMME.—is  very,  very  active  in  this  area,  and  we  felt  that
that  close  to  home  area  for  tech  transfer  was  a  more  valuable  re-
source  to  getting  to  commercial  application  of  products  than  any-
thing  else  we  were  able  to  see.  In  fact,  it  is  larger  than  the  SBIR,
STTR  programs.  In  fact,  on  its  impact  in  the  nano  area  that,  at
least as far as we could see from our study.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:56 Nov 29, 2005 Jkt 021950 PO 00000 Frm 00065 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\RES05\062905\21950.TXT SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

62

Ms.  HOOLEY.  A  question  for  all  of  you,  and  I  know  a  couple  of
you mentioned it, talking about how do we make sure that we have
the  scientists  in  this  country  to  work  in  this  kind  of  technology?
What  is  your  question  of  what  we  do  to  interest  our  young  people
from  majoring  or  taking  advantage  of  science  and  math  courses
that are offered to them in high school, college, and so forth?

Mr. KVAMME. If I could begin on that, I——
Ms. HOOLEY. You may.
Mr.  KVAMME.—would  be  very  happy,  because  you  have  just  hit

my hot button. It is the area that concerns me most at all.

Ms. HOOLEY. It should concern all of us, yeah.
Mr. KVAMME. And we issued a report on that subject, a workforce
report,  some  several  months  ago,  and  made  a  number  of  rec-
ommendations. I think some of the most important things is to stop
looking  at  engineering,  for  example,  as  a  trade  school.  People  who
graduate with an engineering degree have learned how to do prob-
lem  solving,  analysis.  They  shouldn’t  be  considered  only  aimed  at
engineering careers any more than French majors should be aimed
at becoming Frenchmen. There is no connect there at all. An engi-
neering degree——

Ms. HOOLEY. I have never heard that before.
Mr.  KVAMME.  But  an  engineering  degree  is  a  valuable  degree,
and  we  must  make  sure  that  people  who  want  to  be  in  problem
solving  areas,  whether  they  want  to  go  into  public  policy,  or  any
other  field,  can  gain  a  lot  of  insight  into  that  by  utilizing  a  tech-
nical  degree.  So,  we  have  to  change  that  perception  that  there
aren’t  jobs  for  these  people.  I  will  remind  you  of  the  G.I.  Bill.  No-
body questions today whether the G.I. Bill was a good idea. At the
time, however, remember how controversial it was. I wasn’t exactly
around then, but I was alive.

Ms. HOOLEY. Right.
Mr.  KVAMME.  But,  you  know,  I  will  quote  the  President  of  the
University  of  Chicago  at  that  time.  ‘‘What  are  we  going  to  get?
Educated  hobos?’’  to  use  a  very  negative  term  of  the  day.  Because
he  didn’t  believe  that  an  advancement  in  technology  would  benefit
all  of  society.  We  have  to  remove  that  notion  that  we  don’t  need
more  engineers,  we  don’t  need  more  scientists,  and  it  is  prevalent.
Believe me, it is prevalent. It has to be removed.

Secondarily, I think it is unfortunate, but the facts are, a science

education is tough.

Ms. HOOLEY. It is.
Mr.  KVAMME.  And  it  is  harder  than  a  lot  of  other  things.  When
kids go away to school, we don’t have a problem with matriculating
freshmen at the Bachelor’s level. We have a problem that they drop
out  and  go  into  other  fields,  because  it  is  hard.  I  think  we  have  to
incentivize  them.  I  was,  frankly,  very  disappointed  when  Approps,
in  the  last  few  days,  dismissed  a  program  that  we  had  rec-
ommended, that I was with Secretary Spellings yesterday morning
on  this  subject,  had  asked  for  an  initial  program  to  help  fund  sci-
entific study by Bachelor’s degree students.

I  think  it  is  important  that  we  understand  that  it  is  tough,  and
if  you  want  to  call  it  bribery,  call  it  bribery,  but  keep  youngsters
in there, because they are interested in it, but it is hard. What in-
centives can we offer for them? We have a number of recommenda-

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:56 Nov 29, 2005 Jkt 021950 PO 00000 Frm 00066 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\RES05\062905\21950.TXT SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

63

tions in our report. I would be happy to supply copies of that report
also, but it is an area of great concern to us. I think it is our larg-
est area of concern, because we are entrepreneurial in this country.
We  just  need  more  bodies  to  handle  the  entrepreneurial  nature
across our economy.

Ms. HOOLEY. Anyone else want to talk about that?
Mr. NORDAN. To add to that point from the other end of the edu-
cational  spectrum,  I  know  this  is  probably  not  something  that  is
welcome by the Committee to hear, but this essentially comes down
to money, all right.

If  you  are  a  Ph.D.  student,  and  you  have  just  completed  a  doc-
toral degree, and you are now looking at doing a postdoc, and doing
an assistant professorship at a university, and moving upward, the
amount of money that you will make doing that is an order of mag-
nitude  less  than  you  will  achieve  by  taking  that  same  degree,  and
working  for  a  Wall  Street  firm,  or  a  management  consultancy,  or
something  else,  applying  your  scientific  knowledge  not  to  scientific
development, but in a professional services context.

If  the  mechanisms  through  which  we  fund  postdoctoral  degrees
and assistant professorships within state universities gave a better
cost/benefit  ratio  on  the  value  of  time  for  these  individuals,  you
would  see  more  of  them  working  to  apply  the  degrees  in  scientific
context, rather than in other ones.

That 

Ms. HOOLEY. Okay.
Mr.  MURDOCK.  There  is  also  another  lever.  I  am  sure  this  com-
mittee  often  hears  of,  you  know,  the  Sputnik  generation,  and  the
race.  And  we  need  a  clear,  compelling,  cohesive  vision  for  how
science  and  technology  can  change  the  world  around  us  in  mean-
ingful  ways.  And  that  will  motivate  people,  the  individuals  going
through the educational system, to do that.

is  one  of  the  reasons  that  we  believe,  you  know,
translational,  goal-oriented  research  should  also  be  in  the  mix.  If
you  make  the  National  Cancer  Institute’s  Center  for  Cancer
Nanotechnology  Excellence,  they  are  looking  at  trying  to  take
nanotechnology  and  bring  it  to  bear  as  rapidly  as  possible,  not  to
eliminate cancer, because that is not quite feasible, but to minimize
the  pain  and  suffering  associated  with  cancer,  and  they  have  set
a  specific  target  of  15  years  from  now.  It  is  that  kind  of  program
and activity that people can relate to that will motivate them to be
part  of  the  solution.  And  part  of  this  is,  as  Matthew  said,  motiva-
tion. There are financial levers to motivation, and there are values-
oriented levers to motivation. We need to pull on both.

Mr.  O’CONNOR.  One  last  comment  on  that.  At  Motorola,  we  take
that very seriously. We have 24,000 scientists, and we feel we have
to  make  a  committed  amount  of  dedicated  time  to  this  with  chil-
dren.  I  will  give  you  a  couple  statistics.  In  China,  for  example,  45
percent  of  the  degrees  are  engineering,  whereas  in  the  U.S.,  it  is
five percent.

Ms. HOOLEY. Forty-five percent?
Mr. O’CONNOR. That is correct. And that is not uncommon to see
that  in  some  of  our  international  partners.  Another  statistic  that
is  of  interest  is  there  is  a  group  called  the  International  Science
Engineering  Fair,  in  which  there  are  600,000  U.S.  students  that

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:56 Nov 29, 2005 Jkt 021950 PO 00000 Frm 00067 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\RES05\062905\21950.TXT SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

64

participate.  There  are  six  million  students  in  China  that  partici-
pate.

So,  I  think  there  has  to  be  a  concerted  effort  across  the  public
and private sector to address this issue, and different nonprofit or-
ganizations and large companies need to make a dedicated commit-
ment,  if  we  really  want  to  get  to  that  supply  of  our  top  talent,  to
do what we need to do, to get to the next generation of technology.

Ms. HOOLEY. Thank you.
Chairman  INGLIS.  Thank  you,  Ms.  Hooley.  Mr.  McCaul,  recog-

nized for five minutes for questions.

Mr. MCCAUL. Thank you, Mr. Chairman. I thank you for putting
this hearing together. I thank the witnesses. I wanted to follow up
on  the  university-industry  partnership  issue.  I  represent  the  Re-
search and Development Center, the UT system, it is called the J.J.
Pickle  Center.  He  was  a  former  Chair  of  the  Science  Committee.
Unfortunately, he recently passed away. I was at his funeral.

But I wanted to follow up on that. I know, Mr. Murdock, you had
had  some  experience  with  the  University  of  Texas.  Mr.  O’Connor’s
comment  was  interesting.  This  partnership  won’t  do  it  alone,  and
I  am  interested  in  your  comments  on  that.  In  getting  the  tour  of
the  Center,  it  was  very  impressive,  in  terms  of  the  research  and
development going on at the university, and the exchange of infor-
mation and partnering with the high tech, which is very prevalent
in the Austin area, in my district. A lot of the funding actually was
at  the  Pickle  Center,  to  make  the  semiconductor  wafers,  and  the
industry  got  a  lot  of  the  benefit  out  of  that,  and  I  would  like  you
to  comment  on  the  pros  and  cons  of  how  can  we  strengthen  the
partnership,  what  are  the  problems  associated  with  the  partner-
ship?  And  lastly,  I  would  say  the  majority  of  students  that  I  saw
working  at  the  Center  were  over  here  on  student  visas,  predomi-
nantly from Asian countries, and more disturbing is what I was es-
sentially told that most of them would not stay, we would not have
their  talent  after  they  graduated.  They  would  essentially  return
back to their countries, and you know, we have this investment, in
terms of training, that we give to them, and yet, we lose that talent
when  they  return  back  to  their  country.  So,  if  you  could,  if  you
wouldn’t mind addressing maybe those two issues.

Mr. MURDOCK. To respond, I am not overly familiar with the spe-
cific  university-industry  partnership  that  you  are  referring  to,  but
having  said  that,  we  do  rely  extensively,  in  the  United  States  on
foreign students right now for postdoctoral positions and they do a
lot of great research, help us build our knowledgebase, develop the
innovations, in fact, of our patent applications. And we are training
them.

The issue of students’ visas on foreign immigration is very impor-
tant. In the near-term, we need to have an influx of human capital
from  around  the  globe.  The  United  States  should  be  the  place
where the best and brightest from around the world come to do re-
search and commercialize their activity. I think that is a very posi-
tive thing.

The  risk  of  doing  that  is  that  we  don’t  cultivate  enough  of  our
own talent, and so we need to be cognizant of that, and you know,
as  we  have  talked  about,  increase  the  supply  of  trained  scientists
and  engineers  from  the  lower  grades,  all  the  way  up  while  doing

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:56 Nov 29, 2005 Jkt 021950 PO 00000 Frm 00068 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\RES05\062905\21950.TXT SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

65

that.  So,  these  need  to  be  pulled  simultaneously.  And  then,  we
need  to  take  steps  to  ensure,  and  to  create  incentives,  as  Matthew
said,  to  ensure  that  we  retain  the  talent  here.  When  we  lose  the
talent,  it  is  a  net  loss.  But  it  is  important  to  manage  across  all
phases simultaneously.

Mr. O’CONNOR. Yes, I would like to comment on the UT partner-
ship,  because  I  am  familiar  with  it.  It  is  a  great  program.  In  fact,
a  couple  of  years  ago,  I  got  involved  in  that  program  via  a  small
company called Molecular Imprints, which is a nanoimprint lithog-
raphy  company.  A  man  by  the  name  of  Norm  Schumaker.  And  a
good  example  of  some  of  the  context  of  partnership  and  why  it
makes  a  difference  in  this  commercialization  chasm  of  death  that
they  talk  about  and  how  we  can  get  through  it,  is  this  small  com-
pany  came  out  of  UT,  needed  some  venture  funding,  and  through
our  venture  arm,  we  actually  formed  a  partnership,  through  ven-
ture  capital  and  a  commercial  agreement,  to  help  get  them  to  the
next stage. So, you had a good example of innovation within a uni-
versity,  a  small  startup  in  venture  funding,  and  a  large  company
working  a  collaborative  agreement  to  bring  this  company’s  tech-
nology  to  bear.  So,  we  think  that  is  a  great  example  of  the  kind
of partnerships that are achievable, and the types of things that we
are looking more often to do.

Mr.  MCCAUL.  Thank  you.  Any  other  comments  on  that?  Mr.

Nordan.

Mr.  NORDAN.  I  would  just  underscore  the  fact  that  the  issue  is
retention.  If  the  takeaway  that  you  get  from  today’s  discussion  is
we  need  to  plow  resources  into  inspiring  students  with  wonder  for
science  and  technology  in  K–12,  that  is  absolutely  right.  It  will  be
absolutely  ineffectual  for  years.  In  the  near-term,  the  lever  that  is
open  to  us  to  pull  is  being  able  to  retain  foreign  students  that  are
already  studying  on  our  shores,  but  are  no  longer  staying  here.  If
you  look  at  the  course  of  American  Ph.D.s,  right.  In  the  first  half
of  this  century,  we  educated  a  lot  of  American  Ph.D.  and
postdoctoral  students  who,  in  rare  cases,  would  go  and  practice
abroad.  In  the  second  half  of  the  20th  century,  we  then  imported
a large number of students, but were highly effective at being able
to keep them here, which is a reason that our university staffs and
the  R&D  staff  of  companies  like  Motorola  are  so  diverse,  and  we
gain from that diversity.

The  problem  is  that  as  economic  fortunes  have  improved  in
India, China, South Korea, et cetera, the cost/benefit tradeoff of re-
maining  in  the  U.S.,  cut  off  from  cultural  links  and  cultural  sup-
port,  versus  returning  home,  is  no  longer  as  stark  as  it  once  was,
and  we  are  losing  these  students.  What  can  those  incentives  be?
Well,  they  are  fairly  broad-based.  There  is  a  lever  that  we  have  to
pull  in  visas.  There  is  a  lever  that  we  have  to  pull  in  improving
the lot of what a postdoctoral situation, or an early university pro-
fessorship  would  be,  in  terms  of  financial  remuneration  in  the
United States. There are probably other levers that I am not aware
of, but in the short-term, the lever we have to pull is retention, and
the long-term lever we have to pull is education of our students do-
mestically.

Mr. MCCAUL. I agree with that, and my time has expired. Thank

you, Mr. Chairman.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:56 Nov 29, 2005 Jkt 021950 PO 00000 Frm 00069 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\RES05\062905\21950.TXT SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

66

Chairman INGLIS. Thank you, Mr. McCaul. Ms. Johnson.
Ms.  JOHNSON.  Thank  you  very  much.  I  am  pleased  to  follow  Mr.
McCaul, because I think that some of the things that we have done
on this committee might lend a little bit of insight.

About  six  or  seven  years  ago,  with  Congresswoman  Connie
Morella,  we  sponsored  a  bill  to  try  to  get  the  attention  of  young
people, and interest them in science and technology, and it was fo-
cused,  at  the  time,  on  women  and  minorities,  only  to  find  that  it
was not just women and minorities we need to attract, because the
figure  for  Anglo  males  going  into  engineering  was  just  dropping
like  a  lead  balloon.  And  so,  we  now  know  that  80  percent  of  the
scientists,  researchers  in  this  country  are  not  American-born,  and
we do need to give great attention to that.

The  University  of  Texas  Southwestern  Medical  School  is  in  my
district,  and  I  work  closely  with  them  on  this  kind  of  research,  as
well  as  University  of  Texas  at  Dallas  and  the  system  where  we
hope to become a leader, just as we led the way in the Dallas area
for  the  chip.  And  I  think  that  this  technology,  the  nanotechnology,
is  going  to  be  in  that  category.  I  think  for  healthcare  delivery,  a
number of things, this is the research we need to focus on. It is like
the steam engine when it came about, or the Internet when it came
about.  It  is  going  to  make  that  kind  of  impact  on  our  economy,  so
it is important that we do invest money in this research.

And we are falling behind other countries in research dollars. We
used to be leaders. Now we are behind. But it was out of this type
of  research  that  brought  us  to  where  we  are  now.  This  is  the  re-
search  that  caused  us  to  have  the  economy  we  had  in  the  ’90s.  It
came  from  this  area.  So,  I  cannot  be  more  passionate  about  how
much  we  need  the  leadership  in  this  area,  and  hope  that  all  of  us
can influence young people to go, and it does start in K–12, because
we know that at the sixth grade, they start dilly dallying to some-
thing else.

We  have  tried  to  determine  what  causes  that.  We  rank  number
18  in  the  world  in  the  science  and  math,  and  we  should  not  be,  in
a  leading  country.  But  we  cannot  get  it  without  the  support  that
we need. And so, could you take that back to the White House?

Mr.  KVAMME.  I  would  be  very  happy  to,  and  in  fact,  you  might
be  pleased  to  know  that  what  you  just  said  would  almost  sound
like  you  were  a  fly  on  the  wall  at  a  meeting  I  had  with  Secretary
Spellings  yesterday  morning,  because  we  talked  about  this  exact
idea,  and  the  fact  that  you  folks  here  in  the  Congress  have  ap-
proved  that  billion  dollar  math  and  science  program,  how  do  we
push that? You know, we were reviewing, and our committee is re-
viewing a very interesting study out of UCLA on 1,546 colleges and
universities  in  this  country,  and  what  is  motivating  kids  to  take
the major that they are. It is very, very telling. It is also very inter-
esting as to who studies engineering.

Many,  many  of  the  students  that  go  into  engineering  happen  to
be from families that are first time college people. They are coming
from—I  am  an  example  of  that.  My  folks  are  immigrants.  My  dad
was  a  carpenter.  My  mother  was  a  domestic  worker.  And—but  I
am  finding  that,  even  in  the  current  generation,  that  is  still  true.
How do we make sure that those families understand that an engi-
neering degree is a good idea? So, we are working on that. We are

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:56 Nov 29, 2005 Jkt 021950 PO 00000 Frm 00070 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\RES05\062905\21950.TXT SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

67

looking  at  where  is  the  market  for  this,  and  hopefully,  we  will  be
able  to  come  up  with  some  concrete  proposals.  We  already  have
them  in  our  existing  workforce  report,  but  it  is  a  very,  very  high
priority at the PCAST.

Ms.  JOHNSON.  One  of  the  ways  we  can  do  it  is  through  partner-
ships.  I  carried  legislation  on  that  area.  Texas  Instruments  is  our
star  company  for  involving  themselves  in  our  education  system  in
Dallas.  What  we  find  is  that  when  students  can  relate  this  to  ev-
eryday  life,  and  understand  how  it  relates  to  the  research,  and
what brings on the technology and the advancement and what have
you,  the  more  they  appreciate  doing  it.  Now,  Texas  Instruments
funds  a  lot  of  this  for  the  Dallas  Independent  School  District,  and
I  have  no  objection  to  it.  But  we,  as  a  nation,  cannot  afford  not  to
invest  more  in  this  area.  We  are  losing  our  edge,  our  competitive
edge.

Mr.  KVAMME.  At  the  risk  of  taking  the  time,  let  me  just  agree
with you, but let me also help you think this through. Think about
it, a hundred years ago, a kid walking down Main Street saw every
potential job they could have in their life.

I defy you to walk down the streets of Silicon Valley—area—and
know  what  is  going  on  behind  those  buildings.  It  is  not  possible.
We  have  hidden  from  our  kids.  I  will  tell  you  a  personal  story.
When I was running National Semiconductor, we had 9,000 people
in my operations. We decided, for reasons that are obscure, to have
our  company  picnic  at  the  plant,  instead  of  going  to  a  distant  site.
Usually, about 1,000, 1,500 people showed up. 24,000 people came.
The  police  were  irate.  Why  did  they  come?  Kids  wanted  to  know
what  their  folks  did  for  a  living.  They  wanted  to  see  their  work-
place. They wanted to. It taught me a real lesson about opening up.
We have to understand that we have to bring our children into the
workplace.  We  have  to  make  sure  the  insurance  companies  don’t
bar  that,  because  they  try  to.  They  don’t  like  kids  running  around
this instrumentation, but it is critical that we do that.

I  knew  what  my  dad  did.  He  built  buildings.  He  built  houses.
Our  kids  don’t  know  what  their  parents  do.  It  has  an  impact  on
family  values.  It  has  an  impact  on  everything.  Open  up.  In  East
Palo  Alto,  I  suggested  that  those  young  kids,  they  wanted  to  go
visit  companies  that  I  was  involved  in.  I  said  no,  no.  Get  them  to
go to Johnny’s mom’s company. Get them to go to Billy’s dad’s com-
pany.  And  go  visit  that,  and  open  it  up  so  that  they  can  see,  they
can  relate  to  work  in  the  environment.  Again,  I  feel  so  strongly
about this, I am sorry.

Ms. JOHNSON. Well, my time is up. But I feel equally as strongly,

and I am very happy to meet you. I might become a worrywart.

Mr.  O’CONNOR.  Yes,  if  I  may,  I  share  your  passion  on  this  as
well,  and  I  think—to  answer  one  of  your  questions  earlier  about
how  to  make  this  real.  I  think  that  is  one  of  the  problems  with
nanotechnology is that it is somewhat of an esoteric concept to peo-
ple.  So,  when  you  talk  about  it,  they  may  not  get  it.  And  that  is
why  we  firmly  believe  we  have  to  do  more  in  the  communities  to
do  different  things,  and  we  are  working  with  public  schools  in  dif-
ferent  areas.  And  one  good  example  of  it  that  we  like  to  show,  is
if you look at the cell phone, from you know, 10, 15 years ago, and
you  actually  feel  that  it  is  really  quite  remarkable,  and  then  you

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:56 Nov 29, 2005 Jkt 021950 PO 00000 Frm 00071 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\RES05\062905\21950.TXT SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

68

compare  it  to  what  you  have  today.  This  is  just  the  start  of  the
kind of technology evolution that nanotechnology is going to allow.
The  miniaturization,  the  better  displays,  the  printed  electronics
and transistors inside, to allow shrinkage.

And people get it when they start to see these things, and when
you  talk  about  displays  and  having  carbon  nanotubes  and
nanoemissive  displays  that  actually  allow  you  to  see  a  basketball
or a baseball more clearly going across the screen, at a much lower
cost  than  what  is  currently  available,  it  comes  to  life  for  people,
and it is quite real. So, I think those types of examples make a dif-
ference in getting this type of technology understood by people.

Chairman INGLIS. I should not have thrown away that big phone

recently. I should have kept it——

Mr. O’CONNOR. That is right.
Chairman INGLIS.—and used it as a prop. Mr. Kvamme, that was
a  very  interesting  point  about  openness.  That  is  very  interesting.
Mr. Sodrel.

Mr.  SODREL.  Thank  you,  Mr.  Chairman.  A  lot  of  good  comments
and  challenges,  and  I  guess,  I  want  to  take  the  final  step.  Let  us
assume  that  we  get  all  of  our  students  motivated  and  inspired  to
pursue science. We, in fact, produce more scientists and engineers.
We  invest  more  in  research  and  development.  We  develop  public
and  private  partnerships,  and  we  provide  salaries  that  attract  and
keep good folks. So, now, we are in the ideal world.

As  you  pointed  out  early  on,  I  think  most  of  you  made  the  point
that  other  countries  are  working  hard  to  catch  up.  In  some  cases,
catch up means stealing technology and research from our country.
China,  for  example,  has  shown  little  respect  for  intellectual  prop-
erty  or  patent  rights,  and  a  real  enthusiasm  for  industrial  espio-
nage,  or  whatever  term  you  want  to  use.  So,  my  question  is,  how
do  we  maintain  any  real  lead  in  nanotech  when  any  breakthrough
in  research  can  be  transmitted  to  our  world  competitors  at  the
speed of the Internet?

Mr. NORDAN. If I can take a first shot at that one. It is just like
the  Red  Queen  in  Alice  in  Wonderland.  It  is  not  an  issue  of  being
in one place before someone else. It is always being one step ahead,
being  able  to  run  faster.  There  is  an  evolutionary  arms  race  to
think about.

The  fact  is,  if  you  look  at  what  was  mentioned  earlier,  revital-
izing  the  U.S.  manufacturing  base  through  nanotechnology,  there
is  certainly  pilot  scale  manufacturing  and  certainly  manufacturing
where  specific  skills  are  required,  generally  low  volume,  that  will
be  incentivized  by  nanotechnology.  But  if  you  look  at  fields  of
nanomaterials  today,  the  manufacturing  train  has  already  left  the
station.

Where  the  U.S.’  economic  opportunity  is  here  is  in  coming  up
with  the  ideas  that  may  be  implemented  in  manufacturing  plants
on  other  shores.  To  give  you  an  example,  in  the  category  of
fullerenes,  it  is  a  kind  of  nanomaterial,  think  of  a  soccer  ball,
where  the  intersections  between  the  stitching  are  carbon  atoms,
and the stitching is bonds, right? There is a company that is a joint
venture  of  Mitsubishi  Corp.  and  Mitsubishi  Electric  in  Japan,
called  Frontier  Carbon.  They  built  a  plant  capable  of  manufac-
turing  40  tons  of  fullerenes  a  year.  Do  you  know  what  world  de-

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:56 Nov 29, 2005 Jkt 021950 PO 00000 Frm 00072 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\RES05\062905\21950.TXT SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

69

mand  for  fullerenes  was  last  year?  About  one  and  a  half  tons.  It
is unlikely that you are going to find U.S. based companies invest-
ing  that  far  ahead  of  demand  in  order  to  attain  manufacturing
dominance, but what is not known is that at that plant, the manu-
facturing  process  they  use  to  make  the  fullerenes  is  not  home-
grown. It is licensed from a company spun out of MIT called Nano-
C,  that  has  an  innovative  process  using  two  dimensional  flames  to
create fullerenes at very high quality and high purity, right.

The way that the U.S. can maintain its edge in this regard is not
by  trying  to  go  toe-to-toe  against  competencies,  be  they  be  in  low
labor  tasks,  or  tax  advantages  for  capital  investment  in  manufac-
turing facilities, et cetera, that we are unlikely to catch up in, com-
pared  with  other  countries  that  have  more  runway  to  go  down,  in
terms  of  economic  development  based  on  nanotechnology.  It  is  to
have  an  unremitting,  relentless  flow  of  novel  ideas  that  take  time
and keep us continually two, three, five years ahead of what other
countries can attain.

We  cannot  prevent  research  being  done  that  goes  into  a  startup
company  being  transmitted  in  some  way,  be  it  through  a  patent
process,  et  cetera,  to  a  country  that  perhaps  does  not  have  the  re-
spect  for  intellectual  property  rights  that  Western  European  and
U.S.  nations  hold.  That  is  going  to  happen.  The  achievement  that
we  can  drive  toward  is  to  always  be  ahead,  and  always  be  first  to
market  with  those  novel  ideas.  And  through  that,  I  think  we  will
attain economic rewards. After that, there are a million tiny things
that  can  be  done  that  will  have  an  impact.  Working  through  orga-
nizations like the World Trade Organization, to encourage stronger
IP enforcement in countries like these. Being able to have win-win
partnerships  involving  joint  development,  which  countries  like—
companies  like  Motorola  are  good  at  doing,  that  give  strategic  in-
centives,  as  well  as  economic  ones  or  legal  ones,  to  these  countries
to expect—to respect intellectual property laws.

But  ultimately,  the  number  one  lever  that  we  have  to  pull  here

is by always being first and always being ahead.

Mr.  KVAMME.  I  actually  disagree  with  Matt  on  that,  so  maybe,

I ought to make a comment.

Mr. SODREL. Okay.
Mr. KVAMME. And have fun. The reason that you put a semicon-
ductor  plant  today  in  China  has  nothing  to  do  with  labor  rates.  It
has  to  do  with  return  on  capital  employed.  When  you  look  at  a
semiconductor  plant,  93  percent  of  the  cost  is  related  to  capital.
About  six  percent  is  labor.  When  they  give  you  a  situation  in  a
plant that is going to last 10 years, zero tax for the first five years,
and  half  tax  for  the  next  five  years,  in  our  manufacturing  report,
we  reported  that  for  a  $3  billion  investment,  it  costs,  just  because
of  cost  of  capital,  $1.3  billion  more  for  that  plant  in  the  United
States  as  it  is  in  Europe—as  it  is  in  China.  It  has  nothing  to  do
with  labor  rates,  and  the  public  doesn’t  understand  that  at  all.  It
is a capital issue.

So,  as  we  talk  about  nanotechnology,  unfortunately,  the  manu-
facturing plants are going to be expensive. So, who is going to give
you  the  best  opportunity  for  return  on  your  capital?  If  you  get  hit
with  35  percent  off  the  top  here,  and  four  percent  someplace  else,
it  makes  a  dramatic  difference.  You  do  not  put  those  high  value

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:56 Nov 29, 2005 Jkt 021950 PO 00000 Frm 00073 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\RES05\062905\21950.TXT SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

70

plants  overseas  for  four  percent  of  your  cost  structure.  You  just
don’t do it. When I sit in board meetings, the reason we go overseas
is  tax  benefit,  okay?  I  realize  that  is  not  the  purview  of  this  com-
mittee, but that is the reason.

Now,  by  the  way,  the  Indian  situation  is  different.  India  is  look-
ing more at more labor-intensive things, and what I call the slope-
and-intercept  problem,  you  know.  It  is  the  same  thing  in  so  many
industries.  It  takes  $800  million  to  make  a  drug.  The  drug  manu-
facturing  costs  are  zero,  almost,  per  pill,  but  who  is  going  to  pay
the  $800  million?  Who  is  going  to  pay  the  $3  billion  back?  Who  is
going  to  pay  for  the  software  back,  the  development  cost,  that
intercept? If you think about it in a chart, you have this enormous
startup cost, so I think that is a big issue.

On  the  patent  point,  I  think  that  is  also  a  point  that  you  make,
and  we  do  have  a  tool  there  that  has  been  effectively  used  in  the
past,  and  sometimes,  folks  are  reluctant  to  use  it.  It  is  called  clos-
ing  them  off  at  the  borders.  We  can’t  forget  the  fact  that  we  are
a huge market. Now, obviously, international markets are growing,
and there, I would agree with Matt, but as far as serving the U.S.
market  with  products  that  are  ripped  off  from  us,  we  have  a  tool,
if  we  enforce  it.  We  are  not  very  good,  sometimes,  at  enforcing  it.
I  have  good  experiences,  and  I  have  had  ugly  experiences  on  that
front. But that is a tool we have to protect our markets that I think
we ought to utilize.

Mr.  NORDAN.  Just  to  keep  the  discussion  going,  do  you  think  it
is realistic that tax rates like the ones you have described in China
could ever be approached in the U.S. at any scale?

Mr. KVAMME. These are the folks that make those decisions.
Mr. SODREL. Okay.
That is music to my ears. I was sworn in in January, and I often
tell  people  I  spent  my  career  in  real  life,  with  balance  sheets  and
profit/loss  statements,  and  so  you  are  speaking  my  language  now.
We  certainly  need  to  have  you  come  back  and  testify  before  one  of
the other committees, when we get into tax simplification.

to that?

Thank you, Mr. Chairman. I am sure my time has expired.
Chairman  INGLIS.  Mr.  Murdock,  did  you  want  to  add  something

Mr.  MURDOCK.  Yes,  if  I  could.  I  also  would  like  to  reinforce  the
need  to,  obviously,  enforce  the  intellectual  property  laws,  that  it
will  be,  in  fact,  critical  to  maintaining  U.S.  leadership.  Further-
more,  I  am  not  prepared  to  cede,  if  you  will,  manufacturing  of
nanotechnology-enabled  products  here  in  the  United  States.  I  be-
lieve that we need to endeavor to be more than just IP companies.
If  you  look  at  the  total  value  associated  with  any  product,  most  of
the value tends to accrue to those that are closest to the customer;
that  in  fact,  make  it.  And  while  IP  may  have  higher  margins,  you
know,  ultimately,  there  is  a  big  value  pool  out  there,  and  we  need
to ensure that we are taking steps to capture the value.

Furthermore,  IP  is  not  the  only  source  of  intellectual  capital,  if
you  will.  There  is  know-how,  and  that  is  the  reason  for  the  impor-
tance of manufacturing. Ultimately, when we move from the knowl-
edge  or  the  proof-of-principle  into  making  the  stuff,  we  develop
process  knowledge.  That  process  knowledge  helps  us  to  refine  and
improve both the quality of the product and the throughput, if you

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:56 Nov 29, 2005 Jkt 021950 PO 00000 Frm 00074 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\RES05\062905\21950.TXT SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

71

will.  And  it  increases  the  value  of  the  labor.  It  increases  the  mar-
ginal productivity of the labor. That is what enables us to pay high
wages and keep jobs here.

So,  while  we  need  to  be  realistic  and  understand  that  this  is  a
global  economy,  we  also  need  to  take  steps  to  do  what  we  can  to
ensure  that  we  do  commercialize  and  manufacture  the  set  of  tech-
nologies that we can here.

Chairman INGLIS. Thank you. Mr. Honda.
Mr.  HONDA.  Thank  you,  Mr.  Chairman,  and  this  discussion  has
been interesting, and being someone who wants to keep jumping in
at  each  juncture,  I  sat  on  my  tongue,  and  I  just,  you  know,  lis-
tened.  And  we  have  gone  all  over  the  board,  Mr.  Chairman,  on
technology and let me see if I can pose a couple of questions.

From education to investment, I think the gentlemen are correct
that  we  are  not  doing  quite  enough,  in  terms  of  education  and  the
research that was done at UCLA, I suspect that the population was
a  pretty  narrow  population  at  UCLA.  And  I  suspect  a  lot  of  them
had  black  hair,  too,  in  the  engineering  department.  But  I  think
that  there  is  something  to  be  learned  from  that,  in  that  there  are
a  lot  of  things  that  we  need  to  be  doing  in  our  society,  in  terms
of education, and taking what we learned from that research, apply
it to our country.

I  don’t  think  that  this  country  has  been  disciplined  enough,
and—to  apply  what  we  have  learned  in  all  spectrums  of  our  soci-
ety,  like  Kansas  or  Appalachia,  where  families  need  this  kind  of
education,  and  need  this  kind  of  rigor  and  expectation.  It  is  not
about  Asia  being  better  or  Asia  having  more.  It  is  just  that  Asia
had  decided  to  something,  and  India  had  decided  to  do  something,
and  this  country  just  needs  to  decide  what  they  are  going  to  do
with their education and invest it in this country.

Whether  it  is  Appalachia,  Southern  states,  the  valleys  of  Cali-
fornia, we just need to stop, and invest in our own education, take
the  best  practices,  and  expect  it  of  our  own  children.  That  is  the
problem.  The  reason  why  people  are  coming  over  to  this  country
from other places is because the graduate programs and the compa-
nies  that  work  together,  they  have  a  freedom,  and  there  is  a  lot
less control, if you will, in what they do and how they think.

And I suspect that a lot of the people who work in our companies
in  Silicon  Valley  not  only  come  from  India  and  China.  If  you  look
at  a  lot  of  startups,  they  come  from  Europe,  they  come  from  the
UK, everyplace. So, it is a magnet for the intellectual curiosity peo-
ple that want to participate in this country.

In  terms  of  the  PCAST  report  on  government  roles  in  research
and  development  and  commercialization,  bridging  the  gap,  if  you
will, I think the report went all over the place, but did not say spe-
cifically what the role is. They pushed it off onto states and private
companies,  which  is  being  done,  because  the  Feds  refuse  to  do  it.
And  in  the  report,  it  talked  about  SBIR  and  STTR,  and  there  is  a
role  there.  Certainly,  there  is  a  role  there,  because  they  get  a  per-
centage of income from other projects, and put it in there, and then
they  use  that  money.  But  when  you  reduce  the  amount  of  money
in each of these programs, they get less money, and then we zeroed
out ATP, I believe.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:56 Nov 29, 2005 Jkt 021950 PO 00000 Frm 00075 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\RES05\062905\21950.TXT SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

72

And  I  guess,  to  the  gentlemen,  I  would  like  to  know,  just  how
strongly do you feel about the role of government in helping compa-
nies  bridge  this  valley  of  death,  in  terms  of  our  competitiveness—
you said it once, but I would like to hear it again, in strong terms.
And  then  have  this  sent  to  the  President,  the  Administration,  be-
cause  the  Committee  here,  the  full  Committee,  was  asked  not  to
move forward on programs like ATP. We didn’t, and so, you know,
our  job  is  to  propose  and  authorize  and  then  it  is  the  Administra-
tion’s job to figure out whether they are going to back it up or not,
but  in  this  democratic  society,  we  are  the  ones  that  are  supposed
to listen to you, and translate that into programs, and I have a bill,
called  the  Nanomanufacturing  Investment,  H.R.  1491,  which  ad-
dresses  specifically  bridging  the  valley  of  death,  and  I  would  like
to  hear  what  your  reactions  are  to  that  bill,  and  how  that  can  be
improved,  and  whether  it  should  be  supported  by  this  Administra-
tion,  as  the  previous  bill  that  we  signed,  the  Nanotech  bill,  that
Mr.  Kvamme  and  PCAST  had  supported  also.  I  think  that  is  the
next  piece  that  needs  to  be  signed,  so  that  we  can  make  sure  that
we  move  forward  in  areas  that  you  are  all  concerned  about.  That
and  education,  I  think,  are  intertwined,  and  then,  moving  forward
with  educating  our  members  of  our  communities,  and  bringing
them along, so that there is no perceived fear, that there is knowl-
edge.  That  is  important,  and  I  think  that  that  is  part  and  parcel
of education, and part and parcel of the bill that we are looking at,
so that more and more people will be exposed to this thing we call
nanoscale  activities,  because  it  is  a  brand  new  enabling  activity,
that will just change the complexion of this world. I wonder wheth-
er you have any reactions to what I said. I have rambled a bit, but
I think you get the gist of my comments.

Mr.  O’CONNOR.  If  I  may.  I  appreciate  your  comments,  Congress-
man. I couldn’t agree more. To be emphatic, from the private sector
perspective,  we  truly  feel  the  government  needs  to  take  a  strong
hand in developing this technology. It is part of an overall partner-
ship.  Large  companies  like  Motorola,  small  startups,  nonprofit  or-
ganizations,  venture  capitalists,  and  the  government.  It  has  to  be
an emphatic focus across the board.

And  when  you  travel  abroad,  you  see  this.  You  go  to  places  like
China and Korea, where there is a strong partnership between the
government and the private sector in developing these technologies.
We  can’t  sit  by  the  wayside.  We  have  to  move  this  forward.  So,
from a private sector perspective, we feel we are not doing enough.
We  have  to  do  more,  and  it  has  to  be  really  on  a  consortium  part-
nership level.

Mr.  HONDA.  And  is  it  the  nature  of  nanoscale  activities,  one  of
the  reasons  why  we  have  to  shift  federal  paradigms  in  order  to  be
able to justify going into this activity?

Mr. MURDOCK. I think the meta-theme, if you will, of the role of
government,  is  to  create  a  conducive  commercialization  climate,  to
help  create  an  ecosystem  where  this  can  be  done.  And  there  is  no
one silver bullet. It is going to take many things moving in parallel
to  accomplish  that.  Actually,  you  referred  earlier  to  the  regulatory
climate,  and  export  controls,  so  obviously  maintaining  our  invest-
ment  in  the  generation  of  knowledge  through  nanoscience  R&D  in
the 21st Century—doing more through the SBIR programs, and po-

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:56 Nov 29, 2005 Jkt 021950 PO 00000 Frm 00076 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\RES05\062905\21950.TXT SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

73

tentially, making them longer and bigger, like NIH has done, if you
look  at  that  as  best  practice  to  help  get  over  the  transaction  costs
of  going  through  the  grant  program.  Leveraging  fast  track,  you
know,  there  has  been  talk  in  the  SBIR  as  to  whether  venture  cap-
ital  funded  companies  should  be  able  to  receive  grants.  You  know,
ultimately,  we  need  to  do  as  much  as  we  can  to  encourage  capital
formation  associated  with  the—rather  than  discourage.  So,  we  be-
lieve  that,  you  know,  venture  capital  companies  ought  to  be  in-
cluded.  As  I  said,  Phase  III,  I  think  the  government  can  play  an
incredibly important role in acquiring and integrating nanotech in-
novations into its agency needs and missions rapidly, and to design
with  intent  to  do  that  on  a  go  forward  basis,  and  then,  ultimately,
creating  incentives  for  the  private  sector  to  form  long-term  com-
mercialization-oriented  capital.  The  stock  market,  we  all  know,
drives  companies  to  short-term  performance.  We  ought  to  think
about how to create new vehicles to enable the set of folks who are
longer-term  in  their  thinking  and  have  more  patient  capital  to  de-
ploy that to help grow the sector.

Mr.  NORDAN.  To  add  to  that,  I  absolutely  agree  with  my  fellow
panelists  that  there  is  an  important  and  key  role  for  the  Federal
Government  in  bridging  the  chasm  of  death  that  we  have  talked
about.

The  only  point  of  caution  I  would  add  is  that  if  you  look  at  the
history of industrial policy, it is littered with examples where state
agencies  encouraged  the  development  of  a  specific  technology  solu-
tion to a problem to their peril, right.

The  government  of  France,  for  example,  put  a  great  deal  of
money  into  specifically  minicomputers  right  at  the  time  that  per-
sonal computers were beginning to usurp them, and that was a bad
choice.  What  I  would  encourage  is  not  activity  focused  on  specific
technology  solutions,  but  on  solving  broad  problems.  The  National
Cancer Initiative’s nanotechnology effort is a great example, where
there  are  broad  goals  to  come  up  with  noninvasive  therapies,  for
example, or targeted agents, but no specification to use specifically
gold  nanoshells  or  dendrimers,  or  another  technology  platform.
This is a place where we can make some wiser decisions than per-
haps some of our international competitors have. If you look at Tai-
wan,  which  I  mentioned  beforehand  and  works  very  closely  with
specific corporations on specific solutions, one of the solutions they
are backing is magnetoresistive memory, right, which is one of sev-
eral forms of nanoenabled memory that could be much more dense,
much lower power, and nonvolatile. But it is probably a bad choice.
That  technology  solution  could 
in  the  marketplace  to
nanotube-based  memory,  or  memory  based  on  organic  porphyrin
molecules.  A  wiser  choice  might  be  to  create  incentives,  and  ATP
may  be  one  incentive  structure,  to  solve  the  problem  without  sub-
sidizing or incentivizing a specific solution.

if  you  will,  goal-oriented 

Mr.  MURDOCK.  I  was  going  to  follow  up  briefly  and  say  that
centers,
meta-theme, 
translational  research  centers  focused  on  very  clear,  well  estab-
lished societal problems like cancer are one way that we can simul-
taneously,  again,  captivate  the  imagination  of  our  youth,  and  get
people  drawn  in,  and  make  very  specific  progress  toward  these
goals, and it provides a forum, if you will, for industry to effectively

research 

lose 

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:56 Nov 29, 2005 Jkt 021950 PO 00000 Frm 00077 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\RES05\062905\21950.TXT SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

74

engage,  rather  than  trying  to  sift  through  everything,  and  figure
out where the relevant research that is taking place in cancer ther-
apy.

Mr.  HONDA.  Mr.  Chair,  if  I  may  just  ask  you  to  look  at  the  bill,
and  wordsmith  in  ways  that  it  would  encapsulate  what  it  is  that
you just mentioned.

Mr. KVAMME. Well, I was just going to add, you know, I am sure
one of the difficult jobs you have where you sit, is dividing the pie.
You  know,  where  do  you  spend  the  money?  I  mean,  it  has  got  to
be  a  very  difficult  job.  We  have  that  in  management  every  day.  I
would  put  education  at  the  top  of  the  list.  I  would  put  programs,
you  know,  again,  we  made  some  recommendations  along  those
lines,  programs  to  encourage  STEM  graduation  at  the  top  of  the
list.

The  second  thing  I  would  do  is  I  would  return,  if  I  could,  to  the
spirit  of  the  ’60s  in  federal  procurement.  The  Federal  Government
was  a  more  risk-taking  buyer  in  the  days  of  Apollo.  I  sold  parts
into  the  Apollo  computer,  and  it  was  fun.  MIT  was  doing  the  de-
sign.  I  got  to  sit  in  the  capsule  in  1963.  It  was  exciting  stuff.  The
Federal Government has become a very, very cautious buyer. They
should be—they are 20 percent of the economy. Is 20 percent of the
business  that  the  other  gentlemen  have  talked  about  in  the  nano
area  being  bought  by  the  Federal  Government  today?  I  seriously
doubt  it.  They  are  a  much,  much  more  conservative  buyer,  and  at
the  end  of  the  day,  what  you  need  is  customers,  in  any  business.
It is kind of fundamental.

As far as the government as an investor, it is not hard to invest
in  good  ideas.  It  is  very  hard  to  say  no  when  the  good  idea  isn’t
panning out real well. I think the big problem with a lot of govern-
ment programs is they keep funding things that ought to have been
shot.  In  the  venture  business,  we  all  have  closed-end  funds,  and
you  get,  unfortunately,  to  say  no  when  things  haven’t  worked  out,
because we are in the risk business. It is a shame it is called ven-
ture capital. It ought to be called risk capital. Because it is a risky
business. And what I have found, therefore, is that government in-
vestment  is  best  done  in  things  like  facilities.  There  is  a  finite
number  of  dollars  involved  in  building  a  facility.  In  backing  a  cor-
porate  enterprise,  you  need  oversight  that  I  think  is  beyond  the
scope  that  is  conceivable  by  government,  because  they—you  just
can’t  say  no  appropriately,  and  those  would  be  my  comments,  Mr.
Representative,  and  my  representative,  for  a  good  while,  by  the
way.

Mr.  MURDOCK.  If  I  could  pick  up  quickly  on  Floyd’s  comment  on
facilities.  The  investment  in  facilities  and  infrastructure  is  incred-
ibly  important,  and  I  think  the  21st  Century  Nanotech  R&D  Act
has  done  a  phenomenal  job  that  way,  specifically—I  am  from  Chi-
cago  and  the  DOE,  Argonne  Center  for  Nanoscale  Materials  there
is  going  to  be  incredibly  important  to  the—I  think  that  drives
down, 
intensity  of  commercializing
nanotechnology,  which  is  an  incredibly  important  part  of  the  solu-
tion, so that startups don’t have to acquire all that capital.

if  you  will,  the  capital 

In  order  to  effectively  use  it,  though,  it  is  incredibly  important
that  we  have,  if  you  will,  the  operating  funds  as  well,  because  the
startups  do  not  have,  necessarily  have  the  process  know-how,  or

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:56 Nov 29, 2005 Jkt 021950 PO 00000 Frm 00078 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\RES05\062905\21950.TXT SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

75

the skills, to make effective use of to get the return on that invest-
ment  in  facilities  and  infrastructure,  we  need  to  match  it  with  op-
erating  funds  to  provide  services  and  get  the  utilization  from  the
startup community.

Chairman INGLIS. Thanks. Mr. Akin.
Mr.  AKIN.  Thank  you,  Mr.  Chairman.  This  could  be  a  question
for  any  of  the  witnesses.  What  is  the  role,  I  think  you  just  made
reference,  of  venture  capital 
the  products  of
nanotechnology  research  to  the  market?  Do  you  think  there  is
enough  venture  capital  investment  available  to  nanotechnology
companies,  and  why?  And  then,  what  factors  most  influence  ven-
ture capital investment choices in nanotechnology?

in  bringing 

Mr.  KVAMME.  Okay.  I  guess  I  am  a  venture  capitalist,  so  I  have
to  take  a  first  shot  at  that.  Actually,  venture  capital  availability
right now, in total is pretty good. I think we may have, you know,
we got into a mode that was kind of, during the bubble, it was kind
of  nutso,  but  if  you  take  a  look  at  the  professional  venture  capital
business, it has grown through the, you know, and if you eliminate
the bubble, we are back on the curve that you would have projected
from  the  early  ’90s,  so  the  total  amount  of  venture  capital  that  is
being  deployed,  and  looks  like  it  is  being  somewhat  effectively  de-
ployed in the $20 billion a year range right now.

Now,  obviously,  that  covers  an  extraordinarily  wide  range  of
kinds  of  opportunities,  nanotech  being  only  one  of  many.  And  I
would  say  that,  you  know,  and  this  is  corresponding  with  what
some  of  the  others  have  already  said.  Some  firms  are  more  inter-
ested  in  this  area,  and  others  are  not.  There  is  one  problem  that
we  faced  on  the  Committee  that  you  should  all  be  aware  of.  Some
things are hard to call nanotech, because they seem to meet the re-
quirements, but this requirement that the processes be different or
not conceivable from the larger scale is touchy. So, I am, for exam-
ple, involved with a company in layer transfer of silicon, very, very
fine  layers  of  silicon.  We  don’t  call  that  a  nanotech  investment.  I
think  some  might,  but  you  know,  right  now,  the  level  is  relatively
low.

I  think  there  is  an  adequate  amount  of  venture  capital.  Venture
capital  is  measured  by  one  metric  and  one  metric  alone  by  the  in-
vestors.  It  is  called  internal  rate  of  return,  which  means  you  not
only have to make hits, you have to make hits that hit quickly, and
sometimes,  nanotech  is  not  viewed  that  way,  as  biotech  wasn’t  in
the early ’80s.

Mr.  NORDAN.  To  give  a  bit  more  global  perspective  on  the  same
question.  Right  now,  venture  capital  is  notable  in  nanotechnology
by its absence, not its presence. Last year, by our math, about $8.6
billion  globally  went  into  nanotech  R&D.  Of  that,  $4.6  billion  was
government, $3.8 corporate R&D, and this tiny slice, about two per-
cent,  $200  million  of  venture  capital.  That  number  has  declined  in
the  course  of  the  last  three  years,  from  $385  million  in  2002  to
$200  million  in  the  last  year.  And  is  also  highly,  highly  con-
centrated in a very small number of companies.

We count about 1,200 nanotech startups globally. Of those, as of
the middle of last year, only 109 had ever received a dime of insti-
tutional  venture  capital.  Of  those,  only  10  had  done  two  rounds,
and  that  money  was,  then,  even  further  concentrated  in  very  spe-

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:56 Nov 29, 2005 Jkt 021950 PO 00000 Frm 00079 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\RES05\062905\21950.TXT SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

76

cific sectors, about 40 percent in health care and life sciences, most-
ly  drug  delivery,  about  40  percent  in  electronics  and  IT,  mostly
novel forms of computer memory, about one-sixth in materials, and
then a tiny slice of five percent in tools.

That  number,  over  all  of  those  years,  is  equivalent  to  maybe
around  1.4  to  1.7  percent  of  total  VC  dollars  deployed.  Now,  the
reasons  for  this  are  good  reasons.  As  Floyd  mentioned  beforehand,
there  was  a  dramatic  efflux  of  venture  capital  money  during  the
bubble.  As  a  result,  venture  capitalists  are  much  more  cautious.
There  are  some  other,  more  human  factors  reasons  as  well.  Ven-
ture capital firms tend to be dominated by former successful entre-
preneurs who invest in companies that they know well. Because of
that,  they  tend  to  be  staffed  with  folks  who  know  electronics  and
who  know  life  sciences  very  well,  but  often  don’t  have  experience
in materials, and find it more difficult to be able to do due diligence
on  a  materials  investment.  That  means  that  it  is  less  likely  that
a  nanotech  startup  with  a  materials  play  is  going  to  find  a  willing
audience within a venture capital company.

Now,  what  can  be  done  at  the  federal  level  in  order  to  influence
this?  The  levers  are  not  terribly  strong.  I  think  that  the  meta-
theme  that  Sean  has  mentioned  beforehand  about  having  goal-di-
rected research would create a form of validation, right, for venture
capitalists, that there is something here. There is a story here that
is  bigger  than  this  one  company.  The  issue  of  permitting  SBIR
grants to be allocated to venture backed companies is another lever
that can be pulled.

Mr.  O’CONNOR.  Yeah,  I  think,  picking  up  on  one  of  Floyd’s  com-

ments, I think what it is important to understand is——

Mr. AKIN. Could I interrupt just a second.
Mr. O’CONNOR. Yes. Sure.
Mr. AKIN. I want to make sure I am understanding what you are
saying. In answer to the question, what factors most influence ven-
ture  capital  choices,  I  think  I  heard  your  response  is  particularly
the  specific  area  of  application.  There  are  certain  favored  areas,
such  as  you  said  medicine  particularly,  and  that  is  part  of  what  is
driving it.

Mr. NORDAN. Well, I would turn this back to Floyd, but in obser-
vation  of  these  companies,  the  human  resources,  the  knowledge
that  they  have  tends  to  be  in  those  domains,  in  life  sciences  and
electronics,  typically  not  in  materials.  That  drives  selection.  But
the  overarching  factor,  as  Floyd  mentioned,  IRR  is  the  metric  that
matters. IRR comes down to risk, and nanotechnology investments
are  viewed  as  more  risky,  because  to  date,  there  is  not  a  strong
track  record  of  exit.  In  an  early  period,  right,  you  do  not  have  the
pot  of  gold  at  the  end  of  the  rainbow  to  go  on.  You  have  the  rain-
bow  itself,  and  you  are  going  to  assume  there  is  something  at  the
end.  There  are  companies  that  have  gone  public,  and  done  IPOs
based  on  nanotechnology.  They  have  not  strongly  identified  them-
selves  with  nanotech.  Inacon,  which  went  out  last  year,  was
pitched as a life sciences company, for example.

Mr. AKIN. Thank you. I am sorry. I didn’t mean to interrupt you.
Mr. O’CONNOR. Not a problem. Just to pick up on those thoughts.
I  think  what  is  important  to  understand  in  this  field  is  it  is  a
longer  cycle  of  commercialization  than  most.  If  you  compare

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:56 Nov 29, 2005 Jkt 021950 PO 00000 Frm 00080 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\RES05\062905\21950.TXT SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

77

nanotechnology  to  enterprise  software,  for  example,  it  is  not  even
comparable.  It  is  a  generally  six  to  seven  year  cycle.  In  our  case,
on some of our commercialization of carbon nanotubes, it has been
15 years since early ’90s, when we worked on this, and have rough-
ly 150 patents. So, it is not something that happens overnight, and
because  of  that,  to  answer  your  question,  you  get  into  the  risk/re-
ward  scenario.  Many  VCs  will  be  reluctant  to  get  into  it.  I  think,
similar  to  what  Mr.  Nordan  was  saying,  they  may  not  know  this
area,  and  then,  lastly,  the  whole  concept  of  how  do  you  exit?  I
think  big  companies  will  start  looking  at  opportunities  to  poten-
tially  buy,  but  I  don’t  think  you  have  seen  the  IPO  opportunities
peak up as much, which is what is going to motivate a venture cap-
italist to get liquidity.

Mr. AKIN. Thank you very much. I guess I was looking at it part-
ly from the numbers of how much. You had almost been cut in half
in three years, how much venture capital would come in. I was try-
ing to figure out what is driving some of that.

Mr.  MURDOCK.  Well,  one  point  to  raise  on  that,  that  number  is
rising this year. Obviously, the jury is still out, but in one week of
this year, I believe the second week of March, $66 million, equiva-
lent  to  a  third  of  the  entire  investment  last  year,  went  into  three
companies,  Nantero,  Nano-Tex,  and  Nanomix.  The  reason  for  this
is that the bets that were placed in nanotechnology, the initial bets
on  startups,  were  made  in  2001  and  2002,  and  a  large  number  of
bets  that  were  relatively  small  bets  at  a  time,  right,  were  made.
Many  of  those  companies  are  gone  now,  but  those  that  are  sur-
viving are now doing series C and D rounds, further on, which tend
to  be  bigger  rounds  of  investment  than  the  As  and  Bs  that  start
companies,  and  as  a  result,  seeing  companies  like  the  ones  that  I
have  mentioned  reach  a  later  part  of  their  lifecycle,  they  are  at-
tracting  more  funding.  That  is  causing  money  that  has  been  de-
ployed to raise.

Our  estimate,  based  on  year  to  date,  is  probably  we  are  looking
at  around  $350  million,  similar  to  the  levels  of  2002  in  the  course
of this year.

Mr. AKIN. Thank you, Chairman.
Chairman INGLIS. Mr. Sherman.
Mr.  SHERMAN.  Thank  you,  Mr.  Chairman.  Thanks  for  allowing
me  to  participate  in  these  hearings,  even  though,  as  a  Member  of
the Full Committee, I am not a Member of this subcommittee.

It  was  interesting  to  hear  the  conversation  about  the  industrial
policy  nature  of  what  we  are  doing.  I  certainly  agree  with  Mr.
Kvamme  that  education  is  important.  That  wouldn’t  even  be
thought  of  as  industrial  policy.  I  know  the  comment  is  made  well,
China is using government money to subsidize this area. But keep
in  mind,  let  us  say  you  are  a  Chinese  entrepreneur.  You  get  gov-
ernment  money.  You  develop  technology  and  then  you  decide  to
move to Switzerland for tax reasons, or you decide to move the jobs
to  India  for  cheaper  labor.  You  would  be  sent  to  a  reeducation
camp.  Now,  that  is  one  way  to  work  industrial  policy.  I  have  yet
to see how the U.S..
. I mean education, obviously, the benefit is
to  the  student,  and  the  student  is  staying  here.  But  I  have  yet  to
see how, short of reeducation camps, we could work out something
with business entrepreneurs so that these benefits—these are high-

.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:56 Nov 29, 2005 Jkt 021950 PO 00000 Frm 00081 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\RES05\062905\21950.TXT SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

78

ly  risky.  It  is  not  enough  to  say  well,  you  invest  a  billion  dollars,
and  look,  you  got  10,000  jobs.  Because  you  are  probably  going  to
lose  the  billion  dollars.  You  take  that  kind  of  risk  and  it  hits,  we
should  have  a  million  jobs.  Well,  maybe  not.  Maybe  it  is  a  heads,
we  lose,  tails,  India  wins  or  Switzerland  wins,  depending  upon
whether it is tax policy or cheap labor that drives things.

But  I  want  to  shift  to  something  completely  different,  an  issue
that I have bored my colleagues on this committee with for a while.
And  that  is  the  issue  of  enhancing  human  intelligence  or  devel-
oping artificial intelligence. Now, the National Nanotechnology Ini-
tiative  has  provided  funds,  and  I  am  pleased  to  see  that  roughly
four percent of that money is going towards looking at some of the
concerns  that  people  have  about  nanotechnology,  health  and  envi-
ronment,  the  toxicity  of  some  nanoparticles.  And  that  is  all  well
and good, but the statute that we passed—and this is really a ques-
tion  as  to  whether  any  of  us  serving  on  an  authorizing  committee
are  just  wasting  our  time—we  know  the  appropriators  are  there
every  year  to  make  sure  that  what  they  put  in  the  statute  is  ad-
hered  to,  and  if  not,  then,  you  don’t  get  the  money  for  the  next
year. But there are those who think that those of us on authorizing
committees  are  wasting  our  time.  And  the  statute  makes  it  clear
that  program  activities  are  to  include  the  potential,  studying  the
potential  use  of  nanotechnology,  or  the  societal  impacts  of  the  po-
tential use of nanotechnology in enhancing human intelligence, and
developing  artificial  intelligence  which  exceeds  human  capacity.
Later,  in  Section  5,  those  two  matters  are  to  be  reported  on  back
to  Congress,  and  I  wonder  if  Mr.  Kvamme  could  tell  us  what  the
Administration  is  doing  to  carry  out  that  part  of  the  mandate  of
the bill.

Mr. KVAMME. Well, we tried to look at that, and because clearly,
I  think  the  general  sense  of  our  counsel,  at  least,  was  that  we  are
not interested in, what was that famous book, Prey. You know, we
are not interested in creating Prey animals. As a matter of fact, we
were somewhat concerned that that——

Mr.  SHERMAN.  Yes,  but  the  language  I  was  able  to  get  in  the

statute had nothing to do with Prey.

Mr. KVAMME. I understand that. Yeah.
Mr. SHERMAN. And——
Mr.  KVAMME.  The  enhancing  aspect  is  what  I  am  getting  at.  As
you  will  see  in  our  report,  we  actually  have  an  example,  though,
of  things  that  hopefully  will  work  better  to  enhance  medical  im-
provements, the screw that we talk about, for use in medical appli-
cations, that is more capable of becoming, or being like bone mate-
rial, we think is an important contribution.

Mr.  SHERMAN.  If  I  can  interrupt,  because  I  have  got  one  more

question.

impact——

Mr. KVAMME. And maybe I am on the wrong track.
Mr.  SHERMAN.  Okay.  The 

law  says 

look  at  the  societal

Mr. KVAMME. Yeah.
Mr.  SHERMAN.—of  creating  a  half-human,  half-enhanced  techno-
logically,  chip-enhanced  human  brain,  and  a  new  species  that  may
or  may  not  consider  itself  human.  Your  response  is  we  are  devel-
oping a new screw that might be used in brain surgery.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:56 Nov 29, 2005 Jkt 021950 PO 00000 Frm 00082 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\RES05\062905\21950.TXT SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

79

Mr. KVAMME. Yeah.
Mr.  SHERMAN.  You  are  supposed  to  be  looking  at  the  societal

problems, and you are looking at the technological capacity.

Mr.  KVAMME.  I  guess  it  somewhat  depends  upon  your  definition

Mr.  SHERMAN.  Well,  but  the  statute  is  you  are  supposed  to  look

of the word enhanced, okay?

at the societal problems——

Mr. KVAMME. Yeah.
Mr. SHERMAN.—caused by——
Mr. KVAMME. Yeah.
Mr.  SHERMAN.—levels  of  intelligence  beyond  those  of  anyone  in
this  room,  with  the  possible  exception  of  the  chairman.  And  your
response  is  we  don’t  want  to  study  the  societal  problems  of  doing
it. We want to study how to do it.

Mr. KVAMME. I don’t intend that to be my response.
Mr.  SHERMAN.  Okay.  Then  what  has  been  funded  to  look  at  the
potential societal and ethical implications of developing new, intel-
ligent species?

Mr.  KVAMME.  Well,  there  are  a  number  of  studies  that  you  are
probably  aware  of  that—and  workshops  in  that  particular  area—
one of them hasn’t taken place yet. This summer, NSF has a work-
shop  relative  to  that,  a  Center  for  Society,  and  in  our  study,  we
spent  a  full  day  on  these  types  of  matters.  We  did  not  see,  and
maybe  we  should  have  looked  more  deeply,  we  did  not  see  that  at
this  point  in  time,  the  societal  applications,  such  as  creating  half-
humans, to use your example, were going on. We are trying——

Mr. SHERMAN. Well, it is obvious it is not going on now.
Mr. KVAMME. Yeah.
Mr. SHERMAN. These sections were not designed to become opera-
tive only a year before it was technologically possible. For a species
to  decide  whether  it  wants  to  go  out  of  business  should  take  more
than  a  year,  and  you  would  think  that  a  statute  that  says  look  at
a societal problem should not mean well, don’t do anything as long
as the technology is more than a year away. Again, I think you are
illustrating  the  point  that  those  of  us  on  our  authorizing  commit-
tees are not really in a position, in writing statutes, to actually af-
fect Administration policy.

Mr. KVAMME. That is very possibly true.
Mr. SHERMAN. Then, you want our support, you want our author-
ization,  you  will  ignore  those  provisions  of  the  statute  we  put
in——

Mr. KVAMME. No, no, no, no, no. I did not say that, sir.
Mr.  SHERMAN.  Well,  you  just  said  it  is  quite  possibly  true  that
those of us on authorizing committees, even when successful in get-
ting  our  language  into  authorizing  bills,  will  find  that  our  provi-
sions  will  be  ignored,  cannot  be  enforced  through  the  appropria-
tions process. That was the theory I started off with.

Mr. KVAMME. You are, unfortunately, putting words in my mouth
that  are  not  accurate,  sir.  The  answer  I  am  trying  to  give  you  is
the  following.  I  am  saying  that  we  have  looked  at  that.  We  inter-
preted  that  statute  in  a  way  that  apparently  you  do  not  interpret
it. We ought to get clarification on your interpretation.

Mr. SHERMAN. Well, I wrote it, so maybe you should. Thank you.
Mr. KVAMME. Thank you.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:56 Nov 29, 2005 Jkt 021950 PO 00000 Frm 00083 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\RES05\062905\21950.TXT SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

80

Chairman INGLIS. Perhaps, if you want to add any comments on

that in writing, we are happy to receive them.

Mr. SHERMAN. Fine.
Chairman  INGLIS.  We  are  going  to  go  with  another  brief  round
of  questions,  three  minutes.  We  are  going  to  reset  the  clock  for
three minutes. We are actually going to stick to the clock this time.
We  were  rather  generous  in  the  last  time,  but  Ms.  Hooley  had
some questions, and I had one quick question for Mr. Kvamme.

Very  interesting  discussion  you  were  having  about  siting  of  so-
phisticated  plants,  and  the  incentives,  relative  to  being  in  China,
let  us  say,  as  opposed  to  being  in  the  United  States.  If  you  were
sitting  up  here,  and  trying  to  figure  out,  devise  strategies  on  how
to  keep  a  manufacturing  base  here  in  the  U.S.,  besides  the  edu-
cation component, which we have discussed this morning, what else
would you advise us to do, to make it so that that decision that you
were  talking  about  earlier  would  come  the  other  way,  and  you
would site one of those very sophisticated nanotechnology plants in
the U.S., rather than in China?

Mr.  KVAMME.  Tax  policy.  It  is,  plain  and  simply,  tax  policy.  And

countries have to be competitive.

Chairman INGLIS. Income tax policy, or property tax policy?
Mr.  KVAMME.  No,  corporate  tax  policy.  It  has  to  be  competitive.
Now,  obviously,  you  can’t  compete  with  every  little  knick  and
knack that somebody is going to incentivize you with. Look at how
our states compete with one other for siting. That plant that I men-
tioned  was  a  fight  between  Texas  and  New  York,  frankly,  as  I  un-
derstand the details. And I don’t understand all the details on that.
So,  just  take  that  example,  and  move  it  to  the  corporate,  to  the
country level, and I think I am hoping that in the new look at this,
this  revision  of  the  tax  policy,  we  will  look  at  our  global  competi-
tiveness  at  the  corporate  tax  level.  Because,  frankly,  we  are  not
very competitive right now.

Now,  by  the  way,  on  the  positive  side,  why  did  those  folks  stay
here,  with  $3  billion?  Why  did  they  stay,  at  a  $1.3  billion  cost?
They  were  afraid  of  IP,  that  many  of  us  mentioned.  They  were
afraid it would leak, and so, they decided it was worth $1.3 billion
to  stay  here,  for  that  reason.  Well,  that  is  not  a  bad  reason,  so,
having  a  very  strong  IP  protection  thing,  obviously,  is  a  contrib-
utor.

Do  you  have  to  get  equal  to  the  other  guys?  I  don’t  think  so.  I
just think in most cases, $1.3 billion out of $3 billion makes a huge
difference.

Chairman INGLIS. May I ask you a quick followup in 30 seconds?
Mr.  O’CONNOR.  Sure,  if  I  may.  From  a  Motorola  perspective,
most  of  our  nanotechnology  research  and  development,  almost  all
of it, is here in the U.S., for a number of reasons. Close to facilities.
And  I  think,  really,  the  early  applications  for  what  we  are  seeing.
I agree with Floyd on the concept of tax and just the incentives on
trying  to  make  sure  we  are  incentivizing  the  proper  type  of  devel-
opment in this area, is for us a big issue.

Chairman INGLIS. Ms. Hooley.
Ms.  HOOLEY.  Thank  you.  I  will  also  try  to  do  a  quick  question.
Thank you all for this wonderful discussion that you have given us
today. Really appreciate your comments.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:56 Nov 29, 2005 Jkt 021950 PO 00000 Frm 00084 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\RES05\062905\21950.TXT SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

81

Dr.  Cassady  from  Oregon  State  was  here  in  May,  and  suggested
the need for a DARPA-like organization to support nanotechnology
development efforts that are closer to commercialization of products
and processes. Opinion on that. Needed, not needed, okay?

Mr. O’CONNOR. I will start quickly with an answer.
Ms. HOOLEY. Okay.
Mr.  O’CONNOR.  Absolutely.  It  would  be  great.  Some  of  our  best
innovations  are  via  DARPA  programs  in  our  different  areas.  We
have had great success with it. It is a good example of collaboration
between  government  and  the  private  industry,  and  a  lot  of  good
successes.  And  I  think  that  would  be  a  very  worthwhile  initiative.
Mr.  KVAMME.  I  think  the  first  step  is  to,  as  we  have  been  refer-
ring,  rapidly  look  to  use  nanotechnology  within  the  existing  agen-
cies, the mission-driven programs like DARPA, the 6.2, 6.3 funding,
et  cetera,  NIH—down  the  line,  energy,  et  cetera.  There  may  very
well  be  a  good  role  for  looking  across  those,  creating  that  pot  of
funds  that  looks  for  synergies  that  will  not  be  realized  in  any  one
agency.

Ms. HOOLEY. Okay.
Mr.  KVAMME.  I  would  say  that  in  the  ’70s  and  ’80s,  when  I  had
a  lot  of  involvement  with  DARPA,  by  the  way,  they  were  good  at
saying no.

Ms. HOOLEY. It is always nice to have someone who can do that.
Mr. KVAMME. Yeah. They would cut off projects. They are an ex-

ample that is contrary to what I said before.

Ms. HOOLEY. Thank you.
Chairman  INGLIS.  That  is  all.  I  want  to  thank  the  witnesses.  I
appreciate you taking the time to testify. I thank the Members for
participating, and the hearing is adjourned.

[Whereupon, at 11:55 a.m., the Subcommittee was adjourned.]

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:56 Nov 29, 2005 Jkt 021950 PO 00000 Frm 00085 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\RES05\062905\21950.TXT SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:56 Nov 29, 2005 Jkt 021950 PO 00000 Frm 00086 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\RES05\062905\21950.TXT SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

Appendix 1:

ANSWERS TO POST-HEARING QUESTIONS

(83)

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:56 Nov 29, 2005 Jkt 021950 PO 00000 Frm 00087 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\RES05\062905\21950.TXT SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

84

ANSWERS TO POST-HEARING QUESTIONS

Responses by E. Floyd Kvamme, Co-Chair, President’s Council of Advisors on Science

and Technology

Questions submitted by Representative Bart Gordon
Q1. The  National  Research  Council  of  the  National  Academies  of  Science  reviewed
the  National  Nanotechnology  Initiative  (the  NNI)  and  issued  a  report  in  2002
(Small  Wonders,  Endless  Frontiers)  that  included  a  number  of  recommenda-
tions.  On  the  basis  of  the  PCAST’s  more  recent  review  of  the  NNI,  could  you
comment on how the initiative has responded to the following NRC findings and
recommendations:

Q1a. The NRC stressed that the NNI should provide ‘‘strong support for the develop-
ment of an interdisciplinary culture’’ since nanoscale science and technology in-
volves  research  at  the  convergence  of  many  different  disciplines.  Did  you  find
evidence  that  this  is  happening,  and  do  you  judge  the  mix  of  federal  funding
among  awards  for  individuals,  small  groups,  and  large  multi-disciplinary
groups about right?

A1a. During  its  review  of  the  NNI,  PCAST  met  with  representatives  from  the  fed-
eral agencies that fund research under the NNI as well as with investigators at re-
search  institutions  around  the  country.  Based  on  these  interactions,  I  and  other
PCAST members found that in fact the initiative recognizes the need for and strong-
ly  supports  an  interdisciplinary  culture  in  order  to  promote  advancement  in
nanoscience and nanotechnology. In addition, I tended to rely on my personal expe-
rience from the beginnings of the semiconductor industry when interdisciplinary ac-
tivity was crucial to gaining a full understanding of all the different aspects of semi-
conductor  research.  Nanotechnology  discovery  will  have  similar  traits.  Your  ques-
tion,  however,  prompted  me  to  look  in  greater  depth  into  the  means  by  which  the
NNI supports interdisciplinary research. They include:

• National  Science  Foundation  (NSF)  Nanoscale  Science  and  Engineering  Cen-
ters  (NSECs)  are  required  to  involve  multiple  departments  and  multiple  re-
search  institutions,  as  well  as  industry  partners.  Each  NSEC  is  focused  on
a  research  problem  that  cannot  be  addressed  practically  by  single  investiga-
tors  or  small  groups.  Each  NSEC  typically  receives  $2.5  million/year  for  five
years,  with  an  option  for  an  additional  five  years.  Currently  active  are  14
NSECs with participation by over 30 universities across the country. NSF will
announce  two  new  NSECs,  one  focused  on  societal  issues  and  one  on
nanomanufacturing, before the end of this fiscal year.
• NSF Nanoscale Interdisciplinary Research Teams (NIRTs) involve researchers
from  3–5  different  disciplines  within  one  or  more  research  institutions.  Each
NIRT receives approximately $1–$2 million over four years. During the period
from  FY  2001  through  FY  2005,  over  250  NIRTs  will  be  created.  Additional
information  about  both  NSECs  and  NIRTs  can  be  found  on  the  NSF  website
at http://www.nsf.gov/erssprgm/nano/.
• The Department of Defense (DOD) Multidisciplinary University Research Ini-
tiatives (MURIs) are required to involve researchers from more than one dis-
cipline  and  often  include  multiple  universities.  Since  FY  2001,  the  DOD  has
awarded nearly 40 MURI grants that are focused on nanotechnology research.
Each  MURI  receives  on  average  $1  million/year  for  three  years,  with  an  op-
tional two year extension.
• The  Institute  for  Soldier  Nanotechnologies  (ISN)  is  an  interdepartmental  re-
search center at MIT. Established in 2002 by a five-year, $50 million contract
from  the  U.S.  Army,  the  ISN’s  research  mission  is  to  use  nanotechnology  to
dramatically  improve  the  survival  of  soldiers.  The  ISN  brings  together  re-
searchers  from  10  different  departments  and  supports  more  than  100  stu-
dents and post-doctoral fellows.
• The DOD also supports interdisciplinary research at its in-house laboratories.
One  example  is  the  Naval  Research  Laboratory  Institute  for  Nanoscience,
which supports multi-disciplinary research critical to the Navy’s mission. The
Institute  is  housed  in  a  new  state-of-the-art  facility  that  provides  the  highly
controlled environmental conditions and advanced equipment that is often re-
quired to perform nanoscale research.
• The  Department  of  Energy  (DOE)  is  constructing  five  Nanoscale  Science  Re-
search Centers (NSRCs), co-located with major x-ray and neutron facilities at

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:56 Nov 29, 2005 Jkt 021950 PO 00000 Frm 00088 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\RES05\062905\21950.TXT SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

85

Oak  Ridge  National  Laboratory,  Argonne  National  Laboratory,  Lawrence
Berkeley National Laboratory, Sandia National Laboratories (jointly with Los
Alamos  National  Laboratory),  and  Brookhaven  National  Laboratory.  The
NSRCs  are  under  construction  (the  Center  for  Nanophase  Materials  Science
at  Oak  Ridge  National  Laboratory  is  nearing  completion  and  will  begin  ac-
cepting users in early FY 2006), and will be operated as user facilities for the
broad research community with multi-disciplinary staff support. The facilities
are  designed  specifically  to  bring  together  laboratory  staff  from  a  variety  of
fields and disciplines in order to better serve the user community and to fos-
ter interdisciplinary in-house research.
• In  2002,  NASA  established  four  University  Research,  Engineering  and  Tech-
nology  Institutes  (URETI)  using  a  model  that  is  similar  to  the  NSF  NSECs.
Each  NASA  institute  receives  approximately  $3  million/year  for  five  years,
with  a  possible  five  year  extension.  All  four  institutes  are  implemented  as
consortia  and  all  place  a  special  emphasis  on  the  union  of  biology  and
nanoscale technology in order to address NASA’s particular requirements.
• More recently, the National Cancer Institute (NCI) of the National Institutes
of  Health  (NIH)  released  its  Cancer  Nanotechnology  Plan.  The  Plan  includes
programs  and  activities  that  are  aimed  specifically  at  bringing  physical  and
computer scientists together with biologists and cancer researchers to develop
nanotechnology  for  diagnosis,  detection,  and  treatment  of  cancer.  In  addition
to funding (beginning this fiscal year) interdisciplinary research teams at sev-
eral  Centers  of  Nanotechnology  Cancer  Excellence,  NCI  is  creating,  along
with the National Institutes of Standard and Technology (NIST) and the Food
and  Drug  Administration  (FDA),  the  Nanotechnology  Characterization  Lab-
oratory  to  develop  critical  capabilities  for  accelerating  the  transition  of
nanomaterials  into  clinical  applications.  More  information  about  the  Cancer
Nanotechnology Plan can be found at http://nano.cancer.gov.

The above are just a few examples that illustrate the strength and breadth of the
NNI’s support for multi-disciplinary research. Moreover, the fact that agencies such
as NSF are only able to fund a small percentage of the proposals for multi-discipli-
nary research that pass peer review indicates that an interdisciplinary ‘‘culture’’ has
taken hold across the university research community. The role of the NNI in estab-
lishing  such  an  interdisciplinary  culture  was  specifically  noted  by  the  most  recent
outside review of NSF programs.
While a substantial portion of funding now goes to support large centers, the ma-
jority (∼80 percent at NSF) of funding for nanoscale research is for individual inves-
tigators  and  small  research  teams.  The  NNI  is  cognizant  of  the  need  to  maintain
a  balance  among  these  funding  mechanisms  and  the  members  of  PCAST  believe
that the current mix is appropriate.
Q1b. The  NRC  criticized  the  initiative  for  having  too  little  information  sharing
among  the  agencies  during  program  planning  and  execution  and  for  a  lack  of
willingness  by  the  participating  agencies  to  co-fund  large  research  programs.
Did  your  review  find  any  evidence  of  stronger  collaboration  among  the  federal
agencies,  and  are  there  examples  of  joint  agency  funding  of  large  research
projects?

A1b. PCAST  found  that  the  agencies  are  working  in  a  coordinated  fashion  to  ad-
vance the goals of the initiative. The Council noted in particular the following mech-
anisms and activities that are the result of joint planning or execution by the agen-
cies.

• Strategic  Plan.  The  National  Science  and  Technology  Council’s  Nanoscale
Science,  Engineering,  and  Technology  (NSET)  Subcommittee  is  the  inter-
agency  body  that  coordinates  and  manages  the  NNI.  As  called  for  by  the  21’’
Century Nanotechnology Research and Development Act (the Act), in Decem-
ber  2004  the  NSET  Subcommittee  released  an  updated  strategic  plan  identi-
fying the goals and priorities of the initiative as a whole, and activities across
the  Federal  Government  by  which  to  achieve  those.  The  plan  also  describes
the relationship between the participating agencies and the areas of research
(program  component  areas)  and  the  areas  of  application.  Subgroups  of  the
NSET Subcommittee have been formed to further coordinate work within the
PCAs identified in the plan.
• Annual Budget Supplement. Also in accordance with the Act, the NSET Sub-
committee  prepared  a  supplement  to  the  President’s  FY  2006  Budget,  in
which  is  outlined  the  activities  taking  place  across  the  Federal  Government.
The  report  emphasizes  in  particular  numerous  interagency  planning,  coordi-

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:56 Nov 29, 2005 Jkt 021950 PO 00000 Frm 00089 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\RES05\062905\21950.TXT SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

86

nation,  and  collaboration  efforts  that  will  support  the  FY  2006  budget  prior-
ities.

• Regular  Interagency  Meetings.  The  NSET  Subcommittee  meets  monthly  and
many  of  the  subgroups  that  have  been  formed  to  address  specific  areas  that
benefit from interagency attention also meet regularly. Current subgroups in-
clude:

Æ Nanotechnology Environmental and Health Implications (NEHI) Working
Group provides for exchange of information among agencies that support
nanotechnology  research  and  those  with  responsibilities  for  protecting
health  and  the  environment,  worker  safety,  etc.  The  NEHI  Working
Group  is  working  to  identify  and  prioritize  research  needs  to  support
science-based regulatory decision-making. Its members include represent-
atives from the Environmental Protection Agency, Food and Drug Admin-
istration, National Institute for Occupational Safety and Health, National
Institute  of  Environmental  Health  Sciences,  Department  of  Agriculture,
Department of Energy, Department of Defense, National Science Founda-
tion,  Occupational  Safety  and  Health  Administration,  Consumer  Product
Safety Commission, and National Institute of Standards and Technology.
Æ Nanotechnology  Innovation  and  Liaison  with  Industry  (NILI)  Working
Group  promotes  the  development  of  nanotechnology  for  practical  benefit
and  the  transfer  of  NNI  research  results  to  commercial  products  and
services  for  public  use.  Under  the  NILI  Working  Group  are  a  number  of
liaison  groups,  also  known  as  Consultative  Boards  for  Advancing
Nanotechnology (CBANs), made up of NSET Subcommittee members and
representatives  from  particular  industry  sectors,  including  the  semicon-
ductor  and  chemical  industries.  The  CBANs  provide  channels  for  ex-
change  of  information  relating  to  the  industries’  nanotechnology  needs
and nanotechnology research results.

Æ Global  Issues  in  Nanotechnology  (GIN)  Working  Group  was  formed  rel-
atively recently to track nanotechnology activities globally, to identify op-
portunities  for  international  collaboration  on  nanotechnology  R&D,  and
to  provide  joint  agency  input  to  balance  U.S.  Government  commercial,
diplomatic, and security interests within nanotechnology activities on the
international level.

Æ Nanotechnology  Public  Engagement  Group  (NPEG)  is  developing  strate-
gies  for  informing  the  public  about  nanotechnology  and  for  getting  input
from the public regarding benefits of particular interest and risks of par-
ticular concern.

• Numerous  examples  of  multi-agency  support  for  nanotechnology  R&D  can  be
found  in  the  FY  2006  NNI  Supplement  to  the  President’s  Budget.  Those  in-
clude:

Æ A  solicitation  jointly  funded  by  EPA,  NSF,  and  NIOSH  for  research  on

environmental, health, and safety implications.

Æ A  cooperative  effort  to  develop  appropriate  test  methods  among  the  Na-
tional  Cancer  Institute  (NCI),  the  National  Institute  for  Standards
(NIST)  and  Technology,  and  the  Food  and  Drug  Administration  (FDA).
These tests will be used by researchers at the NCI Nanotechnology Char-
acterization  Laboratory  to  test  nanomaterials  and  nanostructures  that
have  potential  application  for  the  detection,  diagnosis,  and  treatment  of
cancer.

Even  where  programs  are  not  funded  jointly,  where  appropriate,  agencies
have  combined  program  reviews  in  order  to  better  share  the  results  of  indi-
vidually funded projects in a particular area.

Q2. The NRC recommended the creation of programs for the invention and develop-
ment  of  new  instruments  for  nanoscience.  Has  this  recommendation  been  ad-
dressed by the initiative, and in general, what level of priority did you find that
the NNI assigns for this purpose?

A2. PCAST  found  that  the  NNI  has  recognized  the  need  for  increasingly  powerful
instrumentation  for  the  visualization,  measurement,  and  characterization  of  new
nanomaterials and nanostructures. Specific activities include:

• Leading-edge  nanotechnology  measurement  research,  including  development
of  instrumentation,  is  a  core  mission  of  NIST.  With  its  Advanced  Measure-

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:56 Nov 29, 2005 Jkt 021950 PO 00000 Frm 00090 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\RES05\062905\21950.TXT SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

87

ment  Laboratory  now  operational,  the  agency  appears  well-equipped  to  re-
main at the forefront in this area.

• NSF’s  program  within  Mathematical  and  Physical  Sciences  Division  aimed

specifically at instrumentation research and development.

• The National Nanotechnology Infrastructure Network (NNIN) is a 13-univer-
sity  network  that  supports  both  research  on  state-of-the-art  tools  and  meth-
ods  for  synthesis  and  characterization  and  user  facilities  for  the  use  of  ad-
vanced instrumentation by the broader research community. In the first three
quarters  of  FY  2005,  over  7,500  users  have  benefited  from  NNIN  facilities
and expertise.

• DOE  is  funding  the  development  of  a  next  generation  Transmission  Electron
Aberration-corrected Microscope (TEAM) to allow for even greater capabilities
for  visualization  and  characterization  at  the  nanoscale.  The  TEAM  project
supports  efforts  at  Argonne  National  Laboratory,  Brookhaven  National  Lab-
oratory, Lawrence Berkeley National Laboratory, Oak Ridge National Labora-
tory, and Frederick Seitz Materials Research Laboratory at the University of
Illinois at Urbana-Champaign.

Q3. The  PCAST  report  notes  that  an  important  role  of  the  Federal  Government  in
the development and commercialization of new technologies is an ‘‘early adopter’’
customer.  How  is  the  National  Nanotechnology  Initiative  helping  mission  agen-
cies to identify opportunities to develop and use products that arise from federal
nanotechnology research under the NNI?

A3. As the PCAST report has just issued, there has not been time for the initiative
to  take  steps  to  address  this  recommendation,  however,  PCAST  will  be  interested
in and will be monitoring how the initiative does so.
Q4. An  important  potential  obstacle  to  commercialization  of  nanotechnology  will  be
environmental,  health,  and  safety  concerns.  Does  PCAST  find  the  current  level
of  funding  in  the  National  Nanotechnology  Initiative  sufficient  to  address  this
set of issues adequately?

A4. As  part  of  its  review,  PCAST  convened  a  panel  of  experts  in  environmental,
health,  and  safety  (EHS)  of  nanomaterials  from  government,  industry,  and  aca-
demia  to  assess  this  very  question.  The  panel’s  input,  along  with  information  from
the  agencies  led  PCAST  members  to  conclude  that  the  initiative  is  giving  appro-
priate  priority  and  funding  to  this  important  area.  Activities  aimed  at  addressing
EHS  concerns,  including  research  to  understand  the  effects  of  nanomaterials,  have
increased  within  agencies  such  as  the  National  Institute  for  Occupational  Safety
and Health (NIOSH), EPA (which shifted its emphasis for new grants from environ-
mental  applications  to  EHS  implications),  and  the  National  Institute  of  Environ-
mental  Health  Sciences  (NIEHS).  NSF  has  listed  environmental  implications  as  a
specific  focus  area  for  its  nanoscience  research  program  since  the  initiative’s  incep-
tion in FY 2001.

PCAST  noted  that  in  addition  to  the  funding  that  is  being  spent  on  R&D  with
a primary purpose of understanding EHS implications of nanomaterials (nearly $40
million  requested  in  the  FY  2006  Budget),  there  is  also  underway  considerable  re-
search  on  applications  and  in  fields  such  as  metrology  that  is  related  to  and  ad-
vances our understanding of EHS implications. Furthermore, agencies such as EPA
and  FDA  are  devoting  substantial  other  resources  other  than  research  funds  to  as-
sess risks and take appropriate steps to protect the public and the environment.

Agencies are also engaged in international activities related to EHS concerns, in-
cluding  standards  development  for  accurate  and  reliable  measurement  and  charac-
terization  of  nanomaterials.  These  and  other  efforts  to  understand  the  EHS  effects
of  nanotechnologies  are  the  concern,  and  the  responsibility,  of  all  nations  that  are
investing in the development of new nanomaterials. As our report notes, the United
States 
total  amount  spent  on
nanotechnology R&D by all governments. PCAST hopes that other countries also are
investing  in  EHS  R&D  and  that  all  countries  will  cooperate  to  share  the  results  of
these  efforts  and,  to  this  end,  PCAST  members  have  visited  with  their  European
counterparts to promote such open cooperation.

invests  approximately  25  percent  of 

Finally,  our  report  also  indicated  that  the  primary  area  for  immediate  concern  is
in  the  workplace,  where  nanomaterials  are  being  used  or  manufactured  and  where
the greatest likelihood for exposure exists. While the Federal Government will play
a  role  in  addressing  occupational  safety,  industry  must  also  provide  leadership  in
the  research  and  development  of  safe  products  and  in  maintaining  a  healthy  work-
place and a clean environment. Clearly, the sharing of research results among gov-

the 

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:56 Nov 29, 2005 Jkt 021950 PO 00000 Frm 00091 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\RES05\062905\21950.TXT SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

ernment  and  industry  stakeholders  will  contribute  to  our  collective  knowledge  and
will benefit everyone.

88

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:56 Nov 29, 2005 Jkt 021950 PO 00000 Frm 00092 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\RES05\062905\21950.TXT SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

Appendix 2:

ADDITIONAL MATERIAL FOR THE RECORD

(89)

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:56 Nov 29, 2005 Jkt 021950 PO 00000 Frm 00093 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\RES05\062905\21950.TXT SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

90

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:56 Nov 29, 2005 Jkt 021950 PO 00000 Frm 00094 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\RES05\062905\21950.TXT SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

91

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:56 Nov 29, 2005 Jkt 021950 PO 00000 Frm 00095 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\RES05\062905\21950.TXT SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

